[cover]

Marx, Capital and the Madness of Economic Reason

David Harvey is Distinguished Professor of Anthropology at the City
University of New York Graduate School where he has taught since 2001.
His books _The Enigma of Capital, Seventeen Contradictions and the End
of Capitalism_ and T_he Ways of the World_ were published by Profile in
2010, 2014 and 2016 to international acclaim.

ALSO BY DAVID HARVEY

_Explanation in Geography_

_Social Justice and the City_

_The Limits to Capital_

_The Urbanisation of Capital_

_Consciousness and the Urban Experience_

_The Urban Experience_

_The Condition of Postmodernity_

_Justice, Nature and the Geography of Difference_

_Spaces of Hope_

_Spaces of Capital_

_The New Imperialism_

_Paris, Capital of Modernity_

_A Brief History of Neoliberalism_

_Spaces of Global Capital_

_A Companion to Marx’s Capital, Volumes I and II_

_The Enigma of Capital_

_Rebel Cities_

_Seventeen Contradictions and the End of Capitalism_

_The Ways of the World_



MARX, CAPITAL AND THE MADNESS OF ECONOMIC REASON


DAVID HARVEY

[Images]

First published in Great Britain in 2017 by
PROFILE BOOKS LTD
3 Holford Yard
Bevin Way
London WC1X 9HD
_www.profilebooks.com_

Copyright © David Harvey, 2017

The moral right of the author has been asserted.

All rights reserved. Without limiting the rights under copyright
reserved above, no part of this publication may be reproduced, stored or
introduced into a retrieval system, or transmitted, in any form or by
any means (electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording or
otherwise), without the prior written permission of both the copyright
owner and the publisher of this book.

A CIP catalogue record for this book is available from the British
Library.

eISBN 978 1 78283 368 0


Contents

Prologue

1 The Visualisation of Capital as Value in Motion

2 _Capital_, the Book

3 Money as the Representation of Value

4 Anti-Value: The Theory of Devaluation

5 Prices without Values

6 The Question of Technology

7 The Space and Time of Value

8 The Production of Value Regimes

9 The Madness of Economic Reason

Coda

_Notes and references_

_Acknowledgements_

_Index_


List of figures

Figure 1 The hydrological cycle

Figure 2 Visualising capital as value in motion

Figure 3 The three circuits of capital

Figure 4 Growth of public, corporate and private debt in the USA

Figure 5 Chinese consumption of cement

Figure 6 World consumption of steel

Figure 7 World consumption of copper

Figure 8 Rising debt (state, corporate and household) in China

Mad world! Mad kings! Mad composition! …

That smooth-fac’d gentleman, tickling commodity,

Commodity, the bias of the world;

The world, who of itself is peised well

Made to run even upon even ground.

Till this advantage, this vile-drawing bias,

This sway of motion, this commodity,

Makes it take head from all indifferency,

From all direction, purpose, course, intent.

And this same bias, this commodity,

This bawd, this broker, this all-changing word …

And why rail I on this commodity?

But for because he hath not woo’d me yet.

Not that I have the power to clutch my hand

When his fair angels would salute my palm;

But for my hand, as unattempted yet,

Like a poor beggar, raileth on the rich.

Well, whiles I am a beggar, I will rail

And say here is no sin, but to be rich;

And being rich, my virtue then shall be

To say there is no vice but beggary.

Since kings break faith upon commodity,

Gain, be my lord, for I will worship thee.

William Shakespeare, _King John_


Prologue

Throughout his life Marx made a prodigious effort to understand how
capital worked. He was obsessed with trying to figure out how what he
called ‘the laws of motion of capital’ affected daily life of the common
people. He relentlessly exposed the conditions of inequality and
exploitation that lay buried in the morass of self-congratulatory
theories propounded by the ruling classes. He was particularly
interested in why capitalism seemed to be so crisis prone. Were these
crises, like those he experienced firsthand in 1848 and 1857, due to
external shocks, such as wars, natural scarcities and bad harvests, or
was there something about the way capital itself worked that made such
destructive crashes inevitable? This question still bedevils economic
enquiry. Given the sad state and confusing trajectory of global
capitalism since the crash of 2007–8 – and its deleterious impacts on
the daily lives of millions of people – it seems a good moment to review
what Marx managed to figure out. Maybe there are some useful insights
here to help clarify the nature of the problems we are now facing.

It is not, alas, easy to summarise Marx’s findings, and follow his
intricate arguments and his detailed reconstructions. This is partly due
to the fact that most of his work was incomplete. Only a small fraction
of it ever saw the light of day in a form that Marx thought fit for
publication. The rest exists as an intriguing and voluminous mass of
notes and drafts, comments of self-clarification, thought experiments of
the ‘what if it worked like this’ variety, and a host of rebuttals of
real and imagined objections and criticisms. To the degree that Marx
himself relied a great deal on a critical interrogation of how classical
political economy answered these kinds of questions (where figures like
Adam Smith, David Ricardo, Thomas Malthus, James Steuart, John Stuart
Mill, Bentham and a host of other thinkers and researchers held sway),
so our reading of his findings often demands a working knowledge of
those he is criticising. The same is true with respect to Marx’s
reliance upon classical German philosophy for his critical method, where
the imposing figure of Hegel dominates backed up by Spinoza, Kant and a
host of other thinkers stretching way back to the Greeks (Marx did his
doctorate on the Greek philosophers Democritus and Epicurus). Add the
French socialist thinkers, such as Saint-Simon, Fourier, Proud-hon and
Cabet into the mix, and the huge canvas upon which Marx sought to
construct his oeuvre becomes intimidatingly apparent.

Marx was, moreover, a restless analyst rather than a static thinker. The
more he learned from his voluminous reading (not only of the political
economists, anthropologists and philosophers but of the business and
financial press, Parliamentary debates and Official Reports), the more
he evolved his views (or some would say changed his mind). He was a
voracious reader of classical literature – Shakespeare, Cervantes,
Goethe, Balzac, Dante, Shelley and on and on. He not only spiced up his
writing (particularly in the first volume of _Capital_, which is a
literary masterpiece) with lots of references to their thinking but he
genuinely valued their insights into how the world worked and drew much
inspiration from their method of presentation. And if that did not
suffice there was a voluminous correspondence with fellow travellers in
multiple languages along with lectures and talks to British trade
unionists or communications in and around the International Working
Men’s Association formed in 1864 with its pan-European working-class
aspirations. Marx was an activist and polemicist as well as a theorist,
scholar and thinker of the first rank. The closest he ever came to
getting a steady income was as a regular correspondent to the _New York
Tribune_, which was one of the largest circulation newspapers in the
United States at that time. While his columns asserted his distinctive
views, they also entailed up-to-date analysis of current events.

In recent times there has been a flurry of comprehensive studies of Marx
in relation to the personal, political, intellectual and economic milieu
in which he was writing. The major works of Jonathan Sperber and Gareth
Stedman Jones are invaluable, at least in certain respects.¹
Unfortunately, they also seem aimed at burying Marx’s thinking and
massive oeuvre along with Marx himself in Highgate Cemetery as a dated
and defective product of nineteenth-century thought. Marx was an
interesting historical figure for them but his conceptual apparatus has
little relevance today, if it ever did. Both of them forget that the
object of Marx’s study in _Capital_ was capital and not
nineteenth-century life (about which he certainly had many opinions).
And capital is still with us, alive and well in some respects while
plainly ailing if not spiralling out of control, drunk on its own
success and excess, in others. Marx considered the concept of capital
foundational for modern economics as well as for the critical
understanding of bourgeois society. Yet one can read to the end of the
Stedman Jones and Sperber volumes without having the foggiest clue as to
what Marx’s concept of capital was all about let alone how it might be
put to good use today. Marx’s analyses, though obviously dated in some
ways, are, I find, even more relevant now than they were at their time
of writing. What, in Marx’s day, was a dominant economic system in only
a small corner of the world now blankets the earth with astonishing
implications and results. In Marx’s time, political economy was a far
more open terrain of debate than it is now. Since then, a supposedly
scientific, highly mathematised and data driven field of study called
economics has achieved the status of an orthodoxy, a closed body of
supposedly rational knowledge – a true science – to which no one else is
admitted except on state and corporate business. It is now supplemented
by a growing belief in the powers of computer capacity (doubling every
two years) to construct, dissect and analyse enormous data sets on
almost everything. For some influential analysts, sponsored by the big
corporations, this supposedly opens the way to a techno-utopia of
rational management (e.g. of smart cities) where artificial intelligence
rules. This fantasy rests on the assumption that if something cannot be
measured and condensed into data points then it is either irrelevant or
does not exist. Make no mistake, large data sets can be extremely useful
but they do not exhaust the terrain of what needs to be known. They do
not help solve problems of alienation or of deteriorating social
relations.

Marx’s prescient commentaries on capital’s laws of motion and their
internal contradictions, its fundamental and underlying irrationalities,
turn out to be far more incisive and penetrating than the
one-dimensional macroeconomic theories of contemporary economics that
were found so wanting when confronted with the crash of 2007–8 and its
long-drawn-out aftermath. Marx’s analyses along with his distinctive
method of enquiry and his mode of theorising are invaluable for our
intellectual struggles to understand the capitalism of our times. His
insights deserve to be taken up and studied critically with all due
seriousness.

So what, then, are we to make of Marx’s concept of capital and of its
purported laws of motion? How might this help us understand our current
predicaments? These are the questions I shall explore here.

[Images]


1 The Visualisation of Capital as Value in Motion

The transformation of a sum of money into means of production and
labour-power is the first phase of the movement undergone by the quantum
of value which is going to function as capital. It takes place in the
market, within the sphere of circulation. The second phase of the
movement, the process of production, is complete as soon as the means of
production have been converted into commodities whose value exceeds that
of their component parts, and therefore contains the capital originally
advanced plus a surplus value. The commodities must then be thrown back
into the sphere of circulation. They must be sold, their value must be
realized in money, this money must be transformed once again into
capital, and so on, again and again. This cycle, in which the same
phases are continually gone through in succession, forms the circulation
of capital.

_Capital_, Volume 1, p. 709

I need to find some way to systematise Marx’s voluminous writings on
political economy, such as the three volumes of _Capital_, another three
volumes of _Theories of Surplus Value_, the earlier published works such
as _A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_ and the
recently edited and published notebooks such as the _Grundrisse_ along
with the notebooks from which Engels painstakingly reconstructed (not
without criticism or controversy) the posthumously published versions of
the second and third volumes of _Capital_. I then need to find a
comprehensible way to represent Marx’s basic findings.

[Images]

Figure 1 _The hydrological cycle as depicted by the US Geological
Survey_

In the natural sciences we find many simplified representations of
complex processes, which help visualise what is going on in some field
of enquiry. One such representation I find particularly interesting and
which I shall use as a template for depicting how capital works, is that
of the hydrological cycle (Figure 1). What I find particularly
interesting is that the cyclical movement of H₂O entails transformations
of form. Liquid in the oceans evaporates under the glare of the sun and
moves as a vapour upwards until it condenses out as the water droplets
that form clouds. If the droplets form at a high enough altitude they
crystallise out as ice particles, which form the high-flying cirrus
clouds that give us beautiful sunsets. At some point the droplets or ice
particles merge and as they become heavier so they drop from the clouds
under the force of gravity as precipitation, which occurs in a variety
of forms (rain, fog, dew, snow, ice, hail, freezing rain). Once returned
to the surface of the earth some of the water falls directly back into
the oceans, some of it gets stuck on high ground or cold regions as ice
that moves extremely slowly if at all, while the rest flows downwards
across the land as streams and rivers (with some water evaporating back
into the atmosphere) or under the land as ground water back into the
oceans. En route it is used by plants and animals that transpire and
perspire to return some water directly to the atmosphere through
evapo-transpiration. There are also large amounts of water stored in ice
fields or underground aquifers. Not everything is in motion at the same
pace. Glaciers move at the proverbial glacial pace, torrents rush
downhill, groundwater sometimes takes many years to travel a few miles.

What I like about this model is that it depicts H₂O passing through
different forms and states at different rates before returning to the
oceans to start all over again. This is very similar to how capital
moves. It begins as money capital before taking on commodity form
passing through production systems and emerging as new commodities to be
sold (monetised) in the market and distributed in different forms to
different factions of claimants (in the forms of wages, interest, rent,
taxes, profits) before returning to the role of money capital once more.
There is, however, one very significant difference between the
hydrological cycle and the circulation of capital. The driving force in
the hydrological cycle is incoming energy from the sun and that is
fairly constant (though it oscillates a bit). Its conversion into heat
has in the past changed a great deal (plunging the earth into ice ages
or phases of tropical heat). In recent times the heat retained has been
increasing significantly due to entrapment by greenhouse gases (arising
out of fossil fuel use). The total volume of water equivalent
circulating remains fairly constant or changes slowly (measured in
historical as opposed to geological time) as ice caps melt and
underground aquifers get drained dry by human uses. In the case of
capital, the sources of energy, as we shall see, are more varied and the
volume of capital in motion is constantly expanding at a compound rate
because of a growth requirement. The hydro-logical cycle is closer to a
genuine cycle (though there are signs of speed-up due to global
warming), whereas the circulation of capital is, for reasons we will
soon explain, a spiral in constant expansion.

VALUE IN MOTION

So what, then, would a flow model of capital in motion look like and how
can this help visualise what Marx’s capital is all about?

I start with Marx’s favoured definition of capital as ‘value in motion’.
I plan here to use Marx’s own terms, offering definitions as we go
along. Some of his terms are unusual and on the surface may sound
confusing, even mysteriously technocratic. In fact, they are not too
hard to understand when explained and the only way to be true to my
mission is to tell the story of capital in Marx’s own language.

So what is meant by the ‘value’ that is in motion? Marx’s meaning is
very special so this is the first of his terms that requires some
elaboration.¹ I will try to unfold its full meaning as we go along. But
its initial definition is _the social labour we do for others as
organised through commodity exchanges in competitive price-fixing
markets_. This is a bit of a mouthful but not really too hard to digest.
I have shoes but I make shoes to sell to others and I use the money I
get to buy the shirts that I need from others. In such an exchange, I in
effect exchange my labour time making shoes for the labour time someone
else spends making shirts. In a competitive economy with many people
making shirts and shoes it would make sense to think that if more labour
time on average is taken up in shoe-making as opposed to shirt-making,
then shoes should end up costing more than shirts. The price of shoes
would converge around some average and the price of shirts should also
converge on some average. Value underlines the difference between these
averages. It might show, for example, that one pair of shoes is
equivalent to two shirts. But notice it is the average labour time that
counts. If I spend an inordinate amount of labour time on the shoes I
make I will not get the equivalent back in exchange. That would reward
inefficiency. I will receive only the average labour time equivalent.

Marx defines value as _socially necessary labour time_. The labour time
I spend on making goods for others to buy and use is a social relation.
As such it is, like gravity, an immaterial but objective force. I cannot
dissect a shirt and find atoms of value in it any more than I can
dissect a stone and find atoms of gravity. Both are immaterial relations
that have objective material consequences. I cannot overemphasise the
importance of this conception. Physical materialism, particularly in its
empiricist garb, tends not to recognise things or processes that cannot
be physically documented and directly measured. But we use concepts like
‘value’ all of the time. If I say ‘political power is highly
decentralised in China’, most people will understand what I mean even
though we cannot go into the streets and measure it directly. Historical
materialism recognises the importance of immaterial but objective powers
of this sort. We typically appeal to them to account for the collapse of
the Berlin Wall, the election of Donald Trump, feelings of national
identity or the desire of indigenous populations to live according to
their own cultural norms. We describe features such as power, influence,
belief, status, loyalty and social solidarity in immaterial terms.
Value, for Marx, is exactly such a concept. ‘Material elements do not
make capital into capital,’ writes Marx. Instead, ‘they recall that
capital is also in another respect a value, that is, something
immaterial, something indifferent to its material consistency’.²

Given this condition, a crying need arises for some sort of material
representation – something we can touch and hold and measure – of what
value is about. This need is satisfied by the existence of money as an
expression or representation of value. Value is the social relation and
all social relations escape direct material investigation. Money is the
material representation and expression of this social relation.³

If capital is value in motion then how, where and why does it move and
take on the different forms that it does? To answer this I have
constructed a diagram of the general flow of capital as Marx depicts it
(Figure 2). The diagram is a bit intricate at first sight but no more
difficult to understand than the standard visualisation of the
hydrological cycle.

[Images]

Figure 2 _The paths of value in motion as derived from the study of
Marx’s writings on political economy_

CAPITAL IN MONEY FORM

The capitalist appropriates a certain amount of money to be used as
capital. This presumes there is a well-developed monetary system already
in place. The money floating around in society in general can be and is
used in all sorts of ways. It is out of this vast ocean of money already
in use that a part is syphoned off to become money capital. Not all
money is capital. Capital is a portion of the total money used in a
certain way. This distinction is foundational for Marx. He does not
support (though he does sometimes cite it as a common understanding) the
more familiar definition of capital as money being used to make more
money. Marx prefers his definition of ‘value in motion’ for reasons that
will later become apparent. It allows him, for example, to develop a
critical perspective on what money is about.

Armed with money as capital, the capitalist goes into the market place
and buys two kinds of commodities – labour power and means of
production. This presumes that wage labour already exists and that
labour power is waiting there to be bought. It also presumes that the
class of wage labourers has been successfully deprived of access to the
means of production and must, therefore, sell its labour power in order
to live. The value of this labour power is set by its costs of
reproduction at a given standard of living. It is equivalent to the
value of the market basket of commodities the labourer needs to survive
and reproduce. But note that the capitalist does not buy the labourer
(that would be slavery) but buys the use of the labourer’s labour power
for a fixed period of time (for an eight hour day, for example).

The means of production are commodities that come in a variety of forms:
raw materials taken directly as free gifts from nature, partially
finished products like auto parts or silicon chips, machines and the
energy to power them, factories and the use of surrounding physical
infrastructures (roads, sewers, water supplies, etc., which may be given
free by the state or paid for collectively by many capitalists as well
as other users). While some of them may be used in common, most of these
commodities must be bought in the market at prices which represent their
values. So not only must there already be a monetary system and a labour
market in existence, there must also be a sophisticated commodity
exchange system and adequate physical infrastructures for capital to
use. It is for this reason that Marx insists that capital can originate
only within an already established system of circulation of money,
commodities and wage labour.⁴

Value at this point in the circulation process undergoes a metamorphosis
(much as liquid water becomes water vapour in the hydrological cycle).
Capital initially had the form of money. Now the money has disappeared
and value appears in the guise of commodities: of labour power waiting
to be deployed and the means of production assembled together ready for
use in production. Keeping the value concept as central permits Marx to
enquire into the nature of the metamorphosis that converts value from
the money form into the commodity form. Could this moment of
metamorphosis become problematic? Marx invites us to think about this
question. He sees in it the possibility – but only the possibility – of
crises.

PRODUCTION OF COMMODITIES AND PRODUCTION OF SURPLUS VALUE

Once the labour power and the means of production are successfully
brought together under the supervision of the capitalist, they are put
to work in a labour process to produce a commodity for sale. It is here
that value is produced by labour in the form of a new commodity. Value
is produced and sustained by a movement that runs from things
(commodities) to processes (the activities of labouring that congeal
value in commodities) to things (new commodities).

The labour process entails the adoption of a certain technology, the
character of which determines the quantitative amounts of labour power,
raw materials, energy and machinery which the capitalist earlier
purchased in the market. Plainly, as the technology changes so do the
ratios of the inputs into the production process. Plainly, also, the
productivity of the labour power deployed in production depends on the
sophistication of the technology. A few labourers working with
sophisticated technology can produce far more widgets than hundreds of
labourers working with primitive tools. The value per widget is far
lower under the former technology compared to the latter.

For Marx the question of technology looms large as it does in almost all
forms of economic analysis. Marx’s definition is broad and
all-encompassing. Technology does not only refer to the machines and
tools and energy systems put in motion (the hardware as it were). It
also includes organisational forms (divisions of labour, structures of
cooperation, corporate forms, etc.) and the software of control systems,
time and motion studies, just-in-time production systems, artificial
intelligence and the like. In a competitively organised economy the
struggle between firms for technological advantage produces a pattern of
leap-frogging innovations in technological and organisational forms. For
this reason (and others that we will later study in more detail) capital
becomes a permanently revolutionary force in world history. The
technological basis of productive activity is constantly changing.

There is, however, an important contradiction here that Marx makes much
of. The more sophisticated the technology the less labour is congealed
in the individual commodity produced. Even more troubling, less total
value may be created if the total output of commodities does not
increase enough to compensate for the decreased value of the individual
items. If the productivity doubles then I have to produce and sell twice
the volume of commodities to keep the total value available constant.

But there is something else that happens during the process of material
commodity production. To understand this we have to go back to the value
theory of labour. The value of labour power, we said, was equivalent to
the costs of the commodities needed to reproduce the labourer at a
certain standard of living. This value may vary from place to place and
over time, but in a given contractual period it is known. At a certain
point in the production process the labourer has created the value
equivalent of the value of labour power. At the same time the labourer
has also successfully transferred the values of the means of production
into the new commodity. In Marx’s notation, a point arrives in the
working day when the labourer has produced the equivalent of V (the
value of labour power which Marx calls ‘variable capital’) and
transferred the value of C (the means of production which Marx calls
‘constant capital’) into the form of the new commodity.

The labourer does not at that point cease to labour. His or her contract
says he or she should work for the capitalist for ten hours. If the
value of labour power has been covered in the first six hours then the
labourer ends up working for capital for free for four hours. Those four
hours of free product create what Marx calls surplus value (which he
designates as S). Surplus value lies at the root of money profit. The
conundrum that had flummoxed classical political economy – where does
profit come from? – is solved in an instant. The total value of the
commodity is C + V + S. The capitalist’s outlay is C + V.

Notice something important here. What has been produced is a material
commodity. Value and surplus value lie congealed in commodity form. When
we look for the value that is supposedly in motion then it simply exists
as a pile of widgets on the factory floor. And no matter how hard I poke
and prod the widgets I can see no sign of value in motion. The only
motion that will count at this point is that of the capitalist hastening
to take the widgets to market to convert their hidden value back into
money form.

But before we follow ‘Mr Moneybags’, as Marx liked to call him, to
market, we need to recognise something that happens in the hidden abode
of production. What is produced there is not only a new material
commodity, but a social relation of exploitation of labour power.
Capitalist production has a dual character. It entails not only the
production of material commodities for use, but also the production of
surplus value for the benefit of the capitalist. At the end of the day,
capitalists care only about the surplus value, which will be realised as
monetary profit. They are indifferent as to the particular commodities
they produce. If there is a market for poison gas then they will produce
it. This moment in capital circulation encompasses not only the
production of commodities but also the production and reproduction of
the class relation between capital and labour in the form of surplus
value. While the fiction of the individualistic exchange of equivalents
in the market (where everything is transparent) is maintained (the
labourer receives the fair value of labour power), an increment of
surplus value has been produced for the capitalist class in a labour
process which is not transparent and which the capitalist is at pains to
keep hidden from view. From the outside it seems as if value has the
magical capacity to increase itself. Production is the magical moment in
which what Marx terms ‘the valorisation’ of capital occurs. Dead capital
(C the constant capital) has been given a new lease of life while labour
power (V), the only means by which value can be expanded, is put to work
to produce what Marx calls ‘absolute surplus value’. The technique is
simple: extend the working day beyond that point where the value of
labour power has been recuperated. The longer the working day the more
surplus value is produced for capital.

That this is a key feature in capital’s history is abundantly
illustrated by the more than two hundred year struggle over the length
of the working day, the length of the working week and year, and even
the length of a working life. That struggle has been never-ending and
goes back and forth depending on the balance of power in class forces.
Over the last thirty years, as the power of organised labour has in so
many places crumbled, more and more people are working eighty hour weeks
(two jobs) in order to survive.

Each time capital passes through the process of production it generates
a surplus, an increment in value. It is for this reason that capitalist
production implies perpetual growth. This is what produces the spiral
form to the motion of capital. No sensible person would go through all
the trials and troubles of organising production of widgets in this way
in order to end up with the same amount of money at the end of the day
as they had in their pocket at the beginning. The incentive is the
increment which will be represented by monetary profit. The means is the
creation of surplus value in production.

THE REALISATION OF VALUE IN MONEY FORM

The commodities are taken to market to be sold. In the course of a
successful market transaction, value returns to its money form. In order
for this to happen, there must be a want, need or desire for the use
value of the commodity backed by the ability to pay (an effective
demand). These conditions do not come about naturally. There is a long
and intricate history of the creation of wants, needs and desires under
capitalism. Furthermore, the effective demand is not independent of the
facts of monetary distribution which we will take up shortly. Marx calls
this key transition in the value form ‘the realisation of value’. But
the metamorphosis that occurs when value is transformed from commodity
to the money form may not go smoothly. If, for example, nobody wants,
needs or desires a particular commodity then it has no value no matter
how much labour time was expended in its production. Marx thus refers to
the ‘contradictory unity’ that must prevail between production and
realisation if the flow of value is to be sustained. Hang on to this
idea because it is very important in Marx’s presentation. We will later
return to look more closely at the possibilities for crises to occur at
this moment of realisation.

Marx distinguishes between two forms of consumption involved at this
moment of realisation. The first is what he calls ‘productive
consumption’. This concerns the production and sale of the use values
that capital needs as means of production. All the partially finished
commodities that capitalists need for their production have to be
produced by other capitalists and these goods flow back directly into
the production process. So part of the total effective demand in society
is constituted by money capital buying means of production. The wants,
needs and desires of capitalists for these commodities are perpetually
changing in response to technological and organisational innovation. The
commodity inputs required to make a plough are very different from those
needed to make a tractor and these are very different again to those
required to make an airliner.

The second concerns final consumption, which includes both wage goods
required by workers to reproduce themselves, luxury goods mainly if not
entirely consumed by class factions within the bourgeoisie and the goods
needed to sustain the state apparatus. With final consumption the
commodities disappear from circulation entirely which is not the case
with the production of means of production. The last chapters of Volume
2 of _Capital_ are devoted to a detailed study of the proportionalities
that must be achieved in production of wage goods, luxuries and means of
production if the flow of value is to continue unscathed. If those
proportionalities are not observed, then some value will have to be
destroyed to keep the economy on an equilibrium growth path. It is in
the context of realisation and transformation into the money form that
Marx builds his theory of the role of effective demand in maintaining
and in some instances even impelling the overall circulation of value as
capital.

THE DISTRIBUTION OF VALUE IN MONEY FORM

Once values are transformed from commodity to the money form through a
sale on the market, then the money is distributed among a whole series
of participants who, for one reason or another, can make a claim upon a
share of it.

WAGE LABOUR

Labour will claim its value in the form of money wages. The state of
class struggle is one of the factors that determine the value of labour
power. Labour may improve its wages and living conditions through class
struggles. Conversely, counter-attacks by an organised capitalist class
may reduce the value of labour power. But if wage goods (the goods
labourers require to survive and reproduce) are getting cheaper (e.g.
through cheap imports and technological changes) then a declining value
share can be compatible with a rising material standard of living. This
has been a key feature of recent capitalist history. Workers in general
get a declining share in total national income but now have mobile
phones and tablets. Meanwhile, the top 1 per cent take an ever
increasing share of total value output. This is not, as Marx is at pains
to point out, a law of nature but without any counterforce this is what
capital does. While the value produced is broadly divided between
capital and labour depending upon the organised (or disorganised) power
of each in relation to each other, individual groups in the work force
are differentially rewarded according to skill, status and position
while there are also differentials due to gender, race, ethnicity,
religion and sexual preference. It needs also to be said, however, that
capital appropriates the skills, capacities and powers of human beings
as free goods wherever and whenever it can. The knowledge, learning,
experience and skills stored within the working class are important
attributes of the labour force upon which capital often relies.

The money that flows to labour in the form of wages returns to the
overall circulation of capital in the form of an effective demand for
those commodities produced in the form of wage goods. The strength of
this effective demand depends upon the wage level and the size of the
wage labour force. In its return to circulation, however, the labourer
takes on the persona of buyer rather than worker while the capitalist
becomes the seller. There is, therefore, some degree of consumer choice
at work in the way the effective demand emanating from the workers is
expressed. If workers have a customary taste for tobacco, says Marx,
then tobacco is a wage good! There is here considerable scope for
cultural expression and the exercise of socially cultivated preferences
within the population to which capital will find it advantageous and
profitable to respond.

The wage goods support social reproduction. The rise of capitalism
accomplished a separation between the production of value and surplus
value in the form of commodities on the one hand and the activities of
social reproduction on the other. In effect capital relies upon the
workers and their families to take care of their own processes of
reproduction (with perhaps some assistance from the state). Marx follows
capital and likewise treats of social reproduction as a separate and
autonomous sphere of activity providing in effect a free gift to capital
in the persona of the labourer who returns to the workplace as fit and
ready for work as possible. The social relations within this sphere of
social reproduction and the forms of social struggle occurring within it
are quite different from those involved in valorisation (where the class
relation dominates) or in realisation (where buyers and sellers confront
each other). Questions of gender, patriarchy, kinship and family,
sexuality and the like become more salient. Social relations in
reproduction also extend to the politics of daily life as orchestrated
through a whole host of institutional arrangements such as Church,
politics, education and various forms of collective organisation in
neighbourhoods and communities. While wage labour is hired for domestic
and care purposes, some of the work done here is voluntary and unpaid.⁵

TAXES AND TITHES

A certain portion of the value and surplus value is appropriated by the
state in the form of taxes and taken by other institutions in civil
society in the form of tithes (e.g. to the Church) or charitable
contributions to support key institutions (e.g. hospitals, schools and
the like). Marx does not provide any detailed analysis of any of these,
which in the case of taxes is rather surprising since one of the main
focuses of his critique of political economy was David Ricardo’s
_Principles of Political Economy and Taxation_. I suspect the reason for
this neglect is that Marx intended (according to the plans laid out in
the _Grundrisse_) to write a separate book on the capitalist state and
civil society. It would be characteristic of his method to delay any
systematic consideration of a topic such as taxation until that work was
done. Since Marx never even began upon such a work it remains an empty
box in his theorising. At various points in his writings, however, the
state is invoked as an active agent and element in securing the further
circulation of capital. It guarantees, for example, the legal and
juridical basis of capitalist market institutions and governance and
takes up regulatory functions with respect to labour policies (the
length of the working day and the factory acts), money (coinage and fiat
moneys) and the institutional framework of the financial system. This
last problem preoccupied Marx no end, according to the notes that Engels
fashioned into Volume 3 of _Capital_. The state exercises considerable
influence by way of the effective demand it commands in seeking to
procure military equipment, all sorts of means of surveillance,
management and bureaucratic administration. It also engages in
productive activities particularly with respect to investments in public
goods and collective physical infrastructures such as roads, ports and
harbours, water and sewage provision. In advanced capitalist societies
states take on all manner of functions such as subsidising research and
development (in the primary instance mostly for military purposes) while
also operating as a redistributive agent by subsidising the social wage
through provision of education, health care, housing and the like to
working people. So extensive can state activities become, particularly
if it pursues a politics of nationalisation of the commanding heights of
the economy, that some analysts prefer to write out a distinctive theory
of state monopoly capitalism. This kind of capitalism works according to
different rules than those derived from the perfect competition, which
Marx, following Adam Smith, presumed in his explorations of the laws of
motion of capital. The degree of state involvement and its associated
levels of taxation depend to a large extent on the balance of class
forces. It is also affected by the ideological fight over the benefits
or disadvantages of state interventions in the circulation of capital as
well as over its geopolitical power and position within the state
system. In the wake of massive crises (such as that of the Great
Depression of the 1930s) the clamour for more effective state
intervention tends to increase. Under conditions of geopolitical threat
(whether real or imagined) the demand for an increased military presence
with associated expenditures also tends to surge. The power of the
military-industrial complex is not negligible and the circulation of
capital is clearly affected by the exercise of that power.

Whatever is taken out of distribution by taxes supports state
expenditures that affect demand for commodities. This contributes to the
realisation of values in the market. Strategies of state intervention to
prop up effective demand (as envisaged in Keynesian theory) then become
a real possibility particularly when the circulation of capital appears
to be encountering difficulties or is lacking in vigour. A typical
response to a situation in which profit rates are too low to encourage
private investment in valorisation is to construct a ‘stimulus package’
by injecting stronger effective demand into the economy by a variety of
usually state-orchestrated measures. In order to do this the state
typically borrows from bankers and financiers (and through them, from
the general public).

In other instances, however, these funds flow towards reinvestment in
capitalist forms of production directly, albeit under state ownership.
In Britain, France, Japan, etc. in the 1960s, major sectors were in
state ownership as continues to be the case in China today. While these
entities are nominally independent and autonomous relative to the
politics of state power, their orientation as public utilities organised
for the public good rather than as profit-seeking corporations changes
the way they relate to the circulation of capital. A significant part of
capital circulation passes through the state apparatus and no account of
capital in motion would be complete without incorporating some
consideration of this fact. Alas, Marx makes no attempt to integrate
this into his overall theory. He sticks instead to a perfect competition
model of how capital works and for the most part lays state
interventions to one side.

DISTRIBUTION AMONG THE VARIOUS FACTIONS OF CAPITAL

That portion of the value and surplus value that remains after labour
and the state have taken whatever their share might be, is divided among
various factions of capital. Individual capitalists receive, for reasons
we will later consider, a share of the total value and surplus value
according to the capital they advance rather than according to the
surplus value they generate. Some of the surplus value is sucked up by
property owners in the form of land and property rents or as licences
and royalties to intellectual property rights. Hence the importance of
rent-seeking in contemporary capitalism. Merchant capitalists likewise
take their share as do bankers and financiers who form the core of a
class of money capitalists who play a critical role in both facilitating
and promoting the conversion of money back into money capital. Capital
thus completes the circle and flows back into the processes of
valorisation. Each of these named agents claims a share of the surplus
value in the form of profit on industrial capital, profit on merchant’s
capital, rents on land and other forms of property right and interest on
money capital.

Each of these forms of distribution have ancient roots that precede the
rise of the form of capital circulation we are here describing. Marx in
his historical chapters clearly recognises the past importance of what
he calls these ‘antediluvian’ forms of capital. His approach to
understanding these categories and claims is rather special. He asks, in
effect, how is it that ‘industrial capitalists’, the producers of value
and surplus value in commodity form, are willing to share some of the
value and surplus value they generate once it is monetised with these
other claimants? What, in short, is the indispensable function of the
merchants, the landlords and the bankers within a mature capitalism?
This ultimately has to give way to another question. In what ways do
these other claimants organise themselves politically and economically
to shamelessly appropriate as much surplus value as they can from the
industrial capitalists way beyond what would be justified by the
performance of their indispensable function? Factional struggles within
the capitalist class are everywhere in evidence and Marx begins to
acknowledge this in his preliminary presentations on banking and
finance. But his most solid contribution comes in the way he answers the
first question, leaving us to deal with the conjunctural conditions and
power balances that are typically involved in giving any answer to the
second question.

There is, however, a tendency to look upon distribution as the passive
end-product of surplus value production. But Marx’s presentation shows
that this is not so. Finance and banking are not merely passive
recipients of their aliquot share of the produced surplus value in money
form. They are active intermediaries and agents for the circulation of
money back into surplus value production through the circulation of
interest-bearing capital. The banking system, with the central bank at
its apex, is a crucible for money creation without regard for value
creation in production. For this reason financiers and bankers are as
much drivers of the further circulation of value as they are
beneficiaries of past surplus value production. The circulation of
interest-bearing capital which demands a return based upon the property
right of ownership introduces a duality into what has so far been
conceptualised as a single stream of value in motion. Industrial
capitalists internalise this dual role: as the organisers of the
production of surplus value they engage in one set of practices, while
as the owners of capital in money form they reward themselves through
payment of interest on the money they themselves advance. Either that or
they borrow the money to start their business and pay the interest to
someone else.

This introduces into capital circulation an increasingly important
distinction between ownership and management. Stock holders demand a
return on their investment of money capital whereas management demands
its share through the active organisation of surplus value production in
commodity form. Once the circulation of interest-bearing money capital
acquires an autonomous status within the concept of capital, then the
dynamics of capital as value in motion become disaggregated. A whole
class of stock holders and investors (money capitalists) arises seeking
monetary gains from investing the money capital at their disposal. This
class hastens and tightens the conversion of mere money into money
capital. Without this movement there can be no valorisation of capital
in production, no growth and no return on money capital. At the same
time it also entails a pure monetary orientation on the part of a
powerful and influential segment of capital that can just as easily seek
a return on their money by means other than valorisation in production.
If the rate of monetary gain is to be had from speculation in land,
property and natural resource markets, or from merchant capitalist
operations, then they will invest there. If the purchase of government
debts yields more than that obtained from production then money capital
will tend to flow to these other sectors at the expense of the flow into
valorisation.

Marx recognises such possibilities. But he tends to dismiss them on the
grounds that if everyone invests in land rents or merchant capitalist
activities and no one invests in value production, then the rate of
return on the latter will soar until capital returns to what Marx
considers its rightful vital functions. At worst, Marx tends to concede
(at least in the cases of merchant capital and interest) that the rate
of profit will tend over time to equalise between industrial capital and
the other distributive forms. Even if this is so, it is still the case
that capital as value in motion loses its simple singular structure and
shatters into component streams that often move in an antagonistic
relation to each other. This is rather like what happens in the
hydrological cycle when precipitation occurs in many different forms. In
recent times, for example, capital flow has tended to diminish with
respect to value production while money capital seeks higher rates of
monetary return elsewhere such as in land and property speculation. The
effect is to exacerbate the long-run stagnation in value production that
has characterised much of the global economy since the grand disruption
of 2007–8.

The contradictory element of this is that the creation of indebtedness
from within the financial system becomes a persistent driver of further
accumulation. The frantic search for profit is supplemented by the
frantic need to redeem debts. And some of that frantic search has to
find ways to augment the valorisation of capital in production. Value
does not return to the practices of valorisation that we began by
analysing in the same form that it had when it began upon its journey.
It evolves as it goes and expands as it evolves. But its expansion now
encompasses not only the quest for surplus value but the added necessity
to redeem the debts that are piling up within the distributive network
that is required for capital circulation to function effectively.

THE DRIVING FORCES OF VALUE IN MOTION

The visualisation of capital flow proposed here is, of course, a
simplification. But it is not an unwarranted simplification. It depicts
four fundamental processes within the overall circulation process of
capital: that of valorisation where capital is produced in the form of
surplus value in production; that of realisation when value is
transformed back into the money form through the market exchange of
commodities; that of distribution of value and surplus value among
various claimants; and, finally, that of capturing some of the money
that circulates among the claimants and converting it back into money
capital from whence it continues on its way through valorisation. Each
distinctive process is in some respects independent and autonomous. But
all of them are integrally related within the circulation of value.
These distinctions within the unity of value in motion, as we shall
shortly see, have a key role to play in structuring _Capital_ as a text.
Volume 1 focuses on valorisation, Volume 2 on realisation and Volume 3
dissects the various forms of distribution.

It remains to offer a brief commentary on the driving force or forces at
work, which keep this flow of capital in motion. The most obvious
driving force rests on the fact that no rational money capitalist would
undertake all the effort and suffer all the aggravations that attach to
organising production of commodities and surplus value in the way they
do unless they ended up with more money at the end of the process of
valorisation than they had at the beginning. In short, it is the
individual profit motive that drives them. We can, of course, attribute
this to human greed but Marx for the most part refrains from viewing
this as a moral defect. It is socially necessary if we are to produce
the use values required to live. Since the origin of profit lies in
surplus value production, then the process of valorisation has a
built-in incentive to continue indefinitely on the basis of perpetual
exploitation of living labour in production. The implication, however,
is a perpetual expansion of surplus value production. The circle of
reproduction of capital becomes a spiral of perpetual growth and
expansion.

Marx by and large discounted the idea that a driving force might attach
to the processes of realisation. There is, however, no inherent reason
why not. This driving force could derive from public shifts in wants,
needs and desires for different use values. While Marx was inclined to
see the state of wants, needs and desires as ‘rational consumption’ as
defined by capital, circumstances may arise in which this is not so. For
example, when a significant segment of a population (whether workers or
bourgeois does not matter) expresses a desire to achieve a different
relation to nature, one in which the environmental degradations, habitat
losses and climate changes deriving from actually existing capitalist
practices might be rolled back, then the overall circulation process of
capital may be pushed down alternative paths. To the degree that these
wants, needs and desires are backed by an ability to pay (and here state
incentives and subsidies can clearly make a difference) so environmental
protections and renewable energies may begin to replace fossil fuels.

Marx did not consider questions of this sort, but the visualisation here
constructed, based on his thinking, is easily adapted to take such
questions into account. Furthermore, the state can become a driving
force in accumulation to the degree that it exercises powerful
influences over effective demand for military equipment, police and
surveillance technologies and a variety of instruments of social control
to say nothing of all the demands of routine administration and
governance. So strong can this influence become that some analysts have
preferred during certain historical periods to depict military
Keynesianism as the main driver of accumulation. The state has also in
practice played a very important role in fostering innovations and
technological changes. Political and social struggles around questions
of the realisation of values in fact abound but they have a rather
different social structure and meaning to the classic struggles that
occur around valorisation. This is because the basic social relation
that prevails at the moment of realisation is that between buyers and
sellers rather than between capital and labour as it is at the moment of
valorisation.

It is likewise difficult to ignore the social and political struggles
that occur within the general field of distribution. But to take these
on board requires that we go much further than Marx who confined his
analysis to the question of why these distributional forms could and
should exist within a pure form of capitalism. A more dynamic
perspective sees the rentiers, the merchants and the finance capitalists
as distinctive power blocks acting in their own interest, seeking to
appropriate as much value as they can get away with. The big question
that then follows is what incentives exist for merchants, financiers and
landlords to reinvest in valorisation when they are doing very well for
themselves by just sitting back and living on their ill-gotten gains at
the expense of those who take the trouble to engage in production? Why
would anyone bother with production if they could live on land rents?

It is here that the distinctive form taken by the circulation of
interest-bearing capital plays a critical role. Through the creation of
indebtedness, which includes by the way the creation of money by the
banks independent entirely of value production, the field of
distribution internalises a tremendous incentive to perpetuate
circulation through valorisation. It is not impossible to say that the
incentive to redeem debts plays just as important a role in impelling
future value production as the search for profit. Debts are claims upon
future value production and, as such, foreclose upon the future of
valorisation. Failure to redeem debts initiates the mother of all crises
to the system of capital flow.

Looking then at the overall circulation process, there are multiple
incentives to keep the system intact and in motion and no shortage of
driving forces to keep value in motion. That there might also be
multiple threats and difficulties in perpetuating value in motion is
also very much in evidence. This is, however, a question we will take up
later.


2 _Capital_, the book

The first condition of accumulation is that the capitalist must have
contrived to sell his commodities, and to reconvert into capital the
greater part of the money received from their sale. In the following
pages (of Volume 1 of _Capital_), we shall assume that capital passes
through its process of circulation in the normal way. The detailed
analysis of this process will be found in Volume 2 … The capitalist who
produces surplus value … is by no means its ultimate proprietor. He has
to share it afterwards with capitalists who fulfil other functions in
social reproduction taken as a whole, with the owner of the land, and
with yet other people. Surplus value is therefore split up into various
parts. Its fragments fall to various categories of person, and take on
various mutually independent forms, such as profit, interest, gains made
through trade, ground rent, etc. We shall be able to deal with these
modified forms of surplus value only in Volume 3 … On the one hand,
then, we assume here that the capitalist sells the commodities he has
produced at their value … On the other hand we treat the capitalist
producer as the owner of the entire surplus value or, perhaps, better,
as the representative of all those who will share the booty with him …

_Capital_, Volume 1, 709–10

If the map of the circulation of capital as a whole is a reasonable
representation of how Marx conceives of the motion of capital as value,
then where are the three volumes of _Capital_ located on that map?

VOLUME 1

Once we get beyond the first three introductory chapters, Volume 1
focuses almost exclusively on the process of valorisation. It takes us
from the moment when money becomes money capital up until the moment
value is realised in its money form in the market. The flow of wages to
buy the commodities needed to reproduce labour power along with the flow
of profit to nourish reinvestment are the only links in the chain
external to the movement from money to commodities, to production, to
commodities and back to the money form again. Everything else within the
overall circulation process is considered to operate in ‘the normal
way’, by which I think Marx means in a trouble-free way. The assumption
that all commodities exchange at their value means that there are no
problems of realisation of value as money in the market place. The
assumption that the split up of the surplus value into distributional
shares does not matter (other than that between wages and profit in
general) avoids all manner of complications. Perhaps the most
far-reaching and significant of Marx’s assumptions concerns the
unchallenged power of private property rights in both production and
exchange. It is in this context that he also assumes perfect competition
in the market place.¹ He accepts Adam Smith’s theory of ‘the hidden
hand’ although he insists that the hidden hand is that of labour not
that of capital. Monopoly power is assumed away. Why he adopted these
assumptions is an interesting question. My guess is that Marx’s primary
intent in _Capital_ is to deconstruct the utopian vision of free market
capitalism that the political economists of the time were promoting. He
wishes to show how market freedoms do not produce a result that is
beneficial for all, as Smith and others supposed, but that it would
produce a dystopia of misery for the masses and immense wealth for the
propertied capitalist class.

Having cleared the decks by making these assumptions, Marx is free to
examine valorisation in all of its intricacies and detail. He examines
the forms of exploitation of living labour in production under
conditions of equality in free market exchange. Capitalists pay
labourers the value of their labour power and then use them to produce
more value than they themselves receive from selling their labour power
for a certain block of time. The basis of surplus value production and
appropriation lies in the exploitation of living labour power in the
process of production but not, please note, in the market. Marx then
elaborates on the distinction between absolute and relative surplus
value, the former resting upon the extension of the working day beyond
that required to reproduce the equivalent value of labour power. The
theory of relative surplus value explains the inherent technological and
organisational dynamism of a capitalist mode of production organised on
the basis of inter-capitalist competition. Increased productivity
reduces the value of the commodities needed to reproduce the labourer.
This means the value of labour power declines (assuming a constant
material standard of living), leaving more surplus value for the
capitalist.

Competition beween capitalists for market share transforms the circle of
simple reproduction into the spiral form of perpetual accumulation for
accumulation’s sake. Finally, Marx builds two dynamic models of what he
calls ‘the general law of capitalist accumulation’, the first based on
the assumption of a constant technology while the second incorporates
technological change. The consequences for labour are a major focus
throughout. In the second model we see why capital cannot escape the
imperative (already established in earlier chapters) to increasingly
impoverish the labourer, both within and without the production process.
This culminates in the production of an industrial reserve army of
unemployed and underemployed labourers that anchors the disempowerment
of the labourer. At the same time it confirms capital’s capacity to
maximise surplus value extraction through the increasing exploitation of
living labour. The conclusion runs as follows:

within the capitalist system all methods for raising the social
productivity of labour are put into effect at the cost of the individual
worker … all means of the development of production undergo a
dialectical inversion so that they become means of domination and
exploitation of the producers; they distort the worker into a fragment
of a man, they degrade him to the level of an appendage of a machine,
they destroy the actual content of his labour by turning it into
torment; they alienate … from him the intellectual potentialities of the
labour process in the same proportion as science is incorporated in it
as an independent power; they deform the conditions under which he
works, subject him during the labour process to a despotism more hateful
for its meanness; they transform his life-time into working-time and
drag his wife and child beneath the wheels of the juggernaut of capital.
But all methods for the production of surplus value are at the same time
methods of accumulation, and every extension of accumulation becomes,
conversely, a means for the development of these methods. It follows
therefore that in proportion as capital accumulates, the situation of
the worker, be his payment high or low, must grow worse. Finally the law
which always holds the relative surplus population or industrial reserve
army in equilibrium with the extent and energy of accumulation rivets
the worker to capital more firmly than the wedges of Hephaestus held
Prometheus to the rock. It makes the accumulation of misery a necessary
condition, corresponding to the accumulation of wealth. Accumulation of
wealth at one pole is, therefore, at the same time accumulation of
misery, the torment of labour, slavery, ignorance, brutalisation and
moral degradation at the opposite pole, i.e. on the side of the class
that produces its own product as capital.²

Two things can be said about this conclusion. First, Marx here exposes
the dystopian consequences of free market capitalism. There is no doubt
that the history of capitalism and the working classes from its origins
in industrialising Britain to the present day in, say, the contemporary
factories of Bangladesh or Shenzhen, contains abundant evidence of the
repeated recreation of the conditions that Marx describes, while the
emphasis upon free market policies in the advanced capitalist countries
over the last forty years has produced ever-greater levels of class
inequality. But there is also abundant evidence to say that this is not
the whole story, that there have also been redemptive elements at work
within the dynamics of capital that point in a different direction. For
example, life expectancy of workers has risen not fallen in many parts
of the world. The lifestyle of the average worker in at least some parts
of the world is not all doom and gloom. In some places it even seems to
glow seductively in a world of compensatory consumerism.

Marx’s conclusion to Volume 1 is entirely contingent upon the
assumptions to which he appeals. As in any model-building exercise,
change the assumptions and you change the results. Volume 1 offers a
perspective on the totality from the standpoint of valorisation. As such
it is invaluable. But it is partial.

VOLUME 2

Marx intended Volume 2 to be a study of capital circulation that occurs
during and after capital enters the market. It takes up the story of
value in motion where Volume 1 leaves off. The metamorphosis of value
from commodity to money form is a crucial moment. It is so because the
realisation of value and surplus value in money form is the moment when
the actual achievement of value creation can be measured and recorded.
Only here do we have tangible material proof that surplus value has been
produced.

Volume 2 proposes a perspective on the overall circulation of capital
from the standpoint of the realisation of value and its subsequent
circulation. Marx pursues this aim under certain assumptions. First, he
assumes a constant technology throughout. He ignores entirely the
findings of his intensive investigations into technological change in
Volume 1. ‘We shall therefore assume here, both that commodities are
sold at their values, and that the circumstances in which this takes
place do not change. We shall also ignore any changes of value that may
occur in the course of the cyclical process.’³ To proceed as if changing
value productivity does not matter seems unreasonably unrealistic. While
he starts out saying he will assume this as a matter of convenience, he
later asserts that ‘as far as revolutions in value are concerned they
change nothing’,⁴ Secondly, he ignores the facts of distribution which,
with the exception of wages and aggregate profits (as in Volume 1), are
banished to Volume 3. This last assumption is particularly annoying
since many times in Volume 2 he notes that problems of coordinating
different turnover times and fixed capital investments have a ready
solution by resort to the credit system. But he refuses to take up such
solutions in Volume 2 because he has yet to develop his theory of
interest and finance.⁵ Oddest of all, given his interest in questions of
realisation of value, is the assumption that all commodities trade at
their value. This is what he assumed in Volume 1 so it is surprising to
see this assumption resurrected here. In Volume 2, however, it plays a
very different role. He starts from the assumption that everything is in
equilibrium and works backwards from that to define what would have to
happen for things to end up that way. His innovative models of the
reproduction schemas at the end of Volume 2 are generally seen as
precursors to the economic modelling that more than a half a century
later became the foundation of macroeconomics. They show mathematically
the proportionalities that would have to hold between the production of
wage goods for the workers and of investment goods and luxuries for the
capitalists if the equilibrium between demand and supply is to be
sustained.

This significant and in some respects magnificent achievement should
not, however, mask the limitations imposed by the assumptions upon which
it rests. Interestingly, a modicum of technological change is introduced
into these models but only that which would be necessary to achieve
balanced growth. Subsequent investigations have shown that there is
indeed a path of technological evolution that could ensure balanced
growth within these reproduction schemas, but there is no way that the
competitive processes underpinning the production of relative surplus
value as identified in Volume 1 could be restricted to that path. Hence
crises of disproportionality are likely if not inevitable.

The limiting assumptions are not the only problem to be confronted in
reading Volume 2. Far more bothersome is the incompleteness of the
analysis. The materials that Engels fashioned into Volume 2 of _Capital_
are diffuse and in many instances tentative thoughts rather than
finished products. They do not constitute a definitive analysis of
capital circulation organised from the perspective of realisation and
transformation into the money form. It, therefore, becomes necessary to
reconstruct some of Marx’s ideas through a study of other relevant
writings. The _Grundrisse_, for example, is full of tentative ideas that
need to be collated with those in Volume 2. But tentative ideas plus
tentative ideas do not necessarily produce a definitive account. At best
we have to guess what might have been said had the volume been
completed. It is easier to figure out what happens when we drop Marx’s
assumptions than it is to guess at what of substance is missing from his
account.

Volume 2 begins with a disaggregation of capital circulation as a whole
into three circuits of production, commodity and money capital, albeit
unified within the circuit of what Marx calls ‘industrial capital’.
Individual industrial capitalists need to play the three sometimes
conflictual roles of producer, merchant and money manager. This
prefigures the fragmentation of capital into different factions
(producers, merchants and financiers in particular) in Volume 3. The
main thrust of Marx’s analysis is to show that the conditions for the
realisation of value in money form depend upon the successful passage of
capital through the moments of valorisation and commodity production.
The same is true for the reproduction of productive capital and the
reproduction of commodity capital. They are all of them interdependent
and interlinked, but also autonomous forms. The industrial capitalist
has to take care of all three moments in the circulation process. While
Marx does not say this, there are plenty of examples of capitalists who
are geniuses at organ-ising production but fail miserably when it comes
to understanding the money or marketing side of things.

The first four chapters emphasise the necessity for continuous flow of
capital through valorisation in production and realisation in the market
followed by the reinvestment of money capital. The penchant of capital
to make technological and organisational revolutions here becomes a
disruptive force. This may be the reason Marx put innovations to one
side and assumed a constant technology. It would have been difficult if
not impossible to study the conditions of continuity of production and
circulation when technological changes are exercising such a powerful
and unpredictable disruptive force on that continuity. The overall
effect of Marx’s analysis is to disaggregate the flow of capital into
three different streams (analogous to the different forms of
precipitation in the hydrological cycle) with rather different
characteristics. For example, as a general rule money is more
geographically mobile than commodities and both are much more
geographically mobile than production. This has important implications
for understanding the role of financialisation in globalisation. Marx
refers to money as the ‘butterfly’ form of capital (it flits around with
ease and lands wherever it wants). We can extend the metaphor to think
of the commodity as the caterpillar form and production as the
chrysalis.

The rest of Volume 2 is concerned with circulation and realisation in
the market. It pays close attention to the problems that arise from
differential turnover times and the circulation of fixed capital. In so
doing it frequently invokes the necessity for a credit system but puts
off any examination of it until Volume 3. We are here introduced to
capital with different working periods (the time it takes to make a
discrete commodity like a car versus a pair of shoes), different
circulation times (the average time a product remains on the market
before being sold) and an overall measure of average turnover time of
the capital deployed. Inter-capitalist competition puts considerable
emphasis upon speed-up and the acceleration of turnover times and a lot
of innovation is directed towards this end. Overall profits are jacked
up by faster turnover times. The penchant for speed-up spills over from
the realms of production and marketing to fundamentally transforming the
rhythms of daily life. Speed-up in production at some point requires
speed-up in consumption (hence the importance of fashion and planned
obsolescence). At the same time, greater reliance on fixed capital
investments to promote rising productivity slows down the turnover time
of some investments. This is particularly true for investments in the
built environment. A part of the turnover time of capital slows down in
fixed capital and infrastructure form in order to facilitate speed-up in
the motion of the rest. Here too the release of the hoarded money needed
to build, maintain and replace long-lived and large fixed capital
investments by resort to the credit system becomes critical. Discussion
of this is put off until Volume 3.

It is hard to identify any unifying conclusion to Volume 2. If there is
one idea that dominates from the substantive investigations it would be
that of the powerful incentive towards speed-up and perpetual
acceleration in the circulation of capital. But there is also a notable
contrast to the conclusion of Volume 1:

Contradiction in the capitalist mode of production. The workers are
important for the market as buyers of commodities. But as sellers of
their commodity – labour power – capitalist society has the tendency to
restrict them to their minimum price. Further contradiction: the periods
in which capitalist production exerts all its forces regularly show
themselves to be periods of over-production; because the limit to the
application of the productive powers is not simply the production of
value, but also its realization. However the sale of commodities, the
realization of commodity capital, and thus of surplus-value as well, is
restricted not by the consumer needs of society in general, but by the
consumer needs of a society in which the great majority are always poor
and must always remain poor.⁶

The effective demand of the working classes is here implicated in
keeping the market in balance and that effective demand is perpetually
under threat given the analysis of Volume 1. It is difficult to
introduce this question into Marxist theorising because this was one of
Keynes’s concerns also and in talking about it one immediately risks the
accusation of importing Keynesianism into Marxism when, of course, the
influence is the other way round. But here we have an explanation of why
the fate of the working classes is to get lost in compensatory
consumerism because that is how capital keeps its market intact. But as
in the case of Volume 1, this tentative conclusion is contingent on the
assumptions. But however one parses it, the findings in Volume 2 on this
matter contradict those of Volume 1. The pressure to reduce wages that
animates Volume 1 undercuts the capacity of the workers’ effective
demand to stabilise the economy in Volume 2. This signals a point of
contradiction and instability within the circulation of value in motion.
The weakening of the relative power of workers’ effective demand over
the past forty years of neoliberalism has contributed to the secular
stagnation now being experienced in many parts of the capitalist world.

VOLUME 3

The main focus of Volume 3 is distribution. Engels also inserted some
other important materials, such as chapters on competition and on the
critique of the so-called ‘trinity formula’ of land, labour and capital,
because they were interesting in their own right. But most of the text
is given over to an analysis of the different forms of distribution and
their consequences. In so doing it assumes away the questions of
valorisation and realisation analysed in the other two volumes. The
dynamics of technological and organisational change that underpin
relative surplus value and contribute to the formation of the industrial
reserve army are put to one side. Marx’s technique in this volume, as is
the case with the two others, is to take one phase of the circulation of
value and examine it in detail while holding all the other features of
the circulation process constant. As the lead quote to this chapter
shows, Marx was quite explicit about doing this. Bearing this in mind,
let us consider the main forms in which value and surplus value are
distributed among the various claimants, other than the wages and taxes
that we have already considered.

_a) The distribution of value among individual capitalists_

Individual capitalists are compelled by market forces to compete to
maximise their profit. As a result, the rate of profit tends to
equal-ise. This produces a curious distributive effect. The total
aggregate surplus value created is distributed among individual
capitalists not according to the surplus value they produce but
according to the capital they advance. Marx amusedly refers to this as
‘capitalist communism’ since the redistribution of the surplus value
among individual capitalists is based on the principle ‘from each
capitalist according to the labour they employ and to each capitalist
according to the capital they advance’.⁷ The technical reasons why this
occurs are too complicated to detain us here. Significant consequences
follow. The redistribution of surplus value favours capital-intensive
industries which employ fewer labourers and penalises labour-intensive
industries where much surplus value is produced. In the absence of any
countervailing tendencies, the basis for surplus value production (the
employment of labourers) tends to diminish.

If the rate of surplus value extraction per labourer and the total
labour force remains constant, then the total amount of surplus value
available for distribution falls. The profit rate tends to fall along
with it. The result is a critical contradiction within the laws of
motion of capital. Individual capitalists pursuing their own interests
under conditions of perfect competition tend to produce a result that
threatens the reproduction of the capitalist class. This happens not
because individual capitalists are stupid, greedy or mad, but because
they are driven by the hidden hand of the market to pursue the
maximisation of profit rather than the maximisation of surplus value
production. In other words, the laws of distribution of surplus value
among individual capitalists are antagonistic to the laws of production
of surplus value. A potential for crises rests on this antagonism.

Perhaps even more important for Marx is the way in which the
equalisation of the rate of profit ‘completely obscures and mystifies
the real origin of surplus value’.⁸ The ‘inner core’ of what capital is
about becomes unrecognisable not only to the capitalists themselves but
to the economists who seek to represent it. In competition, ‘everything
appears upside down. The finished configuration of economic relations,
as these are visible on the surface, in their actual existence, and
therefore in the notions with which the bearers and agents of these
relations seek to gain an understanding of them, is very different from
the configuration of their inner core, which is essential but concealed,
and the concept corresponding to it.’⁹ It is, of course, the hidden and
mysterious ‘inner core’ that is the focus of Marx’s attention.

_b) Industrial capitalists as a class fraction_

Those capitalists who hire labour for the express purpose of creating
surplus value in commodity form should be in a privileged position to
capture the surplus value they produce for themselves. But the
equalisation of the rate of profit redistributes the surplus value
unequally among them according to the capital they advance and the
taxmen constantly hound them to get their pound of flesh. Such
capitalists are also obliged to pass on some of the value and surplus
value in the form of profit for merchants, rent for land and property
owners and interest for the bankers and financiers. Far from being
privileged appropriators of the surplus value, ‘industrial capitalists’
as Marx calls them often end up taking whatever is left over after
everyone else’s claim has been satisfied.

_c) Merchant capitalists_

Capital is lost and suffers devaluation if it is not continuously in
motion. The time taken to get the product to market and achieve a sale
is lost time and time is money. For this reason industrial capitalists
often prefer to pass the commodity on immediately to merchants. The
merchant capitalist organises sales in an efficient way and at a low
cost (chronically exploiting labour power in the process). The creation
of warehouses, department stores and delivery services (now increasingly
online) produces economies of scale in marketing. Merchant capitalists
are also adept at marketing strategies and techniques of persuasion
(e.g. advertising) that affect the state of wants, needs and desires in
a population. For all of these reasons industrial producers have a
strong incentive to pass on their commodities to merchants at a discount
of the full value prior to the moment of realisation. In Marx’s scheme
of things this discount is the source of merchant profit. Merchants by
and large create no value (there are some important exceptions such as
transport to market). They mainly appropriate a part of the value
already produced by industrial capital in return for rendering the
realisation and monetisation of value more efficient, faster and more
secure.

_d) Landlords and rent_

Land is a primary means of production and the systematic exclusion of
labour from access to the land by its enclosure and privatisation is
vital for the reproduction of wage labour. Only then is it possible to
be assured that workers have to be wage labourers in order to live. When
the frontier in the United States was open, labour scarcities along the
industrial East Coast forced wages up, except when the inflow of
immigrants was sufficient to force them back down again. The implication
is that uncultivated land becomes a commodity that can be traded at a
price even though it has no value, since no labour has yet been applied
to its production. This raises the question of how to understand and
analyse the circulation of capital in land markets.

Competition between capitalist producers on the land encounters
differential advantages due to superior fertility and/or superior
location relative to other forms of economic activity. These differences
(which Marx studies through detailed investigations of what he calls
‘differential rents’) may be attributed in the first instance to nature,
but over time they are increasingly produced through investments in land
and property improvements (culminating, of course, in city building).
Just as important are revolutions in space relations through investment
and innovations in transport and communications. Locational advantages
are relative not absolute. Remote lands which were commercially
worthless suddenly become valuable because of the construction of a
railway or a highway system.

Land and property owners who extract rent from these differential
advantages do a signal service to capital in general: they equalise the
conditions for perfect competition between industrial (in this case
agricultural) capitalists working in or on the land. If industrial
producer X earned a much higher rate of profit on a permanent basis than
producer Y by virtue of occupying a superior location or land of higher
fertility, then the driving force of inter-capitalist competition would
be permanently blunted and the laws of motion of capital permanently
impaired. Capital in effect makes a side payment to landlords for
excluding labour from the land and smoothing the path to perfect
competition across the uneven spaces of a national and even the world
market.

Marx is mainly interested in the distinctively capitalist form of landed
property and rent. In his historical writings he fully recognises,
however, that land ownership and rent are social forms representing
social relations of quite different sorts in a variety of pre-capitalist
situations. The eradication of, for example, feudal residuals is even
now by no means complete even after many years of capitalist endeavour.
In Britain, the Church, the Crown and a few aristocratic families still
own vast amounts of land. What Marx has shown, however, is that
capitalism cannot possibly function without its own distinctive form of
land rent. What he did not anticipate was that new forms of capitalist
rent might also evolve within the evolutionary structures of capitalism
and that rent-seeking might go well beyond that which he found both
necessary and functional as well as politically tolerable for a mature
form of capitalist development. Rent-seeking through speculation in land
markets and resource endowments (like oil wells) is bad enough. But what
are we to make of rent-seeking through ownership of intellectual
property rights? This is an example of an extension that Marx did not
anticipate, but with which we contemporary analysts have to contend. In
the same way that merchants as a factional power block frequently go
well beyond the remit that Marx allowed them as necessary for the proper
functioning of capital, so the rentiers have a penchant for doing the
same in land, property and asset markets of all sorts.

_e) Banking, financial institutions_

This is by far the most complicated and problematic distributional
category. How it gets represented is of great import for understanding
the overall circulation of capital. In recent times much attention has
been paid to it because of the seemingly determinant influence of
financialisation over capital flows. Marx wrote voluminously about it,
without coming to a firm determination as to how to integrate many of
the activities he encountered (like financial speculation and the
circulation of interest-bearing capital) into the concept of capital as
value in motion. What he did uncover poses some serious problems for his
general theory. We will pay close attention to them as we proceed.

There are many reasons why industrial capitalists (and others) are
beholden to banking and finance. Coordinating the inputs and outputs of
a particular form of commodity production means negotiating between
radically different turnover times in the production of inputs and
outputs. The cotton industry needs a daily supply of cotton but the
cotton crop comes in once a year (though the advantage of a world market
with many suppliers in different locations with different harvest times
helps modify that problem). Cotton producers get paid for their crop
once a year but need cash not only to produce but also to live on a
daily basis for the whole of the year. Without a bank to turn to, the
cotton producer would have to hoard the cash from the sale and take it
out from under the mattress on a daily basis until the next sale comes
around. Meanwhile, someone has to hoard the cotton as a commodity to
release to the mills for production on a daily basis. For Marx, all that
hoarded value in money or commodity form is dead and devalued capital.
It sits there unused and unproductive for most of the year.

This problem becomes even more significant when we consider the
circulation of fixed capital. A machine costs a lot up-front but lasts
for several years. The initial value of the machine can be recuperated
through annual depreciation payments. But at the end of its lifetime,
the machine needs to be replaced. The capitalist must have saved
(hoarded) enough money each year to buy a replacement. The result is a
vast trove of dead and devalued capital sitting idle in the safes of the
capitalists. The security of these hoards poses a problem since robbers
are everywhere. The capitalist banking and credit system addresses these
problems. Capitalists can safely (they hope) place their hoarded surplus
funds in a bank in return for interest and the bank can then lend them
out at a (slightly) higher rate of interest to someone else. Either that
or industrial capitalists can borrow the money up-front to buy the
machine and pay off the loan out of annual depreciations. In either
case, dead and devalued capital is resuscitated for active circulation.
Plainly, as capital becomes more complicated with respect to
intersecting value chains and divisions of labour and relies more on
large quantities of fixed capital (to say nothing of increasing demands
for infrastructural provision and city building), so the demand for a
more sophisticated credit and financial system grows. Either that or the
whole system of capital circulation would gum up with more and more
capital hoarded to deal with these temporal problems.

In the same way that rent covers a diversity of problems in the
geographical and spatial dimensions to capitalist activities, so the
credit system deals with the multiple temporalities involved in the
organisation of productive activities. The credit system takes a
seemingly infinite variety of temporalities at work in the daily
organisation of capitalist production and reduces them to one singular
metric: the rate of interest over time. To be sure, that metric is
variable depending on the conditions of supply and demand for money not
only as capital but for anything else (including private consumption and
loans to landlords). The credit system introduces into capitalism wholly
new dimensions to capital flow. In the same way that land rent rests on
the fiction that land is a commodity that can have a price but no value,
so also the credit system rests on the fiction that money is a commodity
that has a price. The effect is to suggest that money, the
representative or expression of value, has a value, which is clearly
ridiculous. But money does have a price which is interest.

Banking and finance play multiple roles. They suck up idle pockets of
money wherever they may be and convert that money into money capital by
lending it to anyone interested in pursuing profitable investment
opportunities. As intermediaries, banks and financial institutions
operate as ‘the common capital of the capitalist class’.¹⁰ They play a
key role in accelerating the equalisation of the rate of profit,
extracting funds from those working in low profit sectors of the economy
and redirecting them to wherever the rate of profit is higher. They also
hold in their hands a certain power of money creation independent of any
increase in value output. The independence and autonomy of the financial
system along with its inherent powers of money creation may be subsumed
within the overall circulation process of capital as value in motion,
but not without having some major impacts.

Banks and financial institutions work with money as a commodity and not
with value production. They lend to wherever the money profit rate is
higher and that is not necessarily in productive activity: if profits
can be made from speculation in land then the banks will lend for land
and property purchases (as they did wholesale from 2001 to 2007 in the
United States). ‘The fetish character of capital and the representation
of this capital fetish is here complete.’¹¹ What Marx means by this is
that the financial system necessarily responds to money and profit
signals within the different fields of distribution that can divert
capitalist activity away from value creation and into unproductive
channels. Banks can lend to other banks, to land and property companies,
to merchant capitalists as well as to consumers (whether working class
or bourgeois does not matter) and as well as to the state (the national
debt is huge).

The result is a world of what Marx calls ‘fictitious capital’
circulation.¹² Banks leverage their deposits to lend out a multiple of
the assets they actually possess. Their loans can be three times or in
periods of ‘irrational exuberance’ as much as thirty times the assets
they have on deposit. This is money creation over and beyond that needed
to cover current value production and realisation. This money creation
takes the form of debt and debts are a claim on future value production.
An accumulation of debts is either redeemed by future value production
or devalued in the course of a crisis. All capitalist production is
speculative, of course, but in the financial system that characteristic
is heightened into a supreme fetish. The financier, says Marx, has the
‘nicely mixed character of swindler and prophet’.¹³ Fictitious capital
may or may not be realised through valorisation and realisation at some
later date. At the apex of the world’s financial and monetary system sit
the central banks armed with seemingly infinite powers of money creation
no matter what the state of value production. How does this fit with the
theory of capital circulation and accumulation and with the requirements
of valorisation and realisation?

Credit and debt have innumerable pre-capitalist forms but Marx is
interested, as he is with respect to both the merchants and the
landlords, in the distinctive form that credit instruments take in the
circulation of capital. The rise of capitalism revolutionised what debt
and credit were about (a revolution that David Graeber fails to notice
in his history of debt¹⁴). In Marx’s day this distinctive form was both
growing and changing rapidly. Joint stock companies and new instruments
of credit were in the process of formation. In our own times,
innovations in the field of banking and finance have taken matters to
yet another level.

To view distribution as a passive end-point to the circulation process
is, we earlier argued, an egregious error. Distribution in the money
form constitutes a distinctive transitional phase in the motion of
capital. But how does this relate to valorisation and realisation? It is
hard to come to a firm answer to that question but one of Marx’s
findings does provide an important clue as to how we might proceed
towards at least a tentative conclusion.

_f) The circulation of interest-bearing capital_

Volume 3 does in fact recognise a framework for understanding how money
might be ploughed back into the circle of valorisation and realisation.
The autonomous power of credit creation that lies within the banking and
financial system (with the central banks at its apex) unleashes a flow
of interest-bearing capital into circulation. There is no necessity that
impels that interest-bearing capital to flow into valorisation. It has
multiple other opportunities varying from consumer credit to loans to
merchant capitalists, to landlords and property speculators, to the
state to fight wars or even to foreign powers. The circulation of
interest-bearing capital claims its share of the surplus value on the
basis not of its contribution to active production but as a pure
property right. This right is conferred by the ownership of money as a
commodity, whose use value is that it can be used to make more money.

A new dimension is here introduced into the picture of circulation. This
was prefigured in Volume 2 where Marx looks at the circulation of money
capital as a distinctive form. When industrial capitalists realise value
as money, they come into possession of a commodity which has interest as
its price. Capitalists here have a choice. They can invest in further
production of value or they can put the money on the money market to
earn interest. To stay in business, industrial capitalists must earn
more than the going rate of interest. Otherwise all the aggravation and
effort that goes into organising production does not make economic
sense. The flow of capital through the hands of industrial capitalists
in effect divides into two paths: the capitalist as a money holder
receives interest on the money deployed while as a producer the
capitalist profits from the exploitation of labour in production. The
capitalist ‘has the choice between lending his capital out as
interest-bearing capital or valorising it himself as productive
capital’.¹⁵ Industrial capitalists can borrow the money they need to
start up and pay interest on it while looking to retain the rest of the
profit for themselves. Marx, in an aside, regards this as a singular
virtue of capitalist finance for sustaining the power and legitimacy of
the bourgeois capitalist class. It offsets the power of inherited wealth
and allows pushy entrepreneurs and upstarts the possibility of breaking
open the class barriers that would otherwise stand in their way. The
political and psychological strength of the capitalist class is
reinforced by incorporating these new elements into the dominant
classes.

This dual role produces, Marx goes on to note, a distinction between
ownership and management. Stock holders demand a return on their
investment of money capital whereas management claims its share through
the active organisation of production. A class of stock holders and
investors (money capitalists) seeks monetary gains from investing the
money capital at their disposal. This class hastens and tightens the
conversion of mere money into money capital. Even more active is the
fictitious capital created within the banking system that is lent out as
circulating interest-bearing capital.¹⁶

Capital here shatters into component streams that often move in an
antagonistic relation to each other. In recent times, for example,
capital flow has tended to diminish with respect to value production
while money capital seeks high rates of monetary return elsewhere. The
effect has been to exacerbate the long-run stagnation in value
production that has characterised most of the global economy since the
grand disruption of 2007–8.

Marx could not have anticipated the contemporary situation in which a
few powerful banks judged too big to fail, invest irresponsibly under
conditions of moral hazard created by a state that reassures them that
taxpayers will cover their losses if they fail. The circulation of
interest-bearing capital puts immense pressure on both valorisation and
realisation. It suffuses and can in some instances corrupt the whole
system of capital as in motion. There are, however, good reasons why
Marx depicts the circulation of interest-bearing capital as representing
the interests of the whole capitalist class. To begin with it reduces an
immense variety of temporalities to a single yardstick of the rate of
interest. It introduces a fluidity into valorisation and realisation
that would otherwise be lacking. Lending to consumers props up effective
demand that stimulates realisation. In housing markets, for example,
financiers fund developers to produce housing while the same financiers
lend to consumers to realise housing values in the market. The
circulation of interest-bearing capital bridges the contradictory unity
of valorisation and realisation to harmonise both. Marx clearly
recognises this distinction. Loans to facilitate valorisation (to
industrial capitalists to set up production) are quite different from
loans concerned to facilitate realisation (such as the discounting of
bills of exchange that was common in Marx’s time) even though they are
clearly related to each other.

But this carries with it a danger. The word foreclosure here takes on a
convenient double meaning. If consumers cannot pay the mortgage then
they lose their house to foreclosure but if they do pay it then their
future is in many respects foreclosed upon because they are condemned to
debt peonage for thirty years. Of course, they are free to sell out at
any point. But if house prices decline then they may find themselves
‘under water’, owing more on the house than it is currently worth. And
if they sell out to retire their debt then they still have to find a
place to live.

This is, it seems to me, a fitting conclusion to this aspect of capital
circulation through financial markets. There is obviously much more to
say and much more research that is needed, but the critical point to
accept is the active roles that the different forms of distribution play
in promoting the further circulation of capital. In this, the financial
aspect is of paramount importance because it deals directly in money
capital, credit and the fictitious forms of capital created within the
financial system. This becomes one of the most persistent drivers of
further accumulation through the imperative it imposes to redeem the
debt through expanded value production. The frantic search for profit is
supplemented by the frantic need to redeem debts. Preferably
valorisation will realise both goals simultaneously. The visualisation
of capital as value in motion has to be adjusted and modified
accordingly.

THE TOTALITY OF CAPITAL

On several occasions Marx mentions his ambition to depict capital as a
totality. The map of capital flows we have here constructed provides a
simplified way to visualise what this totality might look like. Each
volume of _Capital_ provides us with a definite perspective on the
totality viewed from a particular standpoint. It is rather like taking
videos of what is happening in a square (Tahrir or Taksim, for example)
from three different windows. Each video will tell its own story and
will be true to its own standpoint, but the totality of what is going on
in the square is best captured by looking at all three videos taken
together. In the reading of _Capital_ there is a strong predilection for
favouring the standpoint of valorisation as articulated in Volume 1 over
those of realisation and distribution as analysed and described in the
other two volumes. This biased emphasis leads, I claim, to serious
error. The point of considering capital as a totality is precisely to
recognise how the different phases presuppose and prefigure the others.
While each phase is autonomous and independent all phases are subsumed
within the movement of the totality. My language here is that which Marx
uses explicitly in his characterisation of finance capital and the
movement of its interest-bearing offshoot.

The different moments within the circulation process of capital are
loosely coupled and correlated rather than tightly bound together in a
functional embrace. ‘This organic system itself, as a totality, has its
presuppositions, and its development to its totality consists precisely
in subordinating all elements of society to itself, or in creating out
of it the organisms which it still lacks. This is historically how it
becomes a totality. The process of becoming this totality forms a moment
of its process, of its development.’¹⁷ Or, as he puts it elsewhere:

The conclusion we reach is not that production distribution, exchange
and consumption are identical, but that they all form the members of a
totality, distinctions within a unity. Production predominates not only
of itself, in the antithetical definition of production, but over the
other moments as well. The process always returns to production to begin
anew. That exchange and consumption cannot predominate is self-evident.
Likewise, distribution as distribution of products; while as
distribution of the agents of production it is itself a moment of
production. A definite production thus determines a definite
consumption, distribution and exchange as well as definite relations
between these different moments. Admittedly, however, in its one-sided
form, production is determined by the other moments. For example, if the
market, i.e. the sphere of exchange, expands, then production grows in
quantity and the divisions between the different branches become deeper.
A change in distribution changes production, e.g. concentration of
capital, different distributions of the population between town and
country, etc. Finally, the needs of consumption determine production.
Mutual interaction takes place between the different moments. This is
the case with every organic whole.¹⁸

The totality here is not that of a single organism such as the human
body. It is an ecosystemic totality with multiple competing or
collaborative species of activity, with an evolutionary history open to
invasions, new divisions of labour and new technologies, a system in
which some species and sub-systems die out while others form and
flourish, at the same time as the flows of energy create dynamic changes
pointing to all manner of evolutionary possibilities. Marx was fond of
scientific analogies and metaphors but the organic and evolutionary
analogies take pride of place. As he notes in the Preface to the first
edition of Volume 1 of _Capital_, his ‘standpoint’ is one ‘from which
the development of the economic formation of society is viewed as a
process of natural history’.¹⁹ A great admirer of Darwin, Marx seeks to
do for the social and historical sciences what Darwin did in promoting
his theory of evolution in the natural sciences.

To dissect this organic totality fully would require at the very minimum
a fusion of the perspectives of the three volumes of _Capital_ into a
holistic theory. Marx never tried to do this. The various outlines for
his research project sketched out in the _Grundrisse_ indicate that
other volumes on topics such as competition, the state (and presumably
taxes), the world market and crises would also be needed to complete his
project.²⁰ He came nowhere near realising that aim. He did, however,
acknowledge the complicated ways in which intersecting and cross-cutting
instabilities within the organic ecosystem that constitutes capital were
likely to produce crises. ‘The contradictions existing in bourgeois
production,’ he wrote, ‘are reconciled by a process of adjustment,
which, at the same time, however, manifests itself as crises_, violent
fusion of disconnected factors operating independently of one another
yet correlated_.’²¹

A NOTE ON POLITICAL RELEVANCY

I am bound to be asked at some point as to the political relevancy of
this visualisation. My answer is that it helps situate issues and
proposals in the context of an understanding of capital circulation and
in so doing allows an evaluation of the likelihood of political
proposals succeeding in their objectives. Let me give a simple example.

During the Democratic Primary campaign Bernie Sanders pushed very hard
for a $15 minimum wage as a fundamental part of his political programme.
In August 2016 the alliance that formed around Black Lives Matter
published a document that put forward a basic income as a foundational
political proposal (targeted in the first instance to the black
population as part of a reparations package for the years of slavery).
In both instances the idea was that the quality of life associated with
the reproduction of labour power could be radically improved by
increasing the effective demand of those employed (Sanders) or of
everyone who had suffered historically from slavery whether employed or
not (Black Lives Matter). Both proposals raised the equivalent of money
wages. This increased effective demand should mean an increase in the
goods and services received by the respective populations. But that
impact presumes nothing happens at the point of realisation to reduce
the possibility of that effect. But we know from the analysis of the
circulation of capital that a great deal of appropriation of value
through predation occurs at the point of realisation. Increasing the
minimum wage or creating a basic income will amount to naught if hedge
funds buy up foreclosed houses and pharmaceutical patents and raise
prices (in some cases astronomically) to line their own pockets out of
the increased effective demand exercised by the population. Increasing
college tuitions, usurious interest rates on credit cards, all sorts of
hidden charges on telephone bills and medical insurance could steal away
all the benefits. A population might be better served by strict
regulatory intervention to control these living expenses, to limit the
vast amount of wealth appropriation occurring at the point of
realisation. It is not surprising to find that there is strong sentiment
among the venture capitalists of Silicon Valley to also support basic
minimum income proposals. They know their technologies are putting
people out of work by the millions and that those millions will not form
a market for their products if they have no income. By locating such
proposals in the visualisation here provided, we can see immediately
what the barriers to implementation as well as the hidden motivations
might be. The visualisation also provides a map of the potential
barriers to the continuity of the circulation of capital as a whole. It
locates points where blockages might trigger crises. Every point of
metamorphosis of value, for example, is a potential site for crisis
formation.

The visualisation also sheds an interesting light on the different forms
of social struggle that might reverberate throughout the totality.
Struggles at the point of valorisation inevitably have a class character
(which is much theorised and well known). Those at the point of
realisation focus on buyers and sellers and trigger fights against
predatory practices and accumulation by dispossession in the market
place (e.g. against gentrification and foreclosures). Such struggles are
not well theorised. In the field of social reproduction issues of social
hierarchy, gender, sexuality, kinship and family and the like become
much more predominant and the primary political focus shifts to the
qualities of daily life rather than the labour process. These struggles
have often been ignored in the Marxist literature. Struggles over
distribution call for an analysis of the often antagonistic relations
between different factions of capital and the state apparatus. These,
along with the capital–labour struggles over wage rates in the market
place complete a tentative map of the different potential loci of
political struggle in and around the circulation of capital as a whole.
It then follows that social and political struggles against the power of
capital within the totality of capital circulation take different forms
and call for different kinds of strategic alliances if they are to
succeed. Traditional ‘left’ movements have not always acknowledged the
importance of such alliances and the compromises necessary to make them
work. In addition, there are all of those struggles that occur in the
contextual field in which capital circulation is embedded. The question
of not only what human nature is, but what it might be, is of huge
significance politically. The human nature on display among supporters
of Donald Trump, Geert Wilders, Marine Le Pen, Recip Tayyip Erdogan,
Narendra Modi, Viktor Orban and Vladimir Putin is very different from
that of followers of Mahatma Gandhi, Bishop Desmond Tutu, Nelson Mandela
and Evo Morales, which is very different again from Vladimir Lenin,
Fidel Castro, Gamal Abdel Nasser, Hugo Chavez, Franz Fanon, Leopold
Senghor and Amilcar Cabral. While it may be a banal cliché of politics,
that the hearts and minds of the people have first to be engaged, shaped
and captured to pursue any kind of political-economic project, it is
nevertheless the case that political struggles over what might be called
‘the nature’ of human nature will quite rightly lie at the base of
concerns arising from economic questions of capital circulation. But as
I think the visualisation of capital in motion makes quite clear, the
relations between the value that circulates as capital and the perpetual
construction and reconstruction of broader political, cultural and
aesthetic values is in itself a matter of great import. But those that
prioritise thinking and active struggles about the latter have to
recognise that they do so in the context of the circulation of capital
that constrains as it facilitates certain forms of thought and action.
To the degree that capital is perpetually and necessarily engaged with
the construction and reconstruction of wants, needs and desires, this
forms one vital bridge between what sometimes may seem like two
distinctive domains of human action. Margaret Thatcher, after all, set
out not only to change the economy but ‘to change the soul’ and in this
she had some success. Many people came to accept her dictum that ‘there
is no alternative’. This same set of conflictive concerns extends to the
vast field of political and cultural struggles over our existing and
future relations to an ever-evolving ‘nature’ that is already
reconstituted in many respects as a ‘second nature’ through a long
history of environmental transformations. How we are currently producing
nature is a hugely contested question which, again, cannot be addressed
independently of an understanding of how the circulation and expansion
of capital works.

I do not presume that these broader struggles are subsumed within those
that attach to the perpetuation of value in motion. If anything, the
subsumption is the other way round. But what a study of value in motion
allows is a far better understanding of what it is that must be subsumed
within this broader politics and much of it is pretty hard to digest.


3 Money as the Representation of Value

Most of Marx’s theoretical arguments throughout _Capital_ are expressed
in value terms. The economic data of the world and most of Marx’s actual
examples are expressed in money terms. Are we to assume that money is an
accurate and unproblematic representation of value? If not, why not: and
with what consequences? Given the history of representational forms, is
it possible that money is founded on systemic distortions of the value
it is supposed to represent? Map projections are notorious for
accurately representing some features of the earth’s surface while
distorting others. Should we not worry about the possibility of similar
distortions in the case of money in relation to value?

Value is a social relation. As such, it is ‘immaterial but objective.’
The ‘phantom-like objectivity’ of value arises because ‘not an atom of
matter enters into the objectivity of commodities as values’. Their
status as values contrasts with ‘the coarsely sensuous objectivity of
commodities as physical objects. We may twist and turn a single
commodity as we wish; it remains impossible to grasp it as a thing
possessing value.’¹ The value of commodities is, like many other
features of social life – such as power, reputation, status, influence
or charisma – an immaterial but objective social relation that craves a
material expression. In the case of value, this need is met through what
Marx calls the ‘dazzling’ form of money.

Marx is very careful with his language. He refers to money almost
exclusively as the ‘form of expression’ or as the ‘representation’ of
value. He scrupulously avoids the idea that money is value incarnate, or
that it is an arbitrary symbol imposed by convention on exchange
relations (which was a widespread view in the political economy of his
time). Value cannot exist without money as its mode of expression.²
Conversely, however autonomous it may seem, money cannot cut the
umbilical cord that ties it to what it represents. We should think of
money and value as autonomous and independent of each other but
dialectically intertwined. This kind of relationship has a long history.
Here is how Marx thinks of it:

It has become apparent in the course of our presentation that value,
which appeared as an abstraction, is possible only … as soon as money is
posited; this circulation of money in turn leads to capital, hence can
be fully developed only on the foundation of capital; just as,
generally, only on this foundation can circulation seize hold of all
moments of production. This development, therefore, not only makes
visible the historic character of forms, such as capital, which belong
to a specific epoch of history; but also (in its course), categories
such as value, which appear as purely abstract, show the historic
foundation from which they are abstracted, and on whose basis alone they
can appear … and categories which belong to more or less all epochs,
such as e.g. money, show the historic modifications which they undergo.
³

For Marx, all the major categories in _Capital_, taken together, are
abstractions grounded in the historical experience and practices of
capitalism. ‘The economic concept of value does not occur in antiquity …
The concept of value is entirely peculiar to the most modern economy,
since it is the most abstract expression of capital itself and the
production resting on it.’ Categories that have a longer history, such
as rent, interest and profit on merchant’s capital, become adapted over
time to the requirements of a capitalist mode of production. This is the
case with money. The problem is how to distinguish between those
characteristics of money that are unique to capitalism and the various
money forms (like cowrie shells or wampum beads) that pre-existed it.
This question becomes doubly important when it comes to analysing
credit.

The constant continuity of the process (of circulation), the
unobstructed and fluid transition of value from one form into the other,
or from one phase of the process into the next, appears as a fundamental
condition for production based on capital to a much greater degree than
for all earlier forms of production … It thus appears as a matter of
chance for production based on capital whether or not (this) essential
condition … is actually brought about. The suspension of this chance
element by capital itself is credit … Which is why credit in any
developed form appears in no earlier mode of production. There was
borrowing and lending in earlier situations as well, and usury is even
the oldest of the antediluvian forms of capital. But borrowing and
lending no more constitute credit than working constitutes industrial
labour or free wage labour. And credit as an essential, developed
relation of production appears historically only in circulation based on
capital or on wage labour. (Money itself is a form for suspending the
unevenness of the times required in different branches of production, to
the extent this obstructs exchange.)⁴

The distinctive qualities of both money and credit within a capitalist
mode of production are to ensure the continuity of movement of capital
as value in motion. Conversely, the necessity to ensure continuity
brings together the categories of money, credit and value into a
specific historical configuration.

The first chapter of _Capital_ is an object lesson in how to study
matters of this sort. Marx notes how the classical political economists
drew upon a fictional past, that of the Robinson Crusoe myth, to
‘naturalise’ their categories as if they arose out of a state of nature
(and were for that reason immutable, unchanging and unchangeable). Marx
prefers to examine pre-capitalist societies instead, to emphasise how
categories are embedded in actual histories rather than derived from
fictional stories. ‘Let us now transport ourselves from Robinson’s
island, bathed in light, to medieval Europe, shrouded in darkness …,’ he
writes. He briefly examines the social relations and categories typical
of feudal corvée labour and of the ‘patriarchal rural industry of a
peasant family’. But he then triangulates, as it were, on the
specificities of capital today by imagining what the categories might
look like after capitalism is transcended. He uses the pre-capitalist
past and the _futur antérieur_ of communism as standpoints to understand
the particular nature of capital (as well as the qualities of money and
credit) now. The _futur antérieur_ is not a utopian imaginary of what
might happen, but a specification of what must happen if we are to get
to communism. ‘Let us imagine, for a change, an association of free men,
working with the means of production held in common, and expending their
many different forms of labor power in full self-awareness as one single
social labour force …’ Under such unalienated conditions, ‘the social
relations of the individual producers, towards their labour and the
products of their labour, are here transparent in their simplicity, in
production as well as in distribution’.⁵ In this world there is no
hidden hand of the market or laws of motion going on behind everyone’s
backs that limit our freedoms and certainly no state dictation. It is
from these perspectives of before and after that Marx gets behind ‘the
veil’ of what he calls the ‘fetishisms’ that suffuse not only the
writings of the political economists, but also corrupt common sense
representations of commodity exchange in price-fixing markets. Money is
the supreme example of such fetishism. We believe that money possesses
social power over us as well as over others and, of course, to some
degree it does (which is the whole point of Marx’s theory of fetishism:
it is real but wrong-headed).

So how, then, are we to understand the dialectical relation between
value and its representation as money? This was a deeply contested
political question in Marx’s time. In the late 1840s, long before he had
worked out many of the central ideas of _Capital_, Marx found himself at
odds politically not only with Ricardian socialists in Britain but far
more importantly with the imposing figure of Proudhon who had many
followers among the French artisans. Proudhon and his followers posed
the following perfectly reasonable question: why are capitalists so rich
and the working classes so impoverished when all the leading political
economists of the time – most notably David Ricardo – insisted that
economic value was produced exclusively by labour?

Proudhon concluded that the fault lay in the way that labour value was
being represented in the market. The irrationality of money and of
market exchange was the crux of the problem. What was needed, he
suggested, was an alternative way of measuring labour value and setting
prices, a way which rested directly on the actual time workers spent
making a product. Workers should be paid in labour time-chits, labour
hours, or even coins designating the hours of labour actually worked.
The Proudhonist movement looked to restructure the money system,
organise the supply of free credit, reform central banking and create
mutual credit institutions so as to solve the problem of social
inequality and restore the rights of labour.

Marx vehemently objected to these ideas in _The Poverty of Philosophy_
(published in 1847). The first part of the _Grundrisse_, the unpublished
notebooks from 1857, is a lengthy rebuttal of the monetary ideas of
Alfred Darimon, a follower of Proudhon.⁶ The problem Marx had with
Proudhon and his followers was their failure to grapple with the social
relations that defined value. Under capitalism it is socially necessary
labour time and not actual labour time that counts. The ‘socially
necessary’ implies the existence of some ‘hidden hand’ or ‘law of
motion’ to which both the capitalist and the labourer are subservient.
As early as the _Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_, Marx had
concluded that value under capitalism was alienated labour exploited by
capital in production, secured by private property and commodity
exchange in price-fixing markets. These were the conditions that
produced the social inequalities and degradations to which labourers
were subjected even as they were engaged upon the valorisation of
capital. The objective of socialist revolution was the radical
transformation of the social relations under which workers laboured.
Without such a transformation it would be impossible to create a world
in which associated labourers made the decisions and in which actual
labour times rather than socially necessary labour times might become
the measure of value.

Alienated labour dominated by alien class power was the core of the
problem. Money, in Marx’s view, represented (alienated) labour values.
It followed that ‘to leave production relations intact while attempting
to eliminate the irrationality of price formation on the market is
inherently self-defeating since it assumes away the very irrationality
of value production of which it is the expression.’⁷ This was what was
wrong with Proudhon’s position.

To seek a better mode of representation (like time-chits) of alienated
labour without offering a critique of the social relations upon which
the capitalist law of value is founded, was simply to double down on the
alienation. This is what Marx believed Proudhon and his followers along
with many Ricardian socialists were unwittingly doing. This is why
Marx’s depiction of the _futur antérieur_ of communism in Volume 1 of
_Capital_ is so important. It depicts associated labourers (a concept
that Proudhon abhorred) with means of production held in common making
conscious and, therefore, unalienated decisions in utter transparency
without the social necessities dictated by capital–labour relations of
domination or the interventions of any external power (such as the state
or the market).

The manufacturing world from which Proudhon drew his categories was that
of the Parisian workshops of the 1840s.⁸ These were typically
small-scale enterprises run by artisans controlling their own labour
process with a workshop at the back and a store at the front. The main
form of capital encountered was that of merchants who would buy from the
workshops and then consolidate selling in their dry goods stores
(precursors of the department stores that came in the 1850s). The
artisans did not complain about their labour processes because they
controlled them. From their standpoint their labour was not alienated at
the point of production. Their main complaints were the low prices on
offer from the merchants and the increasing domination by the latter
through a putting out system in which the merchants placed orders and
dictated specifications as to the nature of the finished product and in
some instances provided the raw materials and even advanced credit
(often at usurious rates). In this situation the demand for full
recognition of the labour hours performed as opposed to the paltry
monetary rewards offered by the merchants was understandable. The value
of their labour was being expropriated (alienated) in the market.
Proudhon’s arguments about money and markets made some intuitive sense
to this audience. Small wonder he was seen as a champion of workers’
rights.

Marx was writing in the context of the factory system where capitalists
controlled the labour process and alienated labour dominated at the
point of production. It is difficult for us to imagine how huge this
difference seemed at that historical time. Engels, who was familiar with
artisanal labour systems in Germany, records his astonishment and horror
at his first encounters with the factory system and capitalist
industrialism in Britain. He was one of the very first commentators to
depict its qualities in the _Condition of the Working Class in England_
in 1844. There was a world of difference in labour processes between
these two industrial systems. Marx was mightily impressed with Engels’s
account of factory labour. He tended to see the factory system
teleologically as capital’s future. It is to that future that Volume 1
of _Capital_ is dedicated and from that world that Marx derived his
categories.⁹

The differences that separate Proudhon and Marx reflect the different
labour systems they addressed. It follows that we might also need to
re-evaluate our own categories to reflect contemporary labour practices.
The factory labour that Marx assumed was the future of capitalism has
been, for example, much diminished in advanced capitalist countries and
the teleology Marx broadly assumed has not unfolded in the way he
imagined. Capital is currently constituted by an amazing mix of quite
different labour systems in different places and times. Factory labour
still dominates in some parts of the world (e.g. East Asia) but in North
America and Europe it is much diminished and replaced by various other
labour systems (digital labour and the like).

There is a great deal of current interest in Proudhonian-type monetary
interventions with local currencies, time sharing and labour time moneys
being used as an alternative to conventional modes of exchange of goods
and services.¹⁰ This has been associated in some political movements
with attempts to revive small-scale and decentralised production systems
(preferably under worker control). The latter became possible given the
new technologies and organisational forms of flexible specialisation and
small-batch production that emerged in the 1980s. At that time, Piore
and Sable in their influential book _The Second Industrial Divide_ read
this as an opening for the left to realise Proudhon’s dream of workshop
mutualism. The small-batch self-organised production systems that
emerged in Tuscany became a model for a socialist future in the 1980s.
Unfortunately, this labour system turned out to be a neoliberal trap,
dismantling the organised power of labour and expanding rates of
exploitation in labour systems founded on decentralised precarity and
insecurity. Flexible specialisation became flexible accumulation for
capitalist corporations.¹¹ On the other hand the mass factory system is
alive and well in East and Southeast Asia while employment patterns of
digital labour and microfinance are highly decentralised though
increasingly organised into configurations of self-exploitation that are
every bit as oppressive as traditional industrial labour.¹²

It would be a huge error to assume that the social relations expressed
in the labour theory of value could be reconstructed by reforms of the
monetary system. ‘The evil of bourgeois society is not to be remedied by
“transforming” the banks or by founding a rational “money system” …¹³

Just as it is impossible to suspend the complications and contradictions
which arise from the existence of money alongside the particular
commodities merely by altering the form of money (although difficulties
characteristic of a lower form of money may be avoided by moving to a
higher form), so also is it impossible to abolish money itself as long
as exchange value remains the social form of products. It is necessary
to see this clearly in order to avoid setting impossible tasks, and in
order to know the limits within which monetary reforms and
transformations of circulation are able to give a new shape to the
relations of production and to the social relations that rest on the
latter.’¹⁴

The only ultimate solution as far as Marx is concerned is the total
abolition of exchange value which, of course, also implies the abolition
of value as socially necessary labour time leaving the organised
exchange of use values as the only remnant of the categories Marx
derived from capitalism.¹⁵

Marx in composing his critique of Darimon posed two basic questions.
‘Can the existing relations of production and the relations of
distribution which correspond to them, be revolutionised by a change in
the instrument of circulation, in the organisation of circulation?’
Marx’s answer to this question is a resounding ‘no!’. ‘Further question:
Can such a transformation of circulation be undertaken without touching
the existing relations of production and the social relations which
correspond to them?’ Marx equivocates. ‘It would be part of this general
question whether the different civilised forms of money – metallic,
paper, credit money, labour money (the last named as the socialist form)
– can accomplish what is demanded of them without suspending the very
relation of production which is expressed in the very category of money,
and whether it is not a self-contradictory demand to wish to get around
essential determinants of a relation by means of formal modifications?’
But, he goes on to say, ‘various forms of money may correspond better to
social production in various stages; one form may remedy evils against
which another is powerless; but none of them, as long as they remain
forms of money, and as long as money remains an essential relation of
production, is capable of overcoming the contradictions inherent in the
money relation, and can instead only hope to reproduce those
contradictions in one or another form’. In the same way that ‘one form
of wage labour may correct the abuses of another, but no form of wage
labour can correct the abuse of wage labour itself’, so one form of
money may ‘be handier, more fitting, may entail fewer inconveniences
than another. But the inconveniences which arise from the existence of
every specific instrument of exchange, of any specific but general
equivalent, must necessarily reproduce themselves in every form, however
differently.’¹⁶

The rise and adaptation of the credit system is an obvious example of
what Marx is talking about here. Initially, long-standing practices were
adapted to deal with the problem of excessive hoarding associated with
widely differing turnover times of capital, fixed capital formation and
long-term investments in collective means of consumption. More recently,
interest-bearing capital has become a powerful independent driving force
of accumulation on its own account. The result has not been human
emancipation from want and need but increasing efficiency of circulation
and surplus value production, had at the price of increasing debt
peonage and increasing alienation across the politics of daily life.

The technologies of money forms and uses have been revolutionised
several times over throughout capital’s history. This does pose
interpretive problems. What are we to make, for example, of the labour
theory of value when central banks are engaging in quantitative easing
or when credit creation within the banking system seems to be so out of
control? Where is the discipline supposedly imposed by values upon money
forms in an insanely speculative economy? Technologies of electronic
banking and block chain technologies (pioneered by Bitcoin but now
actively being developed by the banks) suggest that revolutions in the
monetary form may be in motion and while such revolutions may not
challenge the underlying value relations they must be closely monitored
for their implications for social relations.¹⁷ Marx recognised the
existence of such problems. For answers, he goes back to the very
foundations of his investigations.

When commodity exchange becomes a normal social act, then one or two
commodities crystallise out to play the role of the general equivalent.
In the capitalist era gold and silver became the preferred form of
expression of value. But this leads immediately to certain
contradictions. The use value of gold (a sensuous commodity) ‘becomes
the form of appearance of its opposite, value’.¹⁸ The concrete physical
labour embodied in gold production becomes the mode of expression of
‘its opposite, abstract human labour’.¹⁹ The ‘private labour’ involved
in gold production ‘takes the form of its opposite, namely labour in its
directly social form’.²⁰ Finally, and perhaps most significant of all,
‘money itself becomes a commodity, an external object capable of
becoming the private property of any individual. Thus the social power
that derives from social labour becomes the private power of private
persons.’²¹

The distortions set up here are systemic and major rather than
accidental and minor. Money becomes a measure of individual wealth and
power, a supreme object of desire. It forms a singular basis for class
power and class rule. Even more importantly, it becomes a vital means of
production for valorisation to proceed. This social power is, however,
systemically limited all the time the precious metals lie at the base of
the monetary system. With the proliferation and increasing complexity of
the social division of labour and of exchange relations, ‘so grows the
power of _money_’, such that ‘the exchange relation establishes itself
as a power external to and independent of the producers. What originally
appeared as a means to promote production becomes a relation alien to
the producers. As the producers become more dependent on exchange,
exchange appears to become more independent of them.’²² Money is
introduced as the servant of exchange but soon becomes its despotic
master. Adam Smith’s ‘hidden hand’ begins to take over. Producers become
price takers rather than price makers. ‘The gap between the product as
product and the product as exchange value appears to widen. Money does
not create these antitheses and contradictions,’ Marx explains, ‘it is
rather the development of these contradictions and antitheses which
creates the seemingly transcendental power of money.’²³ It is this
transcendental power that now surrounds us at every turn.

These contradictions echo across all of Marx’s writings. His account of
capital’s labour theory of value is inextricably entangled with them.
The topic becomes even more complicated as Marx delves deeper into the
multiple functions of money. It can be a measure of value, a mode of
saving, a standard of price, a means of circulation, or it can function
as money of account, as credit money, and last but not least as a means
of production to produce capital.²⁴

Several of these functions are incompatible. While gold is excellent as
a measure of value, as a standard of price and as a vehicle for saving
(because it is a metal that does not oxidise), it is hopeless as a means
of circulation. The latter is better served by symbols of money like
coins, fiat moneys issued by the state and ultimately electronic moneys.
These forms of money cannot exist without guarantees as to their
qualities initially in relation to the metallic base. ‘The business of
coining like the establishing of a standard measure of prices is an
attribute proper to the state. The different national uniforms worn at
home by gold and silver as coins’ are ‘taken off again when they appear
on the world market’, indicating a ‘separation between the internal or
national spheres of commodity circulation and its universal sphere, the
world market’.²⁵

The question then arises as to the interrelations between these
radically different forms of expression of value (e.g. gold versus coins
versus central bank money and national versus international monetary
instruments). In this the parallel with map projections is useful. Some
projections preserve accuracy of direction but distort everything else
while others accurately represent areas, or shapes or distances at the
expense of all the other features. And so it is with the different forms
of money. Different representations serve different purposes. The hope
is that things do not work at cross-purposes but, of course, they
regularly do. Money used in one way (such as a means of saving) can
suddenly switch into the role of being a means of circulation and vice
versa. As Marx amusedly notes, if we are interested solely in money as a
means to circulate commodities then counterfeit coins and notes do the
job just as well as fiat moneys guaranteed by the state.²⁶

The irony is that the need to find a physical material representation
for social values led to the adoption of an unimpeachable metallic base
(gold and silver) for money that was so dysfunctional for daily use that
it required symbolic representations of itself (paper and electronic
moneys) to be effective. The symbolic moneys gradually became more
dominant as trading expanded. Cutting out the metallic base in the early
1970s produced two symbolic systems – value and money – side by side in
an awkward dialectical embrace.

Part of the awkwardness arises out of what Marx calls a ‘quantitative
incongruity between money price and magnitude of value’ which is
‘inherent in the price-form itself’. Prices proposed and realised in the
market (no matter whether stated in gold, fiat or even labour time
moneys) can yo-yo all over the place but this is precisely ‘what makes
this form the adequate one for a mode of production whose laws can only
assert themselves as blindly operating averages between constant
irregularities’.²⁷ Only in this way can demand and supply come into
equilibrium and it is the equilibrium price that comes closest to
approximating value.

Even more troubling is that the money form ‘may also harbour a
qualitative contradiction’, such that ‘price ceases altogether to
express value … Things which in and for themselves are not commodities,
things such as conscience and honour, etc. can be offered for sale by
their holders, and thus acquire the form of commodities through their
price. Hence a thing can, formally speaking, have a price without having
a value.’ In some instances these prices may ‘conceal a real
value-relation or one derived from it, for instance the price of
uncultivated land, which is without value because no human labour is
objectified in it’.²⁸

On the surface this is particularly troubling for the labour theory of
value because, as the neoclassical economists early on complained, if so
much goes on in the price realm outside of the purview of value, then
why not analyse market prices and their movements directly and forget
about values entirely? The disadvantage of so doing is obvious: if we
erase the dialectical relation between prices and values then there is
no standpoint from which to mount a critique of the monetary
representations of the social labour that labourers are called upon to
do for others in the course of performing wage labour for capital. We
will be powerless to explain where the monetary aspects of crises might
come from and why crises in general are inevitably expressed in monetary
form. Marx is at pains to explain this in Volume 1 of _Capital_.

‘In a crisis, the antithesis between commodities and their value form,
money, is raised to the level of an absolute contradiction.’ So whence
this contradiction? It is ‘immanent’ says Marx,

in the function of money as a means of payment. When the payments
balance each other, money functions only nominally as money of account,
as a measure of value. But when actual payments have to be made, money
does not come onto the scene as a circulating medium … but as the
individual incarnation of social labour … This contradiction bursts
forth in that aspect of an industrial and commercial crisis, which is
known as a monetary crisis. Such a crisis occurs only where the ongoing
chain of payments has been fully developed, along with an artificial
system for settling them. Whenever there is a general disturbance of the
mechanism, no matter what its cause, money suddenly and immediately
changes over from its merely nominal shape, money of account, into hard
cash. Profane commodities can no longer replace it. The use-value of
commodities becomes value-less, and their value vanishes in the face of
their own form of value. The bourgeois, drunk with prosperity and
arrogantly certain of himself, has just declared that money is a purely
imaginary creation. ‘Commodities alone are money,’ he said. But now the
opposite cry resounds across the markets of the world: only money is a
commodity. As the hart pants after fresh water, so pants his soul after
money, the only wealth.²⁹

This is the kind of analysis that is rendered possible by recognising
the dialectical and fluid movement of money in relation to values. But
the power of this dialectic has also to acknowledge that value itself
does not remain untouched by the movements we have just described. If
value arises through the proliferation of market exchange mediated by
money then the qualities of money and of what it measures must have
implications for the social qualities of value. The qualitative
incongruity between prices and values cannot be ignored.³⁰

Prior to abandoning the metallic base, Marx detected the existence not
only of different moneys for different purposes but also an interesting
hierarchy within the monetary system. The metallic base was quite
literally the gold standard of value precisely because of its material
qualities that remained constant over time along with quantities that
could be increased only very slowly relative to the global stock of gold
already above ground. This tightly constrained form of money contrasted
dramatically with the effervescence of the credit system. Marx speaks of
it this way: ‘The monetary system is essentially Catholic, the credit
system essentially Protestant. As paper, the monetary existence of
commodities has a purely social existence. It is _faith_ that brings
salvation. Faith in money value as the immanent spirit of commodities,
faith in the mode of production and its predestined disposition, faith
in the individual agents of production as personifications of
self-valorising capital. But the credit system is no more emancipated
from the monetary system as its basis than Protestantism is from the
foundations of Catholicism.’³¹ When times are good, credit, ‘a social
form of wealth, displaces money and usurps its position’ so that ‘the
money form of products appears as something merely evanescent and ideal,
as a mere notion. But as soon as credit is shaken … all real wealth is
supposed to be actually and suddenly transformed into money – into gold
and silver – a crazy demand but one that necessarily grows out of the
system itself. And the gold and silver that is supposed to satisfy these
immense claims amounts in all to a few millions in the vaults of the
bank.’³² The value of commodities must then be ‘sacrificed to ensure the
fantastic and autonomous existence of this value in money.’ This
sacrifice ‘is unavoidable in capitalist production, and forms one of its
particular charms’.³³

‘A certain quantity of metal that is insignificant in comparison with
production as a whole is the acknowledged pivot of this system.’ The
structure is as follows: ‘the central bank is the pivot of the credit
system. And the metal reserve is in turn the pivot of the bank. It is
inevitable that the credit system should collapse into the monetary
system’ in times of difficulty. As a result, the metallic base
constituted ‘both a material and imaginary barrier to wealth and its
movement’. It was inevitable that capitalist production would
‘constantly strive to overcome this metallic barrier’ while ‘time and
time again, breaking its head on it’. Marx was of the opinion that this
barrier could never be overcome. But he was wrong. Now that the metallic
base has been abandoned and capital no longer has to ‘break its head on
it’,³⁴ the only barrier is constituted by the policies and politics of
the central banks and the states. This puts the question of the quality
and quantity (as well as the form) of money into social hands as opposed
to relying upon the fixed and immutable physical qualities and
quantities of the gold supply as an external constraint.

The abandonment of the metallic base to the monetary system in the early
1970s allowed the circulation of interest-bearing capital to take over
as the principle and unrestrained driver of endless capital
accumulation. The analysis of this phenomenon requires a closer look at
the position of banking and finance within the field of distribution
more generally.

Let it first be said that there are some immensely complicated
interactions that take place within the field of distribution as a
whole. Financiers may channel money and investments towards land and
property speculation, thus supporting the activities of the land and
property-owning classes at the expense of everything else. Landowners
use their land as security for taking out loans. In Britain many
aristocratic landowners became bankers as a result. Merchant capitalists
frequently extend and depend upon credit. In many parts of the world
workers’ incomes are augmented by the use of credit cards. Workers may
be integrated into the circulation of interest-bearing capital by taking
out a mortgage in the hope of becoming a homeowner. This, the World Bank
assures us, confers social stability or, as the old adage has it:
debt-encumbered homeowners do not go on strike. Workers are also
sometimes required to put their money in pension funds that have to
invest somewhere to exploit other workers to get a rate of return.
Financiers lend to governments while governments in turn use taxes to
guarantee and insure the activities of credit institutions. Meanwhile,
banks in surplus lend to banks with deficits and both draw upon the
reserves of the central banks when necessary. The various roles are
porous and sometimes internally contradictory. Automobile companies
support selling apparatuses that extend credit to consumers to buy their
cars and it is often not clear whether the profits of the company come
from valorisation, realisation or distributional activities. Financiers
lend to developers to build houses and to workers to buy them thus
inter-nalising demand and supply within a single operation under their
command. Workers press hard for wage increases that may depress the
prices of the stocks in which their pension funds are invested. Unions
may be compelled to invest in the debt of the companies that employ
them. When Enron went bust the pensions of its work-force were gone. In
the New York fiscal crisis of the 1970s, municipal unions were forced to
invest their pension funds in municipal debt with predictable
consequences. Governments set up systems of profit sharing for employees
so that the latter then have an interest in repressing their own wage
demands.

The flows and cross-flows within what might be called the
‘distributional field’ (the terrain of Volume 3 of _Capital_) have, as
the above examples illustrate, become increasingly complex and
voluminous over time even as the categories and roles become more porous
and overlapping with respect to each other. In some parts of the world
the volume of transactions and the associated turnover of capital within
and across the distributional field outstrip valorisation activities by
a very significant margin. The foreign exchange transactions market is
huge compared to reinvestment in manufacturing. What is less easy to
discern is how much of this activity is merely speculative froth or
transactional noise having nothing to do with value creation.

Marx clearly sees that the centralisation of surplus funds in money form
within the financial system meant that the disbursal of those funds must
necessarily play a key role in guiding the dynamics of the reinvestment
of money as capital. This is an issue to which we will return by way of
conclusion. The financial system in effect forms a vast pool of liquid
assets such that banking and finance came to enclose and represent the
common capital of the capitalist class. This common capital is augmented
sometimes by leveraging – lending out fictitious capital. This amounts
to money creation within the banking system. At times this money
creation can become excessive (when banks lend out, say, thirty times
the amount of money they have on deposit). The financial system also
functions as a clearing house for all manner of transactions. It becomes
in effect the central nervous system of capital in general,
orchestrating the flows of money capital into and across a wide range of
activities, wherever the profit rate might actually or potentially be
higher.

Behind all of this there emerges an investor class – individuals,
institutions, organisations and corporations – desperately seeking a
rate of return on their money capital.³⁵ This is a distinctive class of
property owners – a ‘financial aristocracy’ – that impels the
circulation of interest-bearing capital to get a rate of return without
doing anything.³⁶ Pension funds want a return on their capital (indeed
they have a fiduciary duty to do so) as do endowments of non-profit
institutions (like private universities) and wealthy individuals with
strong investment portfolios.

We also know from Marx’s brilliant disaggregation of the circulation of
capital into commodity, money and production forms in Volume 2 of
_Capital_, that from the standpoint of the circulation of money capital,
processes of valorisation and realisation are mere inconveniences on the
way to profit making. If interest-bearing capital could find a way to
augment itself without passing through valorisation and realisation then
it would do so. This is precisely what all the churning that goes on
within the distributive field allows. Banks lend to other banks and what
could be easier pickings than to borrow from the US Federal Reserve at
0.5 per cent and buy ten-year treasury notes that yield 2 per cent? The
incentives for money capital to skip investing in valorisation,
particularly when the profit rate is low or labour relations
troublesome, are multiple. The hope is that failure to invest will
create enough scarcity to raise prices and profit rates so as to
encourage money capital to flow back into valorisation. But in the midst
of all this churning there arise hedge funds and private equity
companies that gain profits directly from betting on market movements of
any sort both up and down and long and short. The rationale given for
their activities is that they supposedly help markets clear more
efficiently but when successful (which they usually are) they do so by
sucking out vast monetary gains from the overall circulation of capital.
Marx’s penchant for deploying vampire images seems as appropriate here
as it does in production.

Marx, in fact, had some choice things to say about the circulation of
interest-bearing capital even in his day. With interest-bearing capital,
he wrote, ‘capital appears as a mysterious and self-creating source … of
its own increase’. It is here that the capital relationship is
‘elaborated into its pure form, self-valorising value, money-breeding
money’. ‘The fetish character of capital and the representation of this
capital fetish is now complete.’ This is ‘capital mystification in the
most flagrant form’.³⁷ This is the great betrayal of value by way of its
monetisation. This is the height of the distortion that money inflicts
upon the value form, which it is supposed to represent.

The effects are far deeper than just surface froth of speculative
activity in unstable markets. Marx did not know what to make of some of
the institutional shifts that accompanied the increasing centralisation
of capital flows within the financial system. The emergence of joint
stock companies and relatively large-scale banking institutions in the
1860s suggested a break between ownership and management of
corporations. Admiring as he was of the associationist ideas of Henri de
Saint-Simon he looked in vain for some progressive consequences of the
association of capitals, at one point suggesting this might mean ‘the
abolition of the capitalist mode of production within the capitalist
mode of production itself’. It was, therefore, ‘a mere point of
transition to a new form of production’.³⁸ But in the light of the
counter-revolutionary mobilisation of Saint-Simonian ideas in Second
Empire Paris, incorporating the construction of new credit institutions
and state financing of capitalist mega projects, Marx soon changed his
opinions. The credit system ‘gives rise to monopoly in certain spheres
and hence provokes state intervention. It reproduces a new financial
aristocracy, a new kind of parasite in the guise of company promoters,
speculators and merely nominal directors, an entire system of swindling
and cheating with respect to the promotion of companies, issues of
shares and share dealings. It is private production unchecked by private
ownership.’³⁹

Not only did capital get redefined as ‘command over other people’s
money’, it also created a space totally out of control of value
relations. ‘All standards of measurement, all explanatory reasons that
were more or less justified within the capitalist mode of production,
now vanish. What the speculating trader risks is social property, not
his own. Equally absurd now is saying that the origin of capital is
saving since what this speculator demands is precisely that others
should save for him.’⁴⁰ Hence the perpetual pressure to turn the
pay-as-you-go Social Security System in the United States into stock
market pension funds!! The effects of this were certainly not benign
even in Marx’s day.

Conceptions that still had a certain meaning at a less-developed state
of capitalist production, now become completely meaningless. Success and
failure lead in both cases to the centralisation of capitals and hence
to expropriation on the most enormous scale. Expropriation now extends
from the immediate producers to the small and medium capitalists
themselves. Expropriation is the starting point of the capitalist mode
of production … Within the capitalist system itself, this expropriation
takes the antithetical form of the appropriation of social property by
the few, and credit gives these few ever more the character of simple
adventurers.⁴¹

The economics of expropriation and accumulation by dispossession enters
into the picture in disruptive ways, orchestrated through the debt and
credit system, only to be heightened as the difficulties of conventional
paths to capital accumulation mount, as they have since the 1970s. Marx
clearly sensed that of all the future dangers that the reproduction of
capital faced, this was the one that might ultimately prove fatal. The
irony being that the central contradiction in this case is not that
between capital and labour; it lies in the antagonistic relation between
different factions of capital.


4 Anti-Value: The Theory of Devaluation

The closing sentences of the first section of the first chapter of
Volume 1 of _Capital_ read: ‘Nothing can be a value without being an
object of utility. If the thing is useless, so is the labour contained
in it; the labour does not count as labour, and therefore creates no
value.’¹ With this one incisive thrust, Marx introduces us to the idea
that the circulation of capital is vulnerable, that it can come to an
abrupt halt; that the threat of devaluation, of loss of value, always
hovers over it as it circulates. Moreover, the value of the means of
production incorporated in the commodity is also lost along with that of
the value added by labour. The transition from the commodity form to the
money representation of value is a passage fraught with danger.

Throughout Volume 1 as we have seen, Marx for the most part lays aside
questions of realisation in order to concentrate on the process of
production of material commodities and surplus value. He knows full
well, of course, that ‘while living labour _creates value_, the
circulation of capital _realises value_’. The unity that necessarily
prevails between production and realisation is, however, a
‘contradictory unity’.² Hence the warning shot at the outset of Volume
1. Commodities may be in love with money but ‘the course of true love
never did run smooth’.³

It would be very unlike Marx to formulate a key concept such as value
without incorporating within it the possibility for its negation. In
certain readings of Marx, much is made of the influence of Hegel’s
‘negation of the negation’ on his thinking. He was certainly not averse
to ‘coquetting’ (as he put it) with Hegelian formulations. The bourgeois
mind, then as now, considered dialectics a ‘scandal’ and an
‘abomination’, he wrote, because dialectics ‘includes in its positive
understanding of what exists a simultaneous recognition of its negation;
its inevitable destruction; because it regards every historically
developed form as being in a fluid state, in motion, and therefore
grasps its transient aspect as well’.⁴

Value in Marx exists only in relation to anti-value. While this may
sound a strange formulation, physicists these days rely upon the
relation between matter and anti-matter to interpret foundational
physical processes. Marx often cited parallels between his conceptual
frameworks and those to be found in the natural sciences. Had this
analogy been available to him, he probably would have used it. The
evolutionary laws of capital hinge upon the unfolding relation between
value and anti-value in much the same way as the laws of physics rest on
relations between matter and anti-matter. This opposition exists even in
the act of exchange since a commodity has to be a use value for its
buyer and a non-use value for its seller. Or, as Marx asserts more
philosophically in the _Grundrisse_, ‘since value forms the foundation
of capital, and since it therefore necessarily exists only through
exchange for counter-value, it thus necessarily repels itself from
itself … The reciprocal repulsion between capitals is already contained
in capital as realised exchange value.’⁵

There is nothing mystical or obscure about the negation of value at the
point of realisation. All capitalists know that the success of their
enterprise is assured only when their commodity has been sold for a
money value that is greater than that which they initially expended on
wages and means of production. If they cannot do this then they are no
longer capitalists. The value they imagined they would have after they
put wage labourers to work making a commodity would not materialise. But
the concept of anti-value has an even more omnipresent role than this.
In Marx’s world it is not an unfortunate accident, the result of a
miscalculation, but a deep and abiding feature of what capital is.
‘While capital is reproduced as value and use value in the production
process, it is at the same time posited as not-value, as something which
first has to be realized as value by means of exchange.’⁶ Both the
prospect and reality of anti-value are always there. Anti-value has to
be overcome – redeemed as it were – if value production is to survive
the travails of circulation.

Capital is value in motion and any pause or even slowdown in that motion
for whatever reason means a loss of value, which may be resuscitated in
part or _in toto_ only when the motion of capital is resumed. ‘When
capital takes on a particular form – as a production process, as a
product waiting to be sold, as a commodity circulating in the hands of
merchant capitalists, as money waiting to be transferred or reinvested –
then capital is ‘virtually devalued’. Capital lying ‘at rest’ in any of
these states is variously termed ‘negated’, ‘fallow’, ‘dormant’ or
‘fixated’.⁷ Or consider this: ‘as long as capital remains frozen in the
form of finished product, it cannot be active as capital, it is
_negated_ capital’. This ‘virtual devaluation’ is overcome or
‘suspended’ as soon as capital resumes its movement. It is clear from
this collage of statements from Marx that he did not regard anti-value
as ‘hovering over’ value in motion as an external threat but as a
permanently disruptive force in the very gut of capital circulation
itself.

The advantage of seeing devaluation as a necessary ‘moment of the
realisation process’ is that it enables us to see immediately the
possibility of a general devaluation of capital – a crisis. Any failure
to maintain a certain velocity of circulation of capital through the
various phases of production, realisation and distribution will produce
difficulties and disruptions. We are forced to recognise the importance
of maintaining the continuity and speed of circulation. Any slowdown of
value in motion entails a loss of value. Conversely, accelerating the
turnover time of capital is a vital feature for enhancing value
production. This is one of the main implicit conclusions of Volume 2 of
_Capital_. These features are, however, what the assumption of
everything exchanging at its value in Volume 1 of _Capital_ avoids.
Crises will result if inventories build up, if money lies idle for
longer than is strictly necessary, if more stocks are held for a longer
period during production, and so forth. A ‘crisis occurs not only
because a commodity is unsaleable, but because it is not saleable within
a particular period of time’.⁸ This same principle applies with equal
force to the labour time spent in production: if Korean factories can
produce a car in half the time required in Detroit then the extra time
spent in the latter place counts for nothing. ‘As long as (capital)
remains in the production process it is not capable of circulating; and
it is virtually devalued. As long as it remains in circulation it is not
capable of producing … As long as it cannot be brought to market it is
fixated as product. As long as it has to remain on the market it is
fixated as commodity. As long as it cannot be exchanged for conditions
of production, it is fixated as money.’⁹

Capitalists are, therefore, locked in a perpetual battle not only to
produce values but to combat their potential negation. The passage from
production to realisation is a key point in the overall circulation of
capital where that battle is right royally fought out.

What circumstances might make it impossible for value to be realised in
the market? To begin with, if no one wants, needs or desires a
particular use value on offer in a particular place and time, then the
product has no value.¹⁰ It is not even worthy of being called a
commodity. Potential buyers must also possess sufficient money to pay
for the use value. If one or other of these two conditions is not met,
then the result is no value. We will later investigate in some detail
why these two conditions may not be fulfilled. But plainly the
production and management of new wants, needs and desires has had a huge
impact in the history of capitalism, turning what we like to call human
nature into something necessarily changing and malleable rather than
constant and given. Capital messes with our heads as well as with our
desires.

But there is one feature at the moment of realisation of great
significance. The foundational social relation involved in realisation
is that between buyers and sellers. Even the lowest paid worker enters
the market place endowed with the sacred right of consumer choice.¹¹
This is very different from the capital–labour relation that dominates
in the process of valorisation. To be sure, the encounter between
capital and labour in the market place is an encounter where the rules
of market exchange formally apply (though capital has power over both
demand and supply conditions of labour power through technological
changes and the production of an industrial reserve army). But in the
case of valorisation it is what happens in the hidden abode of
production – the class relation between capital and labour as
experienced in the labour process – that really matters. There is no
equivalent for that in the process of realisation. In the latter case,
the buyers of commodities (of no matter what class) exercise some degree
of consumer choice (either individual or collective). While it is
broadly true that the wants, needs and desires of the buyers have been
manipulated over time by all sorts of direct and indirect means into
patterns of ‘rational consumption’ as defined by capital, there have
always been pockets and sometimes whole social movements of resistance
to such manipulations. Collective consumer choices can be exercised in a
variety of ways, including, for example, through state policies with
regard to the social wage forced through by legislation at the behest of
long-standing political movements. Resistances arise on moral,
political, cultural, aesthetic, religious and even philosophical
grounds. In some instances the resistance is to the very concept of
commodification and market rationing of access to basic goods and
services (such as education, health care and potable water). Many would
regard such goods as basic human rights rather than as commodities to be
bought and sold. The anti-value that arises from technical glitches and
hold-ups in the circulation of capital morphs into the active anti-value
of political resistance to commodification and privatisation.

Anti-value thereby defines an active field of anti-capitalist struggle.
Consumer boycotts, though rarely successful, are one sign of this kind
of politics but all movements against conspicuous or even compensatory
consumerism constitute a political threat to realisation. Capitalists
have to organise to counter this threat. But the existence of multiple
ongoing struggles in and around the politics of realisation is
undeniable. Organised struggles, resistances and agitations over daily
life issues are commonplace no matter whether they are explicitly meant
as anti-capitalist struggles or not. Marx did not investigate such
questions. He merely notes them in passing. But here the virtue of the
overall framework that he constructs to represent the circulation of
capital becomes more evident.

Realised value can remain capital only by circling back into production
to be ‘valorised’ by the further application of labour in production. It
is at the point of valorisation – when money returns to re-finance the
labour process – that capital encounters its other most persistent
threat of active negation, in the persona of the alienated and
recalcitrant labourer. The working class (however defined) is the
embodiment of anti-value. It is on the basis of this conception of
alienated labour that Tronti, Negri and the Italian autonomistas build
their theory of labour resistance and class struggle at the point of
production.¹² The act of refusal to work is anti-value personified. This
class struggle occurs in the hidden abode of production. It entails a
quite different politics from that between buyers and sellers that
dominates at the moment of realisation. In producing surplus value the
labourer produces capital and reproduces the capitalist. The refusal to
work is a refusal to do either.

In the same way that Marx invokes the idea of a contradictory unity
between production and realisation from the standpoint of continuous
capital accumulation, so there is a parallel need for anti-capitalist
movements to recognise the contradictory unity of struggles over
production and those waged around realisation. On the surface, the
politics of realisation have a very different social structure and
organisational form to that of valorisation. For this reason they are
often treated on the left as entirely separate struggles with
valorisation being prioritised as more important. Yet both sorts of
struggles are subsumed within the overall logic and dynamism of capital
circulation viewed as a totality. Why would their contradictory unity
not be recognised and addressed by anti-capitalist movements?

The study of this contradictory unity reveals much about the
contradictions that will play out in any post-capitalist order in which
social labour – the labour we do for others – is almost certain to
remain a central feature. Any anti-capitalist society will have to
evolve out of the womb of contemporary capitalism, out of that world in
which everything is, as Marx puts it, ‘pregnant with its opposite’.¹³ To
the degree that ‘all economy ultimately reduces itself’ to ‘economy of
time’ so ‘even after the capitalist mode of production is abolished,
though social production remains, the determination of value still
prevails in the sense that the regulation of labour-time and the
distribution of social labour among various production groups becomes
more essential than ever, as well as the keeping of accounts on this’.¹⁴
This would be so, for example, as associated labourers, in command of
their own labour processes and means of production, set about
coordinating their capacities with those of others, while satisfying
their own wants, needs and desires with the help of those others. A
perpetual jousting goes on in Marx’s texts between what value currently
is and what it might be in an anti-capitalist world.¹⁵ The aim, it
seems, is not to abolish value (though there are some who prefer to put
it that way) but to transform its meaning and its content. And in this
jousting, anti-value is constantly being invoked. In this sense,
anti-value constitutes the subterranean soil in which anti-capitalism
can flourish in both theory and practice.

While Marx is undoubtedly correct in seeing the struggle against capital
in the hidden abode of production as different in kind and, therefore,
of deeper political significance than struggles in the market place, we
now clearly see production is not the only place where anti-value is of
significance. Value and anti-value relate within the circulation of
capital in a variety of ways. The role of anti-value is not always
oppositional. It also has a key role in defining and securing capital’s
future. The struggle against anti-value keeps capital on its toes, as it
were. The need to redeem anti-value is a compelling force over value
production.

THE DEBT ECONOMY

This brings us to study the role of debt as a crucial form of
anti-value. The question Marx poses is why and how does debt arise and
what its role might be within a perfectly functioning capitalist mode of
production? Consider the case of long-term fixed capital investments.
Capital is laid out to purchase a machine which has a relatively long
life. The proportion of the value of the machine received back each year
over the lifetime of the machine has to be hoarded (saved) in order to
purchase a new machine when the old machine wears out. Hoarded money is,
however, dead and devalued capital. Anti-value in the form of negated
capital accumulates annually until enough money has been saved to
purchase a new machine when the time is ripe.¹⁶ The savings of consumers
to buy big-ticket items like cars and houses are similarly structured.
Vast amounts of dead capital (or fallow savings hidden under the
mattress in the case of consumers) pile up. The accumulation of hoarded
money savings increases with increasing mechanisation and increasing
consumption of consumer durables. The credit system comes to the rescue.
Money hoarded for whatever purpose can be placed in a bank to be lent
out to other capitalists to earn interest. The industrial capitalist has
in fact a choice: either borrow to buy the machine and pay back the debt
in instalments over the lifetime of the machine or buy the machine
outright and place the annual depreciation on the money market to earn
interest until it is needed to replace the machine.

In either case, the money lent out – the debt incurred – becomes a form
of anti-value that circulates within the credit system as
interest-bearing capital. Trading in debt becomes an active element
within the financial system. This creates greater liquidity and helps
circumvent obstructions to continuous circulation posed by capitals with
radically different turnover times. Money can continue to circulate
smoothly even as commodity production itself is awkwardly lumpy and
often discontinuous. This is what makes the credit system so special
within a capitalist mode of production, differentiating it from all
former constructions. ‘The contradiction of production time and
circulation time contains the entire doctrine of credit,’ Marx notes.
‘The anticipation of the future fruits of labour is … not an invention
of the credit system. It has its roots in the specific mode of
realization, mode of turnover, mode of reproduction of fixed capital.’¹⁷
The credit system forms within the circulation of capital. It is not
superimposed from without.

The immediate role of credit interventions is to resuscitate hoarded
and, therefore, ‘dead’ money capital and put it back in motion. But the
debt is a claim on future value production that can be redeemed only
through value production. If future value production is insufficient to
redeem the debt then there is a crisis. Collisions between value and
anti-value spark periodic monetary and financial crises. In the long
run, capital has to confront ever-escalating claims on future values to
redeem the anti-value building up within the debt economy and credit
system. Instead of an accumulation of values and of wealth, capital
produces an accumulation of debts that have to be redeemed. The future
of value production is foreclosed.

The anti-value of debt becomes one of the principal incentives and
levers to ensure the further production of value and surplus value. The
traditional and conventional view of where the energy propelling capital
circulation comes from has always been the search for profit (the greed)
of individual capitalists. Certainly, the figure of the small business
owner and the enterprising entrepreneur hemmed in by government
regulations frequently emerges as the hero of whatever it is that
supposedly makes capitalism so dynamic. This evocation is probably more
a rhetorical mask than a reality. But the search to maximise profit does
not lead to the maximisation of surplus value production. Profit signals
are misleading if not downright wrong. Following them, Marx shows, may
lead to falling profits and crises. Two solutions then emerge: the
centralisation of capital in large corporations to lessen the force of
competition and/ or state interventions to incentivise accumulation
through effective demand creation and the manipulation of the conditions
of realisation. State and private debt-financing become an important
means to sustain the continuity of value production. This was the case
from 1945 to 1980 throughout much of the capitalist world. Competitive
capitalism ceded ground to state monopoly capitalism while Keynesian
state policies arranged market incentives along quite different lines
focusing on debt-financed aggregate effective demand. This system faced
two difficulties. First, significant segments of the working class were
empowered whose anti-value and anti-capitalist sentiments became all too
clear as the 1960s wore on. Secondly, the shift towards greater and
greater reliance on debt-financing meant enhancing the power of
anti-value via broader flows of interest-bearing capital into the
circulation process of capital. The effect was to lock in value
production way into the future and foreclose upon alternatives unless
some massive disruption broke open a way to default on such obligations.
Hence the debt crises that built up from the mid 1970s onwards
(beginning with the technical default of New York City in 1975
proliferating through the developing world debt crises beginning with
Mexico in 1982).

Valorisation, realisation and distribution have always been in play as
independent but interrelated ‘moments’ (as Marx liked to call them)
within the totality of capital circulation. But their relative
importance has shifted with changing circumstances. The massive
deployment of anti-value within the financial system to ensure future
value production is relatively new. There have also been geographical
shifts. Until very recently capital accumulation in China has been
dominated by state investments in productive consumption (physical
infrastructures) but there may be a dramatic shift underway towards the
liberation of the financial system. Shifts of this sort pose problems
for anti-capitalist opposition. It becomes harder and harder to put a
face to the class enemy while the tentacles of indebtedness spread far
and wide to implicate everyone who carries as much as a single credit
card in their pocket.

Capital initially created debt as anti-value as a solution to specific
problems, such as the dangers of excessive hoarding when dealing with
different turnover times of capital in different industries. The power
of anti-value was used to release all the dormant value and ensure
continuity as far as possible. ‘The boundless drive for enrichment’ may
‘be common to the capitalist and the miser; but while the miser is
merely a capitalist gone mad, the capitalist is a rational miser. The
ceaseless augmentation of value which the miser seeks to attain by
saving his money from circulation, is achieved by the more acute
capitalist by means of throwing his money again and again into
circulation.’¹⁸ And this he could only do if there was an active credit
system and an open money market. Marx lightly touches upon this problem
in Volume 1 of _Capital_. ‘The role of creditor or of debtor results …
from the simple circulation of commodities.’ This relation is implicit
in market exchange. But Marx goes on to hint darkly at how this role is
‘only a reflection of an antagonism which lay deeper, at the level of
the economic conditions of existence’.¹⁹ It is not clear from the text
as to what this deeper antagonism is about. Is Marx referring here to
the hidden dialectic of the value-anti-value relation? I like to think
so.

Relations between debtors and creditors long preceded the rise of
capital as a dominant mode of production. The issue for Marx and for us,
as in the cases of rent and profit on merchant’s capital, is how the
debt-credit relation is perpetuated and transformed into a fundamental
driving force of value in motion and with what consequences over the
course of capital’s history. The development of microfinance in India,
for example, now has some 12 million individuals hooked into having to
pay off loans by producing as much value as they possibly can. If they
cannot do so or actively refuse as a matter of political will, then
their assets (often land and property) are foreclosed upon (this is the
famous trick of the sub-prime mortgage).²⁰ Piling up debt on vulnerable
and marginalised populations is, in short, a way to discipline the
borrowers into being productive labourers (productive defined as
productive of value that can be appropriated by capital in the form of
an exorbitant interest rate). More close to home, the future freedoms of
debt-encumbered students and debt-encumbered homeowners are severely
curtailed. It is no accident that this way of procuring value production
has surged to the fore as capital finds it harder and harder to organise
value production along conventional lines. We will return to this issue
in the conclusion.

On the other side of the ledger, my pension fund is invested in debt in
the belief that the debt will be redeemed.²¹ But if that future does not
materialise then the (fictitious) value of my pension fund disappears
into the black hole of anti-value. Read about the state of pensions in
the world today and you will see a crisis looming of unfunded
liabilities stretching endlessly into the future. National debts appear
even more intimidating. In the same way that individuals are controlled
by their debts so states are weighed down by the anti-value wielded by
their bondholders. The danger exists that the economic system will
collapse under the dead weight of anti-value. What happened to Greece
after 2011 is a small-scale example. When debt becomes so huge that
there is no prospect for future value production to redeem it, then debt
peonage, debt slavery rules. We celebrate Athens of the past as the
cradle of democracy. The Athens of today is the epitome of undemocratic
debt peonage.

The formation and circulation of interest-bearing capital is in effect
the circulation of anti-value. It may seem strange to think of the main
financial centres of today’s global capitalism, such as the City of
London, Wall Street, Frankfurt, Shanghai and the like as centres of
anti-value formation but that is what all those debt-bottling plants
that dominate the skylines in these global cities truly signify. The
danger, which Marx hinted at in his writings on banking, finance and
fictitious capital formation, is that capital will degenerate into one
vast Ponzi scheme in which last year’s debts are retired by borrowing
even more money today. The central banks are currently creating
sufficient new money to prop up stock exchange and asset values for the
benefit of the oligarchy in the here and now. This then leaves the
central bank with the problem of how to retire the debts they have
accumulated on their balance sheets. The scenario of escalating social
inequality that Marx depicted in his conclusion to Volume 1 of _Capital_
will become even more emphatic, though achieved this time by different
mechanisms of financial manipulation and exclusion. The rich grow richer
through financial manipulations while the poor become poorer through the
necessity to redeem their debts (both individual and collective as in
state borrowings). Meanwhile, valorisation seems almost an afterthought,
left to the poorest countries on planet earth to struggle with.

The concept of anti-value reaches it apogee in the massive devaluations
that occur at times of major crises. In Volume 1 of _Capital_ Marx
provides us with a concrete example of how this works. He disputes Say’s
Law (accepted by Ricardo), which states that since every sale implies a
purchase then sales and purchases must always be in equilibrium.
Acceptance of this so-called ‘law’ implies that general crises are
impossible.²² This would be the case in a pure barter economy. In a
monetised economy, however, simple circulation takes the form of
commodity to money to commodity and back again. There is nothing that
impels someone who has sold for money to immediately use that money to
buy another commodity. If all economic agents decide, for some reason
(e.g. a breakdown of faith in the system), to hold and save money, then
circulation ceases and the economy crashes as value is negated. This is
what Keynes later defined as the ‘liquidity trap’. Anti-value prevails
over value because value can remain value only through continuous
motion. The cumulative loss (devaluation) of asset values in the United
States in the crisis of 2007–8 was, for example, something of the order
of $15 trillion (close to the market value of one year’s total output of
goods and services).

The importance of the pairing of value and anti-value in Marx’s thinking
is either ignored or given short shrift in presentations on the subject.
But a dialectical formulation based upon the negation of value (a
formulation that classical and neoclassical economics cannot possibly
grasp given their positivist inclinations) is fundamental to
understanding the crisis tendencies of capital. Whether Marx himself
understood all the implications of this is an interesting question. His
lengthy and often confusing investigation of the British financial
system in Volume 3 shows he understood very well that ‘an accumulation
of money capital means for the most part nothing more than an
accumulation of … claims to production …’²³ Banking and credit were
becoming ‘the most powerful means for driving capitalist production
beyond its own barriers’. They were also becoming a ‘most effective
vehicle for crises and swindling’. An unchecked accumulation of
fictitious capitals could mean that ‘all connection with the actual
process of capital’s valorisation is lost, right down to the last
trace’. The effect would be to confirm the illusion ‘that capital is
automatically valorised by its own powers’.²⁴ I put money in a savings
account and it accrues interest at a compounding rate over time. It
appears magical. I do nothing and it grows!! But now that seems to be
the way in which the whole economy is supposed to grow. No wonder Marx
thought of the financial system as the height of the fetish tendencies
of capitalism.

The credit system is an ‘immanent form of the capitalist mode of
production’ and one of the key powers that impels the endless
accumulation of capital.

The valorisation of capital founded on the antithetical character of
capitalist production permits actual free development only up to a
certain point, which is constantly broken through by the credit system.
The credit system hence accelerates the material development of the
productive forces and the creation of the world market … At the same
time, credit celebrates the violent outbreaks of this contradiction,
crises, and with these the elements of dissolution of the old mode of
production. The credit system has a dual character: on the one hand it
develops the motive of capitalist production, enrichment by the
exploitation of others’ labour, into the purest and most colossal system
of gambling and swindling, and restricts even more the already small
number of the exploiters of social wealth; on the other hand however it
constitutes the form of transition towards a new mode of production. It
is this that gives the principal spokesmen for credit … their nicely
mixed character of swindler and prophet.²⁵

Alas, today’s ‘masters of the universe’, as the Wall Streeters are often
called, have performed far better as swindlers, even as they cultivate
the art of false prophecy to justify their swindling. Alas also, there
are few signs that the evolution of the credit system and the clearly
increasing power of the circulation of interest-bearing capital to
dictate futures constitute a transitional stepping stone towards the
emergence of some new mode of production. Indeed, the imaginary we are
left with is of a horde of insatiably greedy investors possessed of deep
enough pockets to buy off almost any serious opposition, force-feeding
the rest of the world a diet of indigestible credit money.

Why would financiers celebrate the violent outbreaks of crises? At first
blush this seems counter-intuitive. But when it comes to the circulation
of anti-value then a crisis is indeed a moment of triumph for the forces
of anti-value even as it visits despair upon all those engaged in the
production and realisation of value. ‘In a crisis,’ said the banker
Andrew Mellon way back in the 1920s, ‘assets return to their rightful
owners’, i.e. him.²⁶ Crises typically leave in their wake a mass of
devalued assets that can be picked up at fire-sale prices by those who
have the cash (or privileged connections) to pay for them. This is what
happened in 1997–8 in East and Southeast Asia. Perfectly viable firms
went bankrupt for lack of liquidity, were bought out by foreign banks
and then sold back a few years later at a huge profit.

In crises Marx typically evokes the possibility of (1) the physical
_destruction_ and degradation of use values, (2) the forced monetary
_depreciation_ of exchange values and (3) a concomitant _devaluation_ of
values as the only ‘rational’ way to overcome the irrationality of
overaccumulation.²⁷ Notice the language here. Each of the forms involved
– use value, exchange value and value – is subject to a specific form of
negation and one form does not automatically imply the other.
Devaluation and the depreciation of exchange values do not necessarily
mean the physical destruction of the use values. The latter can become
free goods for the revival of capitalist accumulation. This is one of
the ways in which anti-value works to restore the conditions of value
production. An underground system that went bankrupt (devaluing the
underground and depreciating the investors’ capital) left behind the use
value of the tunnels that we still use when we travel the London
Underground. The depreciation of housing values in the crisis of 2007–8
in the United States left behind a huge stock of housing use values that
could be bought up by private equity companies and hedge funds for a
song and put back into profitable use. Marx was fully aware of such
possibilities. He notes how capital ‘undertakes _investments_ which do
not pay and which pay only as soon as they have become in a certain
degree _devalued_ … (and) the many undertakings where the first
_investment_ is sunk and lost, the first entrepreneurs go bankrupt – and
begin to realize themselves only at second or third hand, where the
investment capital has become smaller owing to _devaluation_’.²⁸ By the
same token, a rapid appreciation of exchange values (e.g. in land and
property markets) does not necessarily imply any increase in values and
may not mean any substantial improvement in use values.

THE DEAD WEIGHT OF UNPRODUCTIVE LABOUR

The theory of anti-value has to embrace a whole range of activities
which are not productive of value even though they are essential and
necessary to the functioning of capital. This brings us to the fraught
question of unproductive labour, which was discussed at great length by
Adam Smith.

Marx agreed that workers employed in circulation (e.g. in marketing) do
not produce value (otherwise he would have to concede that value could
be produced by market exchange). They can, however, be a source of
surplus value. They are like machines which cannot produce value but
whose use can increase relative surplus value by lowering the costs of
wage goods and so diminishing the value of labour power thereby
producing more surplus value for the capitalist. Costs entailed in
circulation and state administration, Marx argued, should be viewed as
deductions out of value and surplus value production.²⁹ Costs of
circulation in the market (other than those of transportation), no
matter whether borne by the industrial or merchant capitalist, are
considered as necessary deductions from potential value already
produced. Economies in these circulation costs and reductions in
circulation times amount, says Marx, to ‘reducing the negation of
created values’. But if less has to be deducted because of increasing
the rate of exploitation of unproductive labour, then more surplus value
is left over for the capitalist. Unproductive but socially necessary
activities like bookkeeping, retailing and proper state regulation and
law enforcement are not inherently anti-capitalist.

But if everyone tries to make a living by such means, while nobody
engages in production, then capital would die out. Anti-value would
prevail. The conclusion is obvious: excessive (as opposed to socially
necessary) absorption of labour power in circulation (which does not
produce value) along with hyper-bureaucratisation that produces no value
(within corporations as well as in the state sector) is a threat to the
reproduction of capital even without being explicitly anti-capitalist in
form or intent. It is one of the accidental ways in which value in
motion can gum up. Bloated costs and increasing inefficiencies of
circulation, regulation and bureaucratic supports (including policing)
can absorb vast amounts of value unproductively. If, as some
conventional economists argue, far too much of the US economy is
currently directed to ‘busy but useless’ activities then this acts as a
drag upon value and surplus value production and circulation. Hence,
some hypothesise, the ‘great stagnation’ of contemporary capitalism. It
is standard fare in almost all right wing critiques of the state, that
excessive regulation and bureaucratisation is the big enemy of market
freedoms and hence of full-fledged capitalist development which
supposedly benefits everyone. It was, of course, Marx’s most signal
accomplishment to show definitively in Volume 1 of _Capital_ that
totally unregulated free market capitalism would not benefit everyone
but merely concentrate ever more wealth and power in the top 1 per cent.
But the right wing critique has more than an element of truth in
emphasising the deleterious effects upon value production and
circulation of excessive resort to unproductive labour.

Economies and increasing efficiencies in the necessary costs of
circulation are, therefore, crucial, Marx argued, if unproductive labour
were not to become a major if unwitting locus of anti-value. One
unsurprising result is that conditions of exploitation of living labour
in these unproductive activities can be as vicious (and in some
instances even more so) as in production.

The balance between socially necessary and excessive unproductive labour
is hard to define. Much of the political debate about the regulatory
environment is precisely caught up in trying to establish adequate
norms. On this point Marx’s discussion of the regulation of the length
of the working day provides an interesting template. Fierce
inter-capitalist competition for absolute surplus value leads to such
extensions of the working day and intensity of labour as to endanger the
workers’ life, health and ability to labour. It was, therefore,
necessary, even from the standpoint of capital, to institute some
collective forms of regulation, to put a floor under competition, as it
were, so as to protect capital from the destructive effects on their
labour force of ruinous competition. But if the organised power of
labour in alliance with other interests became increasingly powerful so
as to restrict the length of the working day even more dramatically,
then this would constitute an anti-capitalist threat from the other
direction. The adjudication between the rights of labour and the rights
of capital over working hours depends on the balance of class forces:
‘between equal rights, force decides’.³⁰ The balance between productive
and unproductive labour in any capitalist social formation is likewise
arrived at by the playing out of social and political processes and
struggles.

THE DIRECT POLITICS OF ANTI-VALUE

Anti-capitalist activities and politics, based in devising alternative
ways of living outside of commodity production and exchange, are
widespread, though often small scale. If, as Ollman insists, value _is_
alienated labour, then the political quest for an unalienated existence
entails the active and conscious negation of the capitalist law of value
in individual and collective lives. There are various forms of
anti-value politics. Solidarity economies and intentional communities,
for example, may seek to ensure their own reproduction beyond the reach
of value production.³¹ Their exchange relations among themselves as well
as with others will not necessarily be based on market mechanisms.
Anarchist communes, religious-based communities and indigenous social
orders constitute heterotopic spaces within the interstices of the
capitalist system but outside of the rule of the law of value. There is
always the danger that such non-value producing activities will either
be appropriated by capital as a basis for value production (e.g.
appropriated or taken as a free gift of human nature) or function as
some kind of reserve for the reproduction of the industrial reserve army
of increasingly redundant and disposable labourers.

Capital creates openings for oppositional politics as it circulates and
expands. Through its mobilisation of the powers of art, science and
technology, capital, despite itself, creates an opposition between the
rule of value as socially necessary labour time on the one hand and
disposable labour time or ‘not labour time’ on the other. It tends ‘on
the one side to create disposable time, on the other to convert it into
surplus labour time. If it succeeds too well at the first, then it
suffers from surplus production, and then necessary labour is
interrupted, because no surplus labour can be realised by capital.’³²
The inability to realise value then becomes an insurmountable barrier.
‘The more this contradiction develops, the more does it become evident
that the growth of the forces of production can no longer be bound up
with the appropriation of alien labour, but that the mass of the workers
must themselves appropriate their own surplus labour.’ This should allow
‘the development of the power of social production such that …
disposable time will grow for all. For real wealth is the developed
productive power of all individuals. The measure of wealth is then not
any longer, in any way, labour time, but rather disposable time.’³³ The
workers can recover that immeasurable sense of value that they lost in
the original (fictional) wage labour contract with capital that
condemned them to an alienated existence in which the valorisation of
capital became their singular destiny.

Here we encounter some interesting political paradoxes. Much of the
concern in recent critical commentaries has been to incorporate
knowledge and science, unpaid household work and the ‘free gifts’ of
nature into the value calculus. Are they not, after all, a source of
value? Marx’s answer is that they are analogous to the case of machines:
they cannot be a source of value as capital defines it even as they are
a source of relative surplus value for the capitalist class insofar as
they contribute to the productivity of labour power. There currently is
a widespread desire to incorporate the hitherto ‘not valued’ into the
regime of capitalist value production and circulation. This strategy is
understandable (partly because of the positive connotations that a term
like value has and the understandable demand for recognition of what is
all too often ignored). But it gets things entirely the wrong way round
politically. It fails to understand the dialectical role of not- or
anti-value (and of unalienated labour and disposable time) in
oppositional politics. It is from the spaces of not-value and
unalienated labour that a deep and widespread popular critique of the
capitalist mode of production and its distinctive form of value and its
alienations can be mounted. And it is from these sites too that the
lineaments of a post-capitalist economy might best be identified. To be
a producer of value and surplus value within a capitalist mode of
production is, Marx noted, not a blessing but ‘a misfortune’.³⁴

Knowledge, information, cultural activities and the like can all be
commodified and integrated into capitalism. At the same time their
potential for unalienated and free activity forms a cutting edge for
anti-capitalist politics. From this contradictory position cultural
producers of all sorts form a significant potential block for radical
political action. The search for an unalienated life among cultural
producers in the face of the appropriation of their products by a
parasitical rentier class is a growing point of tension. But for the
most part their politics revolves around conditions of realisation even
as their conditions of production are a contested terrain of capitalist
control.

Likewise, the fact that household labour does not enter into the value
calculus suggests this as another potential site for the articulation of
an anti-capitalist politics (presuming that its own internal
contradictions and alienations with respect to gender, patriarchy,
sexuality and child-rearing practices and the like can be resolved).
Even as more and more household labour activities become com-modified
and taken into the market (everything from take-out food to nails and
hair cutting), labour time spent in the household increases in spite of
(some would say because of) the advent of labour-saving household
technologies (washing machines and robot vacuum cleaners). But the
labour done for others within households and across the broader social
solidarities configured around the production and protection of the
commons, can become a powerful antidote to the dominance of capitalist
commodity production and its associated social relations. Granting wages
for housework (if it were realistic which fortunately it is not) simply
reassures us that household labours can in principle be integrated into
the capitalist mode of production (and accorded the status of alienated
labour). The ‘wages for housework’ campaign launched by feminists in the
1970s was a brilliant intervention that focused attention on the gross
neglect of gender questions in the Marxist tradition but was entirely
wrong-headed (as some of its proponents later freely admitted) in the
political remedies it proposed.³⁵ None of this would have occurred, I
submit, had the relation between value and anti-value within a
capitalist mode of production been more fully appreciated.

There have been parallel moves to integrate the free gifts of nature
into the stream of value production by some arbitrary valuation devices
(e.g. those proposed by environmental economists). This amounts to
nothing more than a sophisticated green-washing and commodification of a
space from which a fierce attack upon the hegemony of the capitalist
mode of production and its (and our) alienated relation to nature
through commodification can be mounted. These are all typical spaces
from which an anti-capitalist critique can be fashioned. Yet the
predominant political movement in recent times is for their integration
into the value theory framework! If value under capitalism is about the
production of alienated labour and the alienated labourer, then why on
earth would anyone who is a progressive campaign to be subsumed within
such a regime?

Devaluation, finally, can also hit the labourer as bearer of the
commodity labour power. Wages are curtailed and the health and
well-being of the labourer are threatened even as labourers retain their
skills and labour capacities. During the effective nationalisation of
General Motors in 2008, for example, a dual employment structure emerged
in which the older workers maintained their wages and benefits while new
workers were hired at much lower wages and with far weaker benefits. The
devaluation of labour power and the depreciation of its values when
prolonged or deepened can lead to physical destruction of the laboring
population, even as capital usually falls far short of that for obvious
reasons. But none of this passes by without eliciting some sort of
political response from the labourers (both individual and collective).

The power of anti-value has to be confronted in relation to the value
theory. If, as I suspect, this is ‘the deeper antagonism’ buried in the
gut of capital circulating as value in motion, then making this
contradiction legible is one important step towards confronting the debt
peonage which increasingly seems enabled to dictate not only our
contemporary social relations and well-being, but also our prospects for
a future life. The fact that so many find it harder to envisage the end
of capitalism than the end of the world has everything to do with the
fact that the future of capital accumulation is foreclosed in a towering
volume of debt as anti-value. For many, the only seeming hope is that
some external intervention – an apocalyptic event of some sort – will
save us. It will not. The only thing that can save us is an explicit
winding down if not demolition of the tower of debt that dictates our
future.

Anti-value signals the potential for breakdown in the continuity of
capital circulation. It prefigures how capital’s crisis tendencies can
take different forms and move around from one moment (e.g. production)
to another (e.g. realisation).³⁶ This insight is also crucial. Alas, it
is often ignored. Crises do not, Marx tells us (contrary to much popular
opinion), necessarily spell the end of capitalism but set the stage for
its renewal. It is here that we see most clearly the dialectical role of
anti-value in the reproduction of capital. ‘Crises are never more than
momentary, violent solutions for the existing contradictions, violent
eruptions that re-establish the disturbed balance for the time being.’³⁷
But the reconstitution of capital is insecure and has limits. An
accumulation of debts (claims on future value production) may outrun the
capacity to produce and realise values and surplus values in the future.
Even if the debts are successfully redeemed, the obligation to repay
them forecloses on alternative futures. Debt peonage shackles the future
for persons as well as for whole economies.³⁸ This is a theme to which
we will return by way of conclusion.


5 Prices without Values

The qualitative incongruity between value and price is troubling and may
be more significant than Marx allowed. The contradiction between them
may have sharpened over time. If investors seek speculative gains in
price-fixing markets for assets which have no value (such as art objects
or currency and carbon futures) instead of investing in value and
surplus value creation, then this indicates a pathway by which value can
be leached out of the general circulation of capital to circulate as
money in fictitious markets where no direct value production (as opposed
to appropriation) occurs. When price signals betray the values they are
supposed to represent then investors are bound to make erroneous
decisions. If the money rate of profit is highest in property markets or
other forms of asset speculation then a rational capitalist will place
their money there rather than in the sphere of productive activity. The
rational capitalist behaves irrationally from the standpoint of the
reproduction process of capital as an evolving totality. The result
could be a deepening tendency towards secular stagnation in the economy
as a whole.

This may be counteracted by the fact that some use values enter into
capitalist production as ‘free gifts’. This occurs when the ‘object of
labour … is something provided by nature free of charge, as in the case
of metals, minerals, coal, stone, etc.’.¹ While capital rests materially
on its metabolic relation with nature, this does not mean that nature in
itself has value. It is a storehouse of free gifts that capital can use
without paying anything. Such use values may, however, acquire a price
if they are enclosed and become the private property of another. Their
owner is then in a position to extract a money rent from these resources
even though they have no value. The same applies to built environments,
cleared and cultivated landscapes and cultural artefacts inherited from
long ago. What is sometimes referred to as ‘second nature’ is also a
treasure trove of free gifts to perform as use values in production.²
Similar ‘donations’ of ‘free goods’ to capital can be extracted from the
work of households, from the products of self-sufficient peasant and
other non-commodity producing populations. ‘While the maintenance and
reproduction of the working class,’ says Marx, ‘remains a necessary
condition for the reproduction of capital … the capitalist may safely
leave this to the workers’ drives for self-preservation and
propagation.’³ Even the self-learned skills of the labourers can be
appropriated by capital free of charge. This is particularly the case
with skills learned on the job and the storing of that knowledge in the
brain of the worker. ‘The socially productive power of labour develops
as a free gift to capital whenever the workers are placed under certain
conditions, and it is capital that places them under these conditions.
Because this power costs capital nothing, while on the other hand it is
not developed by the worker until his labour itself belongs to capital,
it appears as a power which capital possesses by its nature …’⁴
Experienced workers may, however, extract a monopoly rent for their
skills if these skills are difficult to reproduce. Capital, as a result,
wages a war against the reproduction of monopolisable skills in the
labour force. The rapidly changing status of computer programmers in
recent years – from skilled experts to routine workers – is a case in
point.

These are not residual practices inherited from long ago. What workers
learn by doing the job is an increasingly powerful feature of capital’s
political economy. But it is a power of labour that appears to be and is
appropriated as a power of capital as a free good. Consider the sobering
case of contemporary digital labour. Writes Michel Bauwens, founding
member of the P2P Foundation: ‘Under the regime of cognitive capitalism,
use value creation expands exponentially, but exchange value only rises
linearly, and is nearly exclusively realized by capital, giving rise to
forms of hyper-exploitation … While in classic neoliberalism, labour
income stagnates, in hyper-neoliberalism, society is deproletarianised,
i.e. waged labour is increasingly replaced by isolated and mostly
precarious freelancers; more use value escapes the labour form
altogether’ and ‘the use value creators go totally unrewarded in terms
of exchange value, which is solely realized by the proprietary
platforms’.⁵ The average hourly income of those actually doing the work
‘does not exceed 2 dollars, which is way below the U.S. minimum wage’.
The price form here conceals the ‘hyper-exploitation’ in what Bauwens
considers to be a new ‘neo-feudal’ value regime that is even worse than
traditional capitalism. This regime ‘relies increasingly on unpaid
“corvee” and creates widespread debt peonage’. This means a system of
political economy based on the voluntary labour applied in
commons-oriented peer production. What was initially conceived as a
liberatory regime of collaborative production of an open access commons
has been transformed into a regime of hyper-exploitation upon which
capital freely feeds. The unrestrained pillage by big capital (like
Amazon and Google) of the free goods produced by a self-skilled labour
force has become a major feature of our times. This carries over into
the so-called cultural industries. Inventive and creative work is
mercilessly traded upon and plucked out by agents and cultural
entrepreneurs and converted into profitable commerce. We need to look
more closely at the position of this sort of labour in relation to value
and surplus value creation and appropriation. This brings us to the
question of the role of ‘cognitive capitalism’ in contemporary debates,
which rests in turn on the question of the value productivity of
creative activity and knowledge production.⁶

Consider how mental conceptions, knowledge and the imagination affect
and relate to the circulation of capital. How do they relate to value
and surplus value production? The theorists of cognitive capitalism make
much of the idea that knowledge has become a form of value which
circulates as capital. The economy used to be commodity-based and it is
now knowledge-based, they say. Much of the knowledge produced these days
certainly has a price given the rise of intellectual property rights as
a crucial feature of contemporary capitalism. But the case for it as
value that circulates is far-fetched and not established. Scientific and
technical knowledge in particular is one of those items that can have a
price but no value. It is built up bit by bit over many generations and
should, according to Marx, be a free good, a gift of the cultural
history of human nature, freely available to anyone who wants to use it.
The fact that the knowledge commons is increasingly being enclosed,
privatised and turned into a commodity tells us something about the
contemporary trajectory of capitalism.

But the cognitive capitalists insist that this is the direction that
Marx pointed to in the _Grundrisse_. In a much-cited passage he examines
how products of ‘the general intellect’ affect the dynamics of
accumulation. Marx focuses not on knowledge as a form of value but on
how knowledge and mental capacities – the free gifts of human nature –
get incorporated into the fixed capital of production of value so as to
raise the productivity of labour to the point where labour, the agent of
value production, becomes redundant (the turn to artificial intelligence
in our own times is an example). This, Marx suggests, will render the
labour theory of value redundant. The object of Marx’s investigation is
the fixed capital and not the knowledge _per se_.⁷ All those knowledges
that cannot be embedded in fixed capital are irrelevant. Marx is
interested only in those forms of knowledge that can increase the
productivity of labour. In this, management science is as important as
genetic engineering and knowing how to build jet engines.

There is, however, a vital question as to how human imagination and
creativity – free gifts of human nature – can be mobilised and
appropriated to produce a technology or an organisational form as a
commodity for sale in the market. ‘What distinguishes the worst
architect from the best of bees is this: that the architect builds the
cell in his mind before he constructs it in wax.’⁸ Ideas, knowledges and
imagination, being free gifts of human nature, can perform as key use
value inputs into the technologies of production. The positioning of
human imagination in the labour process is significant. The human
imagination, no matter how fertile or febrile, does not arise in a
vacuum. The context of any new knowledge construction is always that of
existing experiences and the diverse ways of understanding and
interpreting that experience through language, concepts, narratives and
pre-existing stories. The free gifts of human nature have a continuing
vital role in defining what can be made and how it might be profitably
produced. The long-standing critique of capital as a system in part
focuses on the frustration of the creative potentialities of the mass of
the population as capital takes control of not only what is being
produced and how it shall be produced but goes on to appropriate the
intellectual and cultural works of others as if they are its own. When
the worst of architects is employed in a firm of architects selling
plans and designs to capitalist developers or a research biologist works
for Monsanto on isolating DNA sequences in plants that have been evolved
over millennia in order to patent rights to cultivate those plants, then
the human imagination is corralled and appropriated to the cause of
surplus value production and appropriation. Marx extends this idea to
the field of cultural production:

Milton, who wrote _Paradise Lost_, was an unproductive worker. On the
other hand, a writer who turns out work for his publisher in factory
style is a productive worker. Milton produced _Paradise Lost_ as a
silkworm produces silk, as the activity of _his own_ nature. He later
sold his product for £5 and thus became a merchant. But the literary
proletarian of Leipzig who produces books, such as compendia on
political economy, at the behest of his publisher is pretty nearly a
productive worker since his production is taken over by capital and only
occurs in order to increase it. A singer who sings like a bird is an
unproductive worker. If she sells her song for money, she is to that
extent a wage labourer or merchant. But if the same singer is engaged by
an entrepreneur who makes her sing to make money, then she becomes a
productive worker, since she _produces_ capital directly. A schoolmaster
who instructs others is not a productive worker. But a schoolmaster who
works for wages in an institution along with others, using his own
labour to increase the money of the entrepreneur who owns the
knowledge-mongering institution, is a productive worker.⁹

The definition of ‘productive’ here refers to the production of surplus
value. Milton created no value when he wrote _Paradise Lost_. When he
sold the exclusive right to someone else to use its content for £5 he
expanded the sphere of monetary circulation without contributing to
value production. The right to use the content has a price but no value.
Such a commodity sale presupposes the existence of a legal system that
enshrines exclusive intellectual property rights to content. Only when a
publisher organised as a capitalist enterprise prints _Paradise Lost_ in
book commodity form does the possibility of value and surplus value
production and realisation enter into the picture. The realisation of
the value and surplus value congealed in the book as a commodity
depends, however, on someone somewhere having the want, need and desire
for such a book backed up by the ability to pay. But it is not any old
book that is involved here, only a book with the unique and exclusive
content of _Paradise Lost_. The uniqueness of this content can and often
does allow for the possibility to charge a monopoly price and extract a
monopoly rent, way above that warranted by the labour content of the
book as a physical object. Furthermore, if the book is a first edition
it may sell at an astronomical price as a collector’s item.

It is this that often confuses the cognitive capitalists because it
seems as if there is something about creative intellectual and cultural
labour that makes its product exceptional and unique while the price
seems to increase through the addition of something called ‘reputational
value’, which has nothing to do with labour content.¹⁰

On the other hand, no value or surplus value exists if the book lies
gathering dust in a warehouse. Milton, therefore, created the condition
of possibility for value production and the extraction of a monopoly
rent when he wrote _Paradise Lost_, but it took several more steps
before that condition of possibility could be realised through the
circulation of capital.

The world is awash with writings awaiting a publisher. Putting a price
upon them and circulating them in intellectual property markets would be
potentially limitless. But this does not contribute to value and surplus
value production. It merely heightens the contradiction between value
and its monetary expression. In the process it further leaches value out
of the circulation process of capital. The market for intellectual
property rights and for collector’s items can expand rapidly, with
negative effects upon the production and accumulation of value. Cutting
taxes on the ultra-rich may concentrate money power for investment. But
if the rich prefer to invest in the art market (as is often the case)
then this does nothing for value creation. Rising inequalities in income
and wealth are in fact associated with secular stagnation in value
production and ever-rising prices for Picassos.

Non-values (such as those generated in peer-to-peer computing) are
converted gratis into use values for capital by a simple act of
enclosure, commodification and appropriation. The degree to which value
production rests on a basis of such free gifts varies, but is
omnipresent in advanced capitalism.¹¹ It is not only the free gifts of
nature that are involved. History, culture, knowledge, artistic
constructions, skills and practices can all be enclosed, their content
(like Milton’s _Paradise Lost_) appropriated, commodified and traded at
a price independently of any value they may ultimately engender. There
is a lot of, for the most part, free and unalienated ‘silkworm’ labour
that goes on in society, but as soon as the content is formed, then the
enclosure, appropriation, monetisation and trading begins.

In the case of scientific and technical knowledge the free gifts of
human creativity and of ‘silkworm labour’ enter into the circulation of
capital in a different way. But Marx is only interested in the creations
of what he called ‘the general intellect’ insofar as they affect the
productivity of labour through the fixed capital formation.¹² His
specific concern is with how technological and scientific knowledges
become embedded in the fixed capital of production, so as to both
displace and disempower labour through automation (and in our own times
through robots and artificial intelligence). Scientific knowledge in
itself Marx considers to be a free good.¹³ If all else remains equal,
then the displacement and disempowerment of labour from production
through technological changes tends to shrink the contribution of
labour, the active agent of value production. This invites us to
consider what might happen when value and surplus value diminish or even
disappear from circulation altogether even as the volume of physical
commodities being cast into circulation rapidly increases because of
rising productivity. The gap between the increasing physical production
of commodities and their pricing and the decreasing social production of
value and surplus value widens catastrophically, enunciating, in the
view of many Marxists, the ineluctable path towards the final collapse
of capitalism.

The German school of critical value theorists, inspired by the work of
Robert Kurz, has been most vociferous in enunciating this view. But they
do not argue that such a collapse is imminent.¹⁴ Proponents of this
theory (including Marx himself in some respects) see this contradiction
as harbouring a long-run tendency towards stagnation, falling profits
and the increasing constriction of value and surplus value production
and realisation as a correlate of the persistent preference within
capitalism towards labour-saving innovations.

One obvious antidote is to open up new lines of productive activity
which are labour intensive to compensate for the loss of jobs in
manufacturing and the more traditional sectors of value production. In
recent times, for example, labour-intensive sectors such as logistics,
transportation and food preparation (associated with a burgeoning
tourist trade) have expanded significantly. Labour has increasingly been
absorbed into everything from long-term infrastructural provisions to
the staging of spectacles (that are almost instantaneously consumed so
as to conform to the capitalist ideal of zero circulation time). Some of
the labour released by the robotisation and automation of industrial
jobs has been absorbed in these ways. The balance between job losses and
job gains seems to be on a knife-edge although there is a rough
consensus that the qualitative degradation of jobs underpins
increasingly widespread alienation in workforces.

The other option is to increase the flow of free goods as inputs into
capitalist production and to prevent the appropriation and extraction of
monopoly rents from these flows. It is interesting that Marx thought a
reduction in rents and taxes was one way to counteract falling
profits.¹⁵ It is also interesting that some of the most vigorous sectors
of development in our times – like Google and Facebook and the rest of
the digital labour sector – have grown very fast on the back of free
labour. It is also significant that the so-called ‘cultural industries’,
which draw heavily upon the unalienated and creative labour of the
‘silkworm’ sort, have expanded rapidly as fields of capitalist
organisation and endeavour in recent years.

A lot of what goes on within capitalism is driven by activities in
price-fixing markets that have nothing directly to do with value
production except when use values are created which facilitate
production of surplus value. This puts many activities and exchanges
outside of the sphere of value production and circulation even as they
are relevant to it as use value inputs. Tourism which trades upon free
gifts of nature, of history, culture and natural spectacles as costless
inputs which have no value is capitalistically organised and thereby
produces value and surplus value. Some ambiguity arises because the
preservation of and access to a commodified history, culture and even
natural spectacle requires a labour of maintenance of qualities and of
access. The mix of free gifts and of commodity values within a tourist
package is intriguing. Such labour can also be capitalistically
organised and hence contribute to value and surplus value production.
This does not obviate the fact that many of the basic use value inputs
into the production process of the tourist industry are free goods (e.g.
sunny beaches or cultural heritage) which may acquire a money price even
if they are of no value (unless they have been recently produced in the
course of the invention of history, tradition and culture in the Disney
mode). If historical and cultural artefacts do acquire a prior price
then this is usually in the form of monopoly rent.¹⁶ They can continue
to be free goods only if they remain in the commons, unenclosed and not
subject to appropriation as private property. Enclosure permits the
prior appropriation of rent by owners before allowing access to the
otherwise free goods of history, culture and nature. We experience the
same thing when an entrance fee is required to enter a cathedral or view
an ancient monument. While the fee may be justified as a cost of
maintenance and access it can go way higher than that to furnish a basis
for the extraction of a monopoly rent for the owner. In all of these
sectors there are active and engaging struggles over what can remain in
the commons and what might be enclosed to ensure the extraction of
monopoly rents.

The treatment of the knowledge incorporated in production is in
substance no different from that of the tourist industry’s appropriation
of history, culture and fantasy. Science and technological innovation
can, as Marx recognised, become a business in its own right organised
along capitalistic lines, even though scientific and technological
knowledge in its own right, like history, culture and the land, is a
part of the global commons, which in principle should be a free good.
But in practice a price is exacted for access to much of it through
patents, licences, intellectual property rights and the like.

The difference between formal and real subsumption of labour under
capital is significant here.¹⁷ Marx’s purpose in introducing this
distinction was to mark the transition between labour processes which
remained under the control of the labourer versus labour processes
designed and controlled by capital. Capitalism in the so-called
manufacturing period typically made use of traditional artisanal skills
and put them together through cooperation and divisions of labour into a
production process such as building a coach. The main source of surplus
value in such a system is absolute surplus value – the extension of
labour time way beyond the socially necessary labour time required to
reproduce labour power. Capital controls the product and its value but
not the labour process. This contrasts with the factory system in which
capital controls the labour process even to the point of subjecting the
activities of the labourer to an external source of power under the
command of capital. Relative surplus value, derived from rising
productivity in the production of wage goods (the commodities required
to reproduce labour power), here becomes dominant. While absolute
surplus value remains the basis, relative surplus value production,
which often rests on the privileged understandings derived from science
and technology, becomes the driving force in the evolution of capital.
But this is not always the case. In the case of digital labour, for
example, labour practices have emerged that are uncannily similar to the
putting out system of early textile manufacturing in Britain in the late
eighteenth century. Putting out systems also characterised industrial
structures in Paris throughout much of the nineteenth century. Zola’s
_L’Assomoir_ provides a stunning example of such a labour system at work
in nineteenth century Paris. For many years the success of the Japanese
car industry rested on the basis of subcontracting to small workshops
for the production of many of its parts. The formal–real distinction,
like the absolute–relative distinction, is more dialectical than
teleological in its application.

With such a yawning and ever increasing gap between value and its
monetary form of representation, it is tempting to see the latter as the
essence of what capital is about and to redefine capital as money in
motion rather than value in motion. Such a redefinition facilitates
concentration on the churning speculative market in property rights to
culture, knowledge and entrepreneurial endeavours as well as to the
widespread practices of speculation in asset markets as the distinctive
form of contemporary capitalism. Hence the claim that we are entering a
new phase of capitalism in which knowledge is pre-eminent and that a
brilliant techno-utopia based on that knowledge and all its
labour-saving innovations (such as automation and artificial
intelligence) is just around the corner or, as someone like Paul Mason
maintains, already here.¹⁸ Such a redefinition may look about right from
the perspective of Silicon Valley,¹⁹ but it falls flat on its face in
the collapsing factories of Bangladesh and the suicide-ridden employment
zones of both industrial Shenzhen and rural India where microfinance has
spread its net to foster the mother of all sub-prime lending crises. The
churning and speculative profiteering that has characterised many asset
markets in recent times (particularly with respect to housing, land and
property) has undoubtedly redistributed values. But it does not in
itself support any increase in value creation lest it be through the
conversion of at least some of the monetary gains back into capital to
seek valorisation or through the generation of effective demand
sufficient to facilitate realisation.

We here encounter a second ‘Great Contradiction’ with which capital is
confronted. The first arose out of the search for relative surplus value
which concentrates on labour-saving technological changes which, if they
succeed, diminish the labour force from which value and surplus value
has to be extracted. The second is a potential tendency for capital in
searching to maximise its monetary profit to be drawn to invest in areas
that produce no value or surplus value at all. Taken to extremes, either
of these tendencies could be fatal to the reproduction of capital. In
combination, and the contemporary evidence is that both trends are
discernible, they could be catastrophic.

The typical neoclassical response to all of this (as well as that of
some working in the Marxist tradition) is to say that if it is the
monetary aspects of all of this and pricing politics that are becoming
hegemonic, then why bother with values at all (which is the neoclassical
position) or why not evolve a monetary theory of value (as some Marxists
currently propose) as the only feasible response to the theoretical
dilemmas we are here encountering).²⁰ In so doing they cut off any
possibility of explaining the secular stagnation that seems to be the
prevailing condition of contemporary global capitalism and lose track of
the importance of anti-value to value circulation. Such a move may
permit both the revisionist Marxists and the neoclassical economists to
take the reassuring and comforting position that all will be well with
global capitalism once it has settled back into the equilibrium
conditions dictated by perfectly functioning and properly regulated
price-fixing markets. The same is true for those Marxists who either
explicitly embrace a monetary theory of capital (such that capital is
defined not as ‘value in motion’ but as ‘money in motion’ or, even more
vulgarly, that capital is nothing more than money being used to make
more money by whatever means possible). To ignore the money-value
contradiction altogether is to cut off an important, though admittedly
complicated avenue to understand the dilemmas of contemporary capital
accumulation. It is only from the latter perspective that a critique can
be offered to analyses which increasingly rely on sophisticated
dissection of big data sets, failing to recognise that most of the
empirical data are money measures which can and do diverge from if not
betray the immaterial social relation they are supposed to represent.
And this is so even without introducing the problems of how money is
created and appropriated in the course of the movement of value through
the fields of distribution. When the Federal Reserve and the European
Central Bank engage in quantitative easing they create money in the
absence of value. When that money circulates as interest-bearing capital
it functions as the anti-value that must be and supposedly will be
redeemed by future value and surplus value production. But when the
money released circulates into asset markets like property, the stock
market and the art market then the anti-value is not redeemed even as
the ultra-rich get even wealthier from their speculations. A strong
incentive then exists to create even more anti-value to redeem that
issued earlier. The result is not only secular stagnation in value
production but the creation of a Ponzi capitalism which is the dangerous
path of endless monetary expansion we have recently been taking. If we
accept a purely monetary theory of capital, then it becomes much harder
to formulate the trenchant critiques of contemporary capitalism that
Kurz and his colleagues have articulated. We lose the power to unravel
the contradiction as to how the increasing concentration of monetary
wealth necessarily occurs at the expense of the rest of humanity whose
wants, needs and desires are not backed by an ability to pay. The wants,
needs and desires of the mass of the population remain unfulfilled while
the rich expand their taste for Picassos.


6 The Question of Technology

The question of technology is foundational for understanding the
dynamics of capital in motion. Marx is one of the most incisive and
prescient commentators on this topic. This is not to say his analyses
are complete or can pass unchallenged. Technology in combination with
science is a major focus throughout Volume 1 of _Capital_ but is held
constant in Volume 2. In Volume 3 he deals with some of the consequences
of technological change for profits and rents along with occasional
comments on certain technological and organisational features of
financial intermediation and monetary circulation. Marx’s main focus in
_Capital_ is on the role of technology and science in relation to the
valorisation of capital and the production of commodities. In the
_Grundrisse_ he adopts a more expansive stance and provides intense,
sometimes speculative and prescient commentaries on technological
issues. But there is nothing substantial in his works about the
technologies of realisation and circulation (apart from transport) or of
social reproduction (including the reproduction of labour power) and the
technologies of distribution are not systematically scrutinised either.
The upshot is a rather one-sided view of technological and
organisational change.

But Marx had good reason to take this position. Technical and
organisational changes occur in the history of human societies all over
the place and for all sorts of reasons affecting all sorts of
activities. It sometimes seems that the technical and organisational
ingenuity of human beings knows no bounds. Some of the new techniques
and organisational forms last and some of them do not. Ancient China had
a long history of remarkable technical and organisational innovations
none of which were widely adopted or lasted. Only under capitalism do we
find a systematic and powerful force for technological and
organisational dynamism that is sustained and cumulative in its effects.
This force, Marx believes, is concentrated at the moment of valorisation
for very particular reasons. It is shaped by the perpetual search under
capitalism for relative surplus value.¹

Capitalists in competition with each other sell their commodities at a
social average price. Those that have a superior technology or
organisational form in production gain excess profits (relative surplus
values) because they produce at a lower individual cost of production
and sell at the social average. Conversely, those with inferior
technology or organisational form attain lower profits or losses and are
either driven out of business or are forced to adopt the new methods.
The advantaged producers have an incentive to adopt even better methods
to preserve their market share and their excess profits. The fiercer the
competition the more leapfrogging innovations are likely to occur as one
firm jumps ahead and others catch up or go even beyond the technological
mix and the organisational form that reflect the social average. The
forces shaping the labour process at the point of valorisation push
incessantly towards raising the productivity of labour power. As the
productivity of labour rises so the value of individual commodities
falls. If wage goods become cheaper then the value of labour power
(assuming a fixed physical standard of living) declines, leaving more
surplus value for capital. All capitalists stand to gain higher profits
(more relative surplus value) from rising labour productivity in the
production of wage goods. Increasing relative surplus value sometimes
goes hand in hand with a rising physical standard of living of labour.
It all depends on the strength of productivity gains and how the
benefits from increasing productivity are distributed between capital
and labour. A small part of the relative surplus value is turned back to
labour so they can acquire more use values, while most of it goes to
capital. This depends on the state of class struggle (unions often
negotiate productivity sharing clauses in contracts). The drive to
produce relative surplus value underpins the incessant pressure towards
technological and organisational changes in production.

For the capitalists, machines seem to be what they truly are: a source
of extra surplus value. Capitalists infer from this that machines are a
source of value. Marx argues that this cannot possibly be so. Machines
are dead or constant capital and as such they cannot produce anything by
themselves. Part of the value of the machine passes into the value of
the commodity but it does so as constant capital (i.e. capital that does
not change its value through use). Living labour (and not past labour)
is the only source of surplus value. Machines merely assist to raise the
productivity of labour power such that the total value remains the same
while the value of individual commodities falls. The result is a
paradox. Machines when combined with labour produce more surplus value
for the capitalist even when the value produced remains constant. Most
capitalists (in line with popular opinion) believe that machines produce
value and they tend to act upon that belief. Marx considers this a
fetish view. The fetishism of technology is widespread and this has
important consequences. It leads, for example, to the widespread belief
that there must be a technological solution to any social or economic
problem.

The presumption in this argument is that competition is well established
and fierce. But what happens if this is not the case? Capitalists, after
all, prefer monopoly or oligopoly to what they often dub ‘ruinous’
competition. The driving force behind technological dynamism is
attenuated by monopoly power. But it is displaced rather than destroyed.
The social form of relative surplus value that derives from the
reduction in the value of labour power via the reduction in the value of
wage goods remains. This is sometimes accomplished by political means.

Marx provides an example of how this works. In the nineteenth century,
British industrial interests saw wage levels tied to the price of bread.
They campaigned (in alliance with workers) against the agricultural
interests of the landed aristocracy to abolish the tariffs on imported
wheat in order to bring down the price of bread. The industrialists’ aim
was not to raise the standard of living of labour (though they often
claimed it was in order to get the workers’ support) but to reduce wages
and increase their relative surplus value (monetary profits). They
preached the gospel of free trade as long as it was advantageous for
them to do so.² The contemporary situation in the United States is
similar. If the value of labour power is fixed by the price of, say,
Nike shoes and Gap shirts, then free trade in these items is a
convenient gospel to espouse for capital in general. Walmart’s cheap
prices on foreign imports allow for the reduction of the value of labour
power and a rising rate of profit for all capitalists in the United
States. The problem is that those manufacturing and working-class
interests within the United States that want to make shirts and shoes
lose out to all those other sectors of capital that relish cheap labour
clothed, fed and entertained by cheap imports.

But there are other incentives to adopt new technologies apart from
those deriving from ruinous competition. Many innovations are designed
to disempower the labourer both in the market place as well as within
the labour process. Technologies that displace skilled labour and the
monopoly power that some skills confer with de-skilled job structures
(of the sort that can be performed by women and children – or, as the
time and motion study expert Frederick Taylor put it, by ‘a trained
gorilla’) are a crucial weapon in the class struggle. ‘But machinery
does not just act as a superior competitor to the worker, always on the
point of making him superfluous. It is a power inimical to him, and
capital proclaims this fact loudly and deliberately, as well as making
use of it. It is the most powerful weapon for suppressing strikes, those
periodic revolts of the working class against the autocracy of
capital.’³ The creation of an industrial reserve army of unemployed
labourers by way of technologically induced unemployment places an
emphasis upon technological adaptations that are labour-saving.
Innovations that improve efficiency and coordination, or accelerate
turnover times in both production and circulation, yield more surplus
values for capital. The necessity for the expansion of production to
accommodate endless accumulation of capital creates a strong incentive
to broaden the market for existing goods by reducing their price of
production or the creation of wholly new product lines and industrial
sectors (such as electronics over the last few decades). Product
innovation and new technologies go hand in hand. These incentives exist
even under conditions of monopoly and oligopoly. But they are all
concentrated, for the most part, at the point of valorisation. The
aggregate result is to assure the continuous and perpetually
revolutionary dynamic of technological and organisational change under
capitalism no matter what the balance is between competition and
monopoly power. Whenever the attenuation of competition produces
stagnation then the revitalisation of competition becomes a priority
even as an objective of public policy. The problems of ‘stagflation’ in
the core regions of capitalism in the 1970s were partially addressed by
the opening up of world trade to a globalised structure of competition.

Marx’s analysis of technological change may be narrowly concentrated on
the forces affecting the productivity of labour power in the process of
valorisation, but he takes a broad approach to the question of the means
deployed. He recognises, for example, the importance of software and
organisational form in addition to the hardware of machines. Computers
and mobile phones need the programs and the apps to be effective as well
as the communication networks. Find yourself somewhere with no signal
and all the sophistication available to you on your mobile phone is for
naught. The evolution of organisational forms (such as the modern
capitalist corporation, communication networks and the research
institutes and universities) has been just as important as the
development of the hardware (the computer and the engineered assembly
line) and the software (programmed design, facilitative apps, optimal
scheduling and just-in-time management systems). While the hardware/
software/organisational form distinctions are useful and important, we
must learn to recognise each as an internal relation of the other. It is
possible to write about the evolution of car design in itself, of
course, but to do so as if Henry Ford’s innovations with the assembly
line played no role in the subsequent evolution of the industry is
plainly to lose something vital to the story. It would be like the
history of the computer without mention of Microsoft and the social and
political consequences of the internet.

Circumscribed though it may be in focus, Marx’s analysis of technology
is interwoven with a broad approach to its role in capital’s
evolutionary trajectory. ‘Technology,’ Marx writes in a key footnote in
_Capital_, ‘discloses man’s mode of dealing with Nature, and the process
of production by which he sustains his life, and thereby also lays bare
the mode of formation of his social relations, and of the mental
conceptions that flow from them.’⁴ ‘Disclosing’ and ‘laying bare’ do not
denote ‘determine.’

Marx was not a ‘technological determinist’. The widespread view, common
to many detractors and supporters of Marx alike, that he considered
transformations in the productive forces as the prime motor of
historical change, is incorrect. Certainly, the contradictory relations
between technological dynamism and the social relations of capitalism
have had an important and often destabilising role to play in capital’s
history but it has not been the only contradiction at work within that
history.⁵ Likewise, all history may be the history of class struggle but
it is far from being only that. Many of Marx’s one-liners on topics of
this sort are misleading. They should always be checked against his
substantive work to figure out if or how they might make sense. Why, for
example, did he write Volume 2 of _Capital_ under the assumption of zero
technological change and make no mention whatsoever of class struggle?
Surely the content of Volume 2 is relevant to capital’s evolution? The
grand contest as to whether the productive forces or social relations
should be viewed as the prime mover of capitalist development misses the
point. It fails to situate Marx’s study of technology in the context of
the totality of relations that constitute a capitalist social formation.
It also assumes, for no good reason, that there must be a prime mover.

In Volume 1 of _Capital_ Marx invites us to consider how all the
different ‘moments’ listed above (to which I have added institutional
arrangements of the sort described in the second chapter of Volume 1 of
_Capital_ for the sake of completeness) interact and relate. Our mental
conceptions depend, for example, upon our ability to see, to measure, to
calibrate and we now have telescopes and microscopes, X-rays and CAT
scanners and the like to help us understand how the cosmos and the human
body work. But then consider why it was that someone somewhere imagined
something like a telescope or a microscope and who then found lens
grinders and metal workers to make one as well as patrons to use them
(often in the face of antagonism and opposition). The result has been
the development of new ways of seeing, of new conceptions of the world
of nature and of our place in it by way of these new instruments. As the
poet William Blake once put it: ‘What now is proved was once only
imagin’d.’

All of the seven moments – technologies, the relation to nature, social
relations, mode of material production, daily life, mental conceptions
and institutional frameworks – relate within the totality of capitalism
in a process of continuous evolution powered by the continuous
circulation of capital that functions, as it were, as the engine of the
totality. Developments across all seven moments, each of which is
autonomous and independent but overlapping and relationally bound to the
others, can move the totality in one direction or another. By the same
token, recalcitrance or immovability around any one moment can stymie
transformations in processes occurring elsewhere. Technological
innovations in the money form lead nowhere, as we earlier saw, without
at the very minimum parallel transformations in social relations, mental
conceptions and institutional arrangements. New technologies (like the
internet and social media) promise a utopian socialist future but get
co-opted by capital into new forms and modes of exploitation and
accumulation in the absence of other forms of action. But by the same
token, autonomous changes on the part of one moment may impel dramatic
changes everywhere else. The sudden emergence of new pathogens like HIV/
AIDS, the Ebola virus or Zika requires rapid adaptation across all seven
moments if they are to be controlled. The difficulty of organising to
deal with climate change is that it will require drastic shifts across
all seven moments. The fact that some people either deny the problem
(mental conceptions) or naively believe that there is a single bullet
technological solution (green capitalism) that can be implemented
without changing anything else (like dominant social relations and daily
life) dooms initiatives to failure.

Most work in the social sciences favours some ‘single bullet’ theory of
social change. Institutionalists favour institutional innovations,
economic determinists favour new technologies of production, socialists
and anarchists favour class struggle, idealists highlight changing
mental conceptions, cultural theorists focus on transformations in daily
life, and so on. Marx cannot and must not be read as a single bullet
theorist, even though there are many representations of his work that
view him so. Volume 1 of _Capital_ in particular cannot be parsed that
way, even though there is tremendous emphasis in the text on the impacts
of technological adaptations and dynamism. In Marx’s substantive work,
there is no prime mover, but a mess of often contradictory movements
across and between the different moments that have to be uncovered and
worked out.

This does not mean that in certain places and times one or other of
these seven moments does not take a leading role in disrupting existing
configurations or in stubbornly resisting change. So when we speak of
technological revolutions, cultural revolutions, political revolutions,
the information revolution or revolutions in mental conceptions, along
with counter-revolutions in any or all of these fields, then we are
acknowledging the contingent way that the history of capital as a whole
typically unfolds across and through the different moments. Marx hoped,
of course, for some kind of socialist or communist revolution (and at
various points took a somewhat teleological view of the inevitable
progression towards communism). But he was never able to specify what
configuration of these seven moments might bring about such changes. The
failure of Soviet communism can largely be attributed to the way the
interaction between all seven moments was ignored in favour of a single
bullet theory of the proper path to communism by way of revolutions in
the productive forces.

In his more detailed historical studies as well as in _Capital_, Marx
illustrates the contingency of it all. What constitutes a revolution is
not a political movement or a disruptive event like the storming of the
Winter Palace. Revolution is an ongoing process of movements across the
different moments. Capital is innately revolutionary, according to Marx,
because it is value in motion under conditions of continuous growth and
technological innovation. Perpetual transformations in the technology of
valorisation have reverberations everywhere else. But the neoliberal
revolution was as much a revolution in popular mental conceptions as it
was an institutional and technological revolution.⁶ Conscious
revolutionary change, by way of contrast, entails a redefinition and
redirection of existing movements across all moments. People may change
their mental conceptions, but this means nothing if they are not
prepared to change their social relations, their daily lives, their
relation to nature, their mode of production and their institutional
structures.

But if organisational forms and modalities of operation are just as
important as the hardware and software, and if the embedding of social
relations and of knowledge, skills and _mentalités_ in hardware forms is
ineluctable, then the whole issue of the meaning and impact of
technology upon social life and our relation to nature along with our
social relations becomes much more complicated and diffuse. This, it
seems to me, is the full import of Marx’s commentary in the key footnote
to chapter 15 of Volume 1. Ruling out the certitudes that attach to a
narrow reductionism (technological in the hardware sense in this case)
has the disadvantage, however, of confronting a world in which
everything relates to everything else. Hence the longing, which must be
resisted, to designate a prime mover. Hence, also, the tendency to
fetishise technological change as not only a prime mover but also as an
answer to every ill.

Since all of this is a somewhat different view of Marx’s work than that
which is commonly propagated by both Marxists and Marx critics alike, I
need briefly to provide the evidence for it. This is best represented by
the structure and argument of Volume 1 of _Capital_. Capital could not
arise without certain pre-existing conditions already being in place.
Commodity exchange, an appropriate monetary system, a working labour
market, minimal institutional arrangements (such as juridical
individuals, law and private property) and a consumer market to absorb
the commodities produced were all minimal prior requirements (see Figure
2, page 6). So also was a certain level of productivity and skill of the
labourer along with the availability of certain basic means of
production (such as land, tools and other instruments of labour along
with physical infrastructures such as transportation). Marx recognised
that the initial productivity of labour depended on natural conditions
(fertility and the free gifts of nature such as waterfalls, mineral
resources, biological processes of growth and reproduction of plants and
animals and the like) as well as upon cultural histories and
achievements (the accumulation of skills, knowledges, mental
conceptions, customary social relations, time discipline, etc.) of
different peoples. The free gifts of nature and of the cultural history
of human nature are the basis for capital accumulation to begin in
earnest. Such free gifts continue to be of great importance even as
capital increasingly seeks to enclose and privatise them and to extract
rents from them (by imposing a price upon knowledge that has no value,
for example).

Read Volume I of _Capital_ carefully and you will see how frequently
Marx reverts to reiterating all of these points. In Part 8 of Volume 1,
Marx describes how many of these preconditions were constructed through
processes of primitive accumulation. The key to capital itself lies,
however, in the transformation from the making of products (some of
which may be exchanged in a market) to the production of surplus value
through the systematic production of commodities for market. The latter
is the exclusive aim of the direct producers. Such producers are defined
as capitalists.

Capital takes over existing conditions and processes as it finds them
and turns them into something specially tailored to the requirements of
a capitalist mode of production. And so it is with techniques. It takes
over ancient capacities for cooperation (as exhibited in the
construction of the Egyptian pyramids) and pulls them together in an
organisational form suited to the reproduction of a capitalist class
seeking to reap all the productivity gains from cooperation and
increasing economies of scale for itself. In so doing it transforms the
social relations between capital and labour (with foremen and
administrators in between) within the labour process (see chapter 13 of
Volume 1). It likewise takes over the divisions of labour that pre-exist
and separates them into planned divisions of labour within the
capitalist form and divisions of labour in society coordinated through
market signals. It creates new hierarchies within the labour process and
subjects both capital and labour to the discipline of capital in
production and the indiscipline of anarchic market processes (see
chapter 14 of Volume 1). It radicalises ancient techniques largely by
transformations in the scale of production and the intricacy of the
different trades brought together under the command of capital. It
subdivides existing divisions of labour into ever finer-grained
specialised divisions forming parts of a much larger whole. Finally, it
arrives at a point where capital needs to control the labour process
itself through the creation of the factory system. Marx characterises
this as the move from a formal (coordinations through market mechanisms)
to a real (under the direct supervision of capital) subsumption of
labour under capital.⁷ Technology is organised on a purely capitalist
basis by locating an energy source outside and beyond that of the manual
strength of the labourer. The highpoint comes with the production of
machines by way of machines (an astonishing insight on Marx’s part which
is only now being fully worked out with the advent of artificial
intelligence). Notice that the construction of productive forces suited
to a capitalist mode of production comes at the end of this sequence so
it is very hard to see how productive forces can be the driving force of
historical transformation given the narrative that Marx constructs.⁸
They are in fact the historical result. It would be typical of Marx to
then argue that what is at one stage a result can at a later point
become a primary driving agent (which is probably more true of
technology and organisational form now than it was in the eighteenth
century).

But in the process of studying these transitions Marx carefully depicts
the other transformations that must occur for this revolutionary
movement to be successfully completed. He argues, for example, that
production which was once regarded as an art full of mysteries to be
learned by apprenticeship must become a science which, when combined
with capitalist control of the labour process, actually defines
technology as a distinctive sphere of action specific to capital.⁹
Pre-capitalist societies had techne, but capitalism has a technology
that cannot abide mysteries, that scientifically dissects nature in
order to exercise control. This required a change in mentalities not
only towards production itself but also with respect to nature, which
has to be construed as a dead object (rather than fecund and alive) open
to human domination and manipulation (Marx cites Descartes on this
point).¹⁰ Meanwhile, the labourer becomes a ‘fragment of a man’ locked
into a particular function within the division of labour under the
domination of the machine rather than a whole person in command of his
or her own labour process.¹¹ The organisational form of the factory and
the factory system is a radical departure, as we have seen, from artisan
production. The destruction of the latter and its transformation into
factory labour changes the nature of social relations as does the
employment of women and children and the reconfiguration of family life
and labour within the working classes. A new and higher form of the
family comes into being.¹² The flexibility and fluidity demanded of the
labourer mandates that ‘that monstrosity, the disposable working
population held in reserve, in misery, for the changing requirements of
capitalist exploitation, must be replaced by the individual man who is
absolutely available for the different kind of labour required of him:
the partially developed individual, who is merely the bearer of one
specialised social function, must be replaced by the totally developed
individual, for whom the different social functions are different modes
of activity he takes up in turn’.¹³ State regulation becomes important
with respect to the working day and the factory acts, while the state
also mandates compulsory education to ensure a workforce that is
literate and readily adaptable to the changing needs of capital’s
evolving labour processes. All of these shifts are mentioned in chapter
15 of Volume 1.

Marx also notes how:

the transformation of the mode of production in one sphere of industry
necessitates a similar transformation in other spheres … Thus machine
spinning made machine weaving necessary, and both together made a
mechanical and chemical revolution compulsory in bleaching, printing and
dying. So too on the other hand, the revolution in cotton-spinning
called forth the invention of the cotton gin … it was only by means of
this invention that the production of cotton became possible on the
enormous scale at present required. But as well as this, the revolution
in the modes of production of industry and agriculture made necessary a
revolution in the general condition of the social process of production,
i.e. in the means of communication and transport … (which) gradually
adapted themselves to the mode of production of large scale industry by
means of a system of river steamers, railways, ocean steamers and
telegraphs.¹⁴

At some point, however, large scale industry ‘had to take over the
machine itself, its own characteristic instrument of production, and to
produce machines by way of machines. It was not till it did this that it
could create for itself an adequate technical foundation, and stand on
its own feet.’¹⁵ This is the one point in _Capital_ where Marx tracks
externality effects by way of which what he called the ‘industrial
revolution’ was secured and completed.

Finally, and perhaps most important of all, technology itself becomes a
business.¹⁶ With the invention of the steam engine an innovation came on
line that had multiple applications within the fields of transportation,
mining, ploughing, milling, to say nothing of factories with power
looms. The analogy with computers which have innumerable applications in
our own time is exact. Once technology becomes a business then it
produces a commodity – new technologies or organisational forms – that
need to find and even create a new market.

We no longer deal with the individual entrepreneur trying to figure out
how to improve productivity by inventing and innovating on his or her
own in a particular production establishment, but a vast sector of
industry specialising in innovation and dedicated to selling innovations
to everyone else (as both producers and consumers). The corner grocer or
hardware store is cajoled, persuaded and eventually forced (by the tax
authorities) to adopt some sophisticated business machine in order to
manage inventory and keep track of sales, purchases and taxes. The cost
burden of such a technology may drive small stores out of business in
favour of the supermarkets and discount centres, thereby favouring the
increasing centralisation of capital. The adoption of many of these
innovations depends on their capacity to discipline and disempower
labour, to raise the productivity of labour and to increase the
efficiency and speed of turnover of capital in both production and
circulation. Capitalism as a whole becomes, as a result, infatuated with
technological change and the certainty of economic progress. The fetish
belief in technological fixes and innovations as the answer to all
problems takes deeper root as does the false idea that this must be the
prime mover. This fetish belief is nurtured by that segment of capital
that transforms innovation and technology into a big business with
consultants on organisational form peddling recipes for better
management, pharmaceutical companies creating remedies for diseases that
do not exist, and computer experts insisting on automation systems that
no one except a few experts can understand. Capitalist entrepreneurs and
corporations adopt innovations not because they want to but because they
are persuaded to or have to in order to acquire or retain their market
share and thereby ensure their reproduction as capitalists.

One does not have to accept Marx’s conceptual apparatus to see the
cogency of his arguments concerning the origins of technological
fetishism. The fetishism is not purely imaginary and has a very real
basis. It appears as if productivity is the be-all and end-all of
capitalist growth and stability and that the profit rate is crucially
determined by it. When Alan Greenspan gives evidence in which the
question of productivity gains is placed as central to the dynamics of
US capitalism he is not engaging in fictitious ramblings. The danger, as
we now see in the recent turmoil in capital markets, is in attributing
to productivity gains a role which they simply cannot fulfil.
Productivity gains have helped produce the current malaise of
instability and volatility. Lags in productivity likewise produce
serious problems for the spiral of endless accumulation.¹⁷ It would be
entirely wrong (and fetishistic), therefore, to look for a technological
fix to the present dilemmas of economic instability. The answer almost
certainly will have to be found in a transformation of social and
political relations as well as in mental conceptions, production systems
and all the other moments in the evolutionary process in combination
with those technological and organisational changes that are appropriate
for given social ends.

This does not mean that the overall thrust of technological evolution is
arbitrary and directionless. The fetishistic belief in technological
fixes supports the naturalistic view that technological progress is both
inevitable and good, and that there is no way we can or even should try
to collectively control, redirect, let alone limit it. But it is
precisely in the character of fetish constructs to open up social action
to mythical beliefs. While these beliefs may have a material grounding
they quickly escape material constraints only to have, once applied,
marked material consequences.

Consider, for example, control over the labour process which has always
been central to valorisation. The fantasy that the worker can be made
over into a mere appendage of the circulation of capital takes root in
this process. Many industrial innovators have had this as their primary
goal. A French industrialist renowned for his innovations in the machine
tools industry openly proclaimed that his three goals were increasing
precision, increasing productivity and the disempowerment of the
worker.¹⁸ The factory system, Taylorism, automation, robotisation and
the ultimate displacement of living labour altogether through artificial
intelligence (AI) respond to this desire. Robots do not (except in
science fiction accounts) complain, answer back, sue, get sick, go slow,
lose concentration, go on strike, demand more wages, worry about work
conditions, want tea breaks or simply fail to show up.¹⁹ The fetish
fantasy of total control over the labourer and the ultimate displacement
of the labourer via technology has its roots in the imperative to
increase productivity by whatever means possible.

In the labour market, technologically induced unemployment weakens the
bargaining power of labour. De-skilling and homogenisation of labour
processes eliminate the monopoly powers that derive from non-replicable
labour skills. John Stuart Mill considered it ‘questionable if all the
mechanical inventions yet made have lightened the day’s toil of any
human being’. That this was so was obvious, Marx argued, because the
purpose of machinery is to extract more profit from labour and not to
lighten the load of labour.²⁰ Occasion-ally it is recognised that this
fantasy of total control over labour power via machine technology is
seriously wanting, so capitalists then turn to organisational forms of
cooperation, collaboration, responsible autonomy, quality circles,
flexible specialisation and the like. Capital can take over any
organisational form labourers themselves might propose and shape it to
their own purpose which is the production of surplus value. The dream
becomes a nightmare. Fran-kenstein is unleashed, HAL the computer in
_2001: a Space Odyssey_ assumes a volition of his own, the replicants in
_Blade Runner_ seek power and perpetuation in their own right. The dark
powers of anti-value emerge from the shadows to challenge labour
controls.

If living labour is the source of value and profit then replacing it
with dead labour or robotic labour makes no sense either politically or
economically. This, in Marx’s view, was one of the central
contradictions of capitalism. It undermined the capacity of capitalism
to keep on a balanced growth path. But it also produces the unintended
consequences that Marx spells out in the _Grundrisse_:

To the degree that large industry develops, the creation of real wealth
comes to depend less on labour time and on the amount of labour employed
than on the power of the agencies set in motion during labour time,
whose powerful effectiveness is itself in turn out of all proportion to
the direct labour time spent on their production, but depends rather on
the general state of science and the progress of technology, or the
application of science to production. (The development of this science,
especially natural science, is itself in turn related to the development
of material production) … (The worker) inserts the process of nature,
transformed into an industrial process, as a means between himself and
inorganic nature, mastering it. He steps to the side of the production
process instead of being its chief actor. In this transformation, it is
neither the direct human labour he himself performs, nor the time during
which he works, but rather the appropriation of his own general
productive power, his understanding of nature and his mastery over it by
virtue of his presence as a social body – it is, in a word, the
development of the social individual which appears as the great
foundation-stone of production and of wealth. The theft of alien labour
time on which the present wealth is based, appears a miserable
foundation in face of this new one, created by large scale industry
itself. As soon as labour in the direct form has ceased to be the
well-spring of wealth, labour time ceases and must cease to be its
measure, and hence exchange value (must cease to be the measure) of use
value. The surplus labour of the mass has ceased to be the condition for
the development of general wealth, just as the non-labour of the few,
for the development of the general powers of the human head. With that,
production based on exchange value breaks down … Capital itself is the
moving contradiction, (in) that it presses to reduce labour time to a
minimum, while it posits labour time, on the other side, as the sole
measure and source of wealth … On the one side, then, it calls to life
all the powers of science and of nature, as of social combination and
social intercourse, in order to make the creation of wealth independent
(relatively) of the labour time employed on it. On the other side, it
wants to use labour time as the measuring rod for the giant social
forces thereby created, and to confine them within the limits required
to maintain the already created value as value …²¹

This has been highlighted as a central contradiction in the evolution of
capital and one that has far-reaching consequences.

Once technology became a business it did what every business tries to do
which is to extend its reach, build new markets and attract investment
of interest-bearing capital to sustain and enhance its position as a
thriving sphere of value and surplus value creation within the overall
division of labour. When Marx was writing, this business was in its
incipient, formative stages. But he clearly recognised that the machine
tool and mechanical engineering industries (with the steam engine its
prime exhibit) were destined to play a powerful role within the
technology sector through the creation of generic technologies. But
Marx, concentrated as he was in Volume 1 of _Capital_ on the
valorisation process, did not probe very deeply into the new
technologies and organisational forms evolving around realisation and
consumption, around social reproduction (including the reproduction of
labour power). The technologies now at work in an average household in
the United States are far beyond anything that Marx could have imagined.
Nor did Marx investigate in any detail the complicated arenas of
distribution (though he did acknowledge the importance of forms of
industrial organisation such as the joint stock company and innovations
in the world of banking and finance along with the flourishing sphere of
anti-value creation within the credit system). Marx had very little to
say about the rapid transformations occurring in the field of physical
infrastructures though, of course, the canals, steamships, railways,
telegraphs and gas lighting along with improved water supplies and
sewage disposal all rated a mention. The technologies of state
administration, public health and education, and military innovation
barely register. The last of these has long been a major centre of
innovation with respect to the design of new products and new modes of
organisation, softwares and hardwares. Militarised modes of surveillance
and control, of policing and regulating have become widespread.
Technology as a business has had absolutely no inhibitions at going
where Marx failed to venture. It has colonised all of these areas with
gusto.

The impression we are left with from reading Marx is of capital
circulating with the technological mix constantly changing, often in
very disruptive ways, at the point of production while the rest of the
circulation process through realisation, distribution and reinvestment
remains untouched. The truth, of course, is that the technologies of
circulation have also been dramatically changing. The question this
poses is to what degree do Marx’s insights and prescient commentaries
stand up to contemporary scrutiny given his obvious blind spots.

No one, I think, would claim that technological shifts in the sphere of
valorisation are irrelevant. To the degree that Marx shows through his
study of it that capital must be technologically dynamic no matter what,
then this makes a universal statement about capital’s nature that
carries over from Marx’s time to ours. Technological and organisational
change is endogenous and innate rather than exogenous and accidental (as
it is often presented in other accounts).

Marx recognises several cognate facts. First, innovations in one sphere
have proliferating externality effects everywhere else such that there
is a consequent diffusion of technological and organisational impulses
throughout the totality of any capitalist system. Secondly, when
technology becomes an independent business, it no longer responds
primarily to needs, but it creates innovations that have to find and
define new markets. It has to create new wants, needs and desires not
only on the part of producers (through productive consumption) but also,
as we see all around us on a daily basis, on the part of final
consumers. This business thrives upon and actively promotes the fetish
belief in technological fixes for all problems.

Thirdly, the way Marx situates these technological shifts in relation to
mental conceptions, social relations, the relation to nature, daily
life, the materiality of commodity production and institutional
arrangements of the state and civil society, stands firm as a mode of
thinking that is desperately in need of further articulation. It is from
this perspective – which seems to me to be a brilliant way to organise
our own critical thinking – that it is possible to attack all those
single bullet theories of social change including the one that is all
too often hung around Marx’s neck.

Finally, Marx’s dark hints of the erroneous thinking and politics that
derive from technological fetishism demand attention. The idea, for
example, that the construction of smart cities managed through the
mining of vast data sets can be the answer to all urban ills such that
poverty, inequalities, class and racial discriminations and the
extraction of wealth through evictions and other forms of accumulation
by dispossession will all disappear is plainly ludicrous. It is
counter-productive if not counter-revolutionary. It creates a fetish fog
– a vast distraction – between political activism and the urban
realities, pleasures and travails of daily life that need to be
addressed.

The belief in the inevitability of technological and organisational
progress has long been with us. In recent times it has taken some severe
knocks and increasingly, if contemporary popular culture is to be
believed, challenged by dystopian imaginaries. Marx shows us a way to
get out of that utopian/dystopian binary and look for practical
technological paths that address the crying need for new social
relations, new mental conceptions, new relations to nature and all the
other transformations that will be required to exit from the current
morass. The tendency to fetishise technology is a barrier that needs to
be removed and on this point Marx is as good a critic as anyone. Yet it
is also the case that the range of technological mixes and possibilities
with which we are now surrounded is greater than it has ever been in
human history. On this point, the basic Marxist insight stands: the
problem for emancipatory politics is to liberate the immense productive
forces from their social and political constraints, in short from their
domination by capital and a particularly noxious form of an imperially
minded and increasingly authoritarian state apparatus. This task could
not be clearer.


7 The Space and Time of Value

‘Where science comes in,’ wrote Marx to Louis Kugelmann shortly after
the publication of the first volume of _Capital_, ‘is to show how the
law of value asserts itself.’¹ It is typical of Marx’s approach to first
derive and specify a law by a process of abstraction from material
circumstances (such as acts of market exchange) and then explore all the
possible counter-tendencies that might negate the law. To do things the
other way round, he wrote, ‘one would have to provide the science before
the science’. Consider, then, how the law of value – so far explored
abstractly and schematically as value in motion – ‘asserts itself’ in
space and time.

If capital is defined as ‘value in motion’ then something has to be said
about the time–space configuration of the world in which this motion
occurs. Motion cannot occur in a vacuum. We need to shift from a
visualisation of value in motion that is ungrounded anywhere to seeing
it as it creates geographies of cities and transport networks; forms
agrarian landscapes for the production of foodstuffs and raw materials;
encompasses flows of people, goods, information; creates territorial
configurations of land values and labour skills; organises spaces of
labour, structures of governance and administration. We also need to
take account of the significance of accumulated working class traditions
and know-how in particular places and times, of skills and social
relations (not only of class), all the while acknowledging how the
political and social struggles of people living in particular places
leave behind memories and hopes of alternative unalienated ways of
living and being.

Marx recognised early on that it was inherent in the very nature of
capital to create the world market but that in doing so it would have to
produce a new kind of space. This theme is articulated at some length in
the _Communist Manifesto_. The merchant capitalists undermined the
static powers of feudal landed property. They used their superior
command over space to assemble great wealth and power by buying cheap in
one place and selling dear in another. With the rise of industrial
capitalism, ‘the need of a constantly expanding market for its products
chases the bourgeoisie over the whole surface of the globe. It must
nestle everywhere, settle everywhere, establish connexions everywhere.’
This gives

a cosmopolitan character to production and consumption in every country
… All old established national industries have been destroyed or are
daily being destroyed. They are dislodged by new industries, whose
introduction becomes a life and death question for all civilised
nations, by industries that no longer work up indigenous raw materials,
but raw material drawn from the remotest zones; industries whose
products are consumed, not only at home, but in every quarter of the
globe. In place of the old wants, satisfied by the productions of the
country, we find new wants, requiring for their satisfaction the
products of distant lands and climes. In place of the old local and
national seclusion and self-sufficiency, we have intercourse in every
direction, universal inter-dependence of nations.

Revolutions in the means of transport and communications draw all
nations together while ‘the cheap prices of its commodities are the
heavy artillery with which it batters down all Chinese walls … It
compels all nations, on pain of extinction, to adopt the bourgeois mode
of production … In one word, it creates a world after its own image.’

This is an astonishingly prescient evocation of the processes that we
have in recent times come to call globalisation. But this is not all.

The bourgeoisie has subjected the country to the rule of the towns. It
has created enormous cities … (it) keeps more and more doing away with
the scattered state of the population, of the means of production, and
of property. It has agglomerated population, centralised means of
production while independent, or but loosely connected provinces with
separate interests, laws and governments and systems of taxation, become
lumped together in one nation, with one government and one code of laws,
one national class interest, one frontier and one customs tariff.²

The processes that led to the creation of the unification of Germany and
Italy in the late nineteenth century and the European Union, the World
Trade Organisation (WTO) and the power of the International Monetary
Fund (IMF) in the twentieth were already identifiable.

Similar sentiments are expressed in the _Grundrisse_:

A precondition of production based on capital is therefore the
production of an ever-widening sphere of circulation … The tendency to
create the world market is directly given in the concept of capital
itself. Every limit appears as a barrier to be overcome … The production
of relative surplus value … requires the production of new consumption …
Firstly: quantitative expansion of existing consumption; secondly:
creating new needs by propagating existing ones in a wide circle;
thirdly: production of new needs and discovery and creation of new use
values … Capital drives beyond national barriers and prejudices as much
as beyond nature worship, as well as all traditional, confined,
complacent, encrusted satisfactions of present needs, and reproductions
of old ways of life. It is destructive towards all of this, and
constantly revolutionises it, tearing down all the barriers which hem in
the development of the forces of production, the expansion of needs, the
all-sided development of production, and the exploitation and exchange
of natural and mental forces.³

The law of value internalises this imperative to form the world market
and to reshape the geographies of production and consumption in
capital’s own image. ‘It is only foreign trade, the development of the
market to the world market, which causes money to develop to world money
and abstract labour into social labour. Abstract wealth, value, money,
hence abstract labour, develop in the measure that concrete labour
becomes a totality of different modes of labour embracing the world
market … This is at once the pre-condition and the result of capitalist
production.’⁴

For all this to happen, the physical barriers to movement had to be
reduced. In Marx’s time the coming of the steamships and railways, the
building of ports, harbours, canals and roads, were all very much in
evidence. The invention of the telegraph allowed the closing prices of
wheat in Buenos Aires, Chicago and Danzig to be printed the following
day as the Liverpool and London commodity exchanges opened. This took a
vast investment in expensive and long-lived physical infrastructures
that changed the face of the earth and facilitated the geographical
flows of commodities and money capital. Since Marx’s time, innovations
and investments of this sort have taken pride of place in capital’s
technological history. ‘While capital must on one side strive to tear
down every spatial barrier to intercourse, i.e. to exchange, and conquer
the whole earth for its market, it strives on the other side to
annihilate this space with time … The more developed the capital …the
more does it strive simultaneously for an even greater extension of the
market and for the greater annihilation of space by time.’⁵ Hence the
utopian dream of capital to operate in a frictionless spatial world (now
largely achieved with the mobility of cyber-money). This does not make
the role of geographical differences irrelevant: it heightens their
importance because money capital can now move costlessly to exploit even
minor differences in production conditions to generate excess profits.
Working populations all around the world are put in competition with
each other. A world market of labour supply, forged by the
hyper-mobility of money capital, is becoming an ever more prominent
reality. Plainly, the reduction of physical barriers to international
trade must be accompanied by the reduction of social, political and
cultural barriers: hence the hegemony of free trade ideology and
politics even in the face of public resistance.

The circulation and accumulation of capital occurs in a specific
organisation of space and time even as it simultaneously defines and
redefines the times and spaces within which it moves. Marx welcomed much
of this as disruptive of traditional ‘encrusted’ ways of life, as a kind
of middle passage between the ancient and the modern. He was decisively
on the side of the modern and even had positive things to say about the
civilising influence of capital on human life. But all that is solid did
not so easily ‘melt into air’ as he suggested it would in the _Communist
Manifesto_ and populations did not submit so easily to the new
disciplinary apparatus of space and time that capital mandated.
Furthermore, no sooner had populations settled to the new conditions of
capitalist industrialisation than yet another wave of disruption swept
across the land, leaving behind a detritus of abandoned industrial
landscapes and disposable and disgruntled populations. The
deindustrialisation that destroyed whole communities and hollowed out a
by-then traditional industrial working class from the 1980s onwards in
much of North America and Europe tells a rather different story.
Rootedness in place for many is a virtue. Defence in place against the
disruptive powers that attach to endless capital accumulation becomes a
major line of anti-capitalist struggle. The longing and the search for
unalienated social relations and relations to nature cannot ignore the
processes of place construction as one avenue for building a better
daily life. The dialectical relation between space and place is central
to understanding both the constructive and the destructive aspects of
the motion of capital in space and time.

Aspects of this problem are embedded within capitalism’s own dynamic.
Once investments are embedded in the land in a particular place, then
capital has to use them in that place if they are not to be devalued.
The movement of capital is spatially constrained by investments
dedicated to increasing its fluid movement over an ever-greater spatial
range. The annihilation of space by time is an important phenomenon
within the drive to reshape the relative space–times of the world
market. But that imperative does not necessarily imply spatial dispersal
because agglomeration in places can be just as effective. The search for
economies of circulation time that limit the loss of value can be
prosecuted in different ways. Industries economise on circulation costs
and times through clustering together in space. Agglomeration economies
and efficient configurations of transport and communication networks
play key roles in reducing circulation times and retaining a greater
surplus value for capital. Improvements in the means of transportation
tend ‘in the direction of the already existing market, that is to say,
towards the great centres of production and population, toward ports of
export, etc … These particularly great traffic facilities and the
resultant acceleration of the capital turnover … give rise to quicker
concentration of both the centres of production and the markets.’⁶

Capital, we can now say, creates a physical landscape and spatial
relations appropriate to its needs and purposes (both in production and
consumption) at one point in time, only to find that what it has created
becomes antagonistic to its needs at a future point in time. Part of the
dynamic of capitalist accumulation is the necessity to ‘build whole
landscapes and spatial relations only to tear them apart and build anew
in the future.’⁷

For much of _Capital_, Marx puts this process to one side. In Volume 1
he writes ‘in order to examine the object of our investigation in its
integrity, free from all disturbing subsidiary circumstances, we must
treat the whole world of trade as one nation, and assume that capital is
established everywhere and has taken possession of every branch of
industry.’⁸ The problem of the creation of new wants, needs and desires
on the world market is eliminated by the assumption that all commodities
exchange at their value. Marx evidently wanted to study the temporal
dynamics in isolation. So he assumes capital hermetically sealed in a
closed space within which all commodities exchange at their value.
Occasionally he breaks away from this constraint. He notes, for example,
how the rise of the factory system led British capital to seek raw
materials and new markets through imperial conquests (as in India) or
colonial expansion (as in Australia). The result was the production of
‘a new and international division of labour … one suited to the
requirements of the main industrial countries’ such that ‘one part of
the globe’ was converted ‘into a chiefly agricultural field of
production for supplying the other part, which remains a pre-eminently
industrial field’.⁹

The last chapter of Volume 1, somewhat surprisingly, takes up the topic
of colonisation. Marx was almost certainly provoked by a formulation in
Hegel’s _Philosophy of Right_. In that text, Hegel saw the inner (class)
contradictions of capital producing intolerable and unsustainable
differentiations in distributions of wealth between the classes. Marx
adopts almost identical language in his statement of the general law of
capitalist accumulation in Volume 1 of _Capital_. The parallels are
almost certainly not fortuitous. Civil society, Hegel argued, would be
driven by its ‘inner dialectic’ to ‘push beyond its own limits and seek
markets, and so its necessary means of subsistence, in other lands that
are either deficient in the goods it has overproduced, or else generally
backward in industry’. Colonies would permit a part of its population ‘a
return to life on the family basis in the new land’ and simultaneously
create ‘a new demand and field for its industry’. Civil society would be
forced, in short, to seek an outer transformation through geographical
expansion because its ‘inner dialectic’ creates contradictions that
admit of no internal resolution. Capital mandates a perpetual search for
‘a spatial fix’ to its internal contradictions.¹⁰ Whether or not Hegel
thought geographical expansion would stabilise matters is, however, not
clear.

Marx’s chapter on colonialism responds to Hegel’s thesis in two ways.
First, he takes up Wakefield’s colonial proposals for the settlement of
Australia (laid before the British Parliament). These specified that
labourers should be barred from access to free land in the colonies. The
barriers of private property in land and land rent were needed to ensure
an adequate supply of exploitable wage labour for capital. Thus was the
political economy of the Old World forced, Marx gleefully notes, to
reveal in its approach to the New World the secret it had long sought to
conceal: that capital is produced by denying labour access to the basic
means of production (land in particular).¹¹ Secondly, the implication is
that there can be no permanent ‘outer’ resolution or ‘spatial fix’ to
the internal contradictions of capital. Pursuit of colonial and
imperialist solutions merely ends up reproducing the internal
contradictions of capital (particularly its class relations) on a
grander geographical and ultimately world scale. Marx seems to have
concluded that he should, therefore, concentrate in _Capital_ on the
internal contradictions of capital and pay no mind to any purported
external solutions of the sort Hegel proposed.

In the same way that Marx refuses to integrate any study of feudal
residuals into his theory of capital, so he refuses to attribute any
significance to a spatial or external resolution to the internal
contradictions of capital. Many years later, of course, Rosa Luxemburg
in her critique of Marx’s theoretical work (particularly as laid out in
Volume 2 of _Capital_) vociferously denied that capital could ever
survive without an external solution to its market imbalances and its
resource constraints. Colonialism and imperialism were, in her view,
necessary and central to capital’s survival.¹²

Only in Volume 3, in the chapters dealing with merchant’s capital and
with banking, finance and a credit system that was deeply embroiled in
the funding of long distance trade, does the spatial structure of the
world market re-emerge as a variable feature of Marx’s analysis. It is
in the context of realisation and distribution through the circulation
of merchant, money and interest-bearing capital, that Marx finds it
impossible to maintain a boundary between the internal and external
contradictions of capital. Holding on to the assumption of no problems
of realisation allowed Marx to build a tightly organised theoretical
understanding of capital circulation, but at the cost of limited realism
with respect to processes creating the world market. There is nothing
wrong with making such assumptions. But we are entitled to ask what
happens when they are relaxed or abandoned.

The globalisation that Marx and Engels envisaged in the _Communist
Manifesto_ has been an eternity in the making and even now is far from
complete. Over the last century and a half, vast amounts of capital have
been absorbed in pursuit of a spatial fix to problems of realisation
through the growth of both final and productive consumption across the
world market. While it well may be that the final result is nothing more
than the replication of the internal class contradictions of capital on
a grander and grander scale (as witnessed by the proliferation of
billionaires in China, India, Mexico, Russia, etc. over the last two
decades), this process has been a long time in the coming and has been
associated with disastrous geo-economic and geopolitical conflicts. The
planet has been plunged into inter-imperialist world wars and all manner
of conflicts within the territorialised structures of the state system.
Nevertheless, through it all, it would be hard to deny the validity of
Marx’s proposition that ‘the tendency to create the world market is
directly given in the concept of capital itself’. It was left to the
theorists of colonialism, imperialism and of uneven geographical
development to seek to incorporate such processes into the general
theory of capital accumulation.

Marx’s writings on colonialism in general and on Ireland and India,
along with slavery in the United States in particular, were voluminous
and informative (as befits a correspondent to the _New York Herald
Tribune_). He saw conflicts emerging along the frontiers of settler
colonialism. ‘There the capitalist regime everywhere comes into
collision with the resistance of the producer, who, as owner of his own
conditions of labour, employs that labour to enrich himself, instead of
the capitalist. The contradiction of these two diametrically opposed
economic systems, manifests itself here practically in a struggle
between them. Where the capitalist has at his back the power of the
mother country, he tries to clear out of the way by force, the modes of
production and appropriation, based on the independent labour of the
producer.’¹³ That this is one of the key roles of the capitalist state
was later explicitly confirmed by President Woodrow Wilson of the United
States in the 1920s. ‘Since trade ignores national boundaries, and the
manufacturer insists on having the world as a market, the flag of his
nation must follow him, and the doors of the nations which are closed
against him must be battered down …’¹⁴

In _Capital_, however, Marx unquestionably privileges the study of time
over space. Value is socially necessary labour time on the world market,
which contrasts with the multitude of concrete clock-times producing use
values. While surplus value is one thing, the division of the working
day into necessary and surplus labour time (and the length of the
working day that enhances absolute surplus value) is a magnitude fought
over daily as capital purloins as much extra labour time as it possibly
can by all manner of subterfuges in and outside the workplace. That it
is easier for capital to realise its objectives by imprisoning workers
within that ‘House of Terror’ called the factory is purely incidental.

Two recent books by Massimilano Tomba and Stavros Tombazos along with an
illuminating essay by Daniel Bensaid discuss in detail how the concept
of time operates in Marx’s works.¹⁵ They concur that the temporality of
Volume 1 of _Capital_ is linear and progressive as befits a study of
perpetual technological change and the endless accumulation of capital.
Time in Volume 2 is cyclical as befits a study of the reproduction of
capital from valorisation through realisation and distribution and back
again to valorisation. The temporality of Volume 3 is said to be
‘organic’ but it is not entirely clear what that might mean except that
it is something appropriate to understanding capital as a totality in
the full flood of evolutionary change. If Volume 3 is regarded as a
synthesis of the perspectives of the first two volumes, then its
distinctive temporality should be that of a spiral. This is a
geometrical figure that Marx more than once plays with in the
_Grundrisse_ to contrast with the circle of simple reproduction. ‘By
describing its circle, (capital) expands itself as the subject of the
circle and thus describes a self-expanding circle, a spiral.’¹⁶ It
roughly fits with the combination of linear technological change
(registered as an ever increasing productivity of labour) with the
circular motion involved in perpetual accumulation that frames Marx’s
theory of the tendency of the rate of profit to fall. The transformation
from a circle to a spiral is where a lot of capital’s problems begin.
Hence the potency of the phrase ‘spiralling out of control’.

There are two basic ways to think about space and time in human affairs.
In elaborating on them I venture into complicated territory that may be
hard to follow. But I think it vital to try.¹⁷

_Either:_ we presuppose some universal and fixed temporal and spatial
frame and use it to locate, order and calibrate activity within that
frame. This is what the clock-time and measured spaces of Descartes and
Newton backed by Euclidean geometry provides. This is the favoured space
and time of the capitalist state, of bureaucratic administration, the
law and private property and capitalistic calculation. How this space
and time came to dominate is a story well covered by economic and
cultural historians. Within this frame private property rights and
territorial sovereignties can be defined (with maps) along with social
contracts (like an eight hour day or a thirty year mortgage). Movements
of capital, labour, money and commodities can be coordinated so that
everything is in the right place at the right time (as in just-in-time
production systems). Without such a framework the liberal political and
commercial order could not work. ‘If all the watches in Berlin suddenly
went wrong in different ways even as much as an hour,’ wrote the
sociologist Georg Simmel, ‘its entire economic and commercial world
would be derailed for some time.’¹⁸

_Or:_ we accept that there are multiple ways in which time and space can
be conceptualised and experienced, recognise that every process
internalises its own spatio-temporality and patiently work through the
conflicts, contradictions and confusions that arise as phenomena from
different time–space worlds clashing in particular situations. An oak
tree internalises a certain measure of space– time as it grows. Its
measure is very different from that defined by growing corn. The
time–space of bird migrations is quite different from the time–space of
geological movement of tectonic plates or the rates of radioactive
decay. The space–time of factory labour conflicts with that of family
time, child-rearing and the reproduction of labour power. A universal
ban on child labour has to confront different definitions in different
societies of when childhood ends. Capitalist anthropology, Marx noted,
determined that the age of childhood ended at age ten! The formation of
a wage labour force requires workers to submit to time and spatial
disciplinary regimes that are hard to inculcate except through coercion
and violence. The optimum rate of exploitation of a natural resource
such as oil looks very different from the perspective of geological time
as opposed to an economic temporality defined by the discount rate. Any
calculus based upon the latter is profoundly at odds with the
conceptualisation of time and space needed to confront global warming.
The diversity of cultural and religious constructions of time and space
has been much studied and remarked upon. Apocalyptic visions that
proclaim the end is nigh contrast with a progressive teleology that
proclaims the inevitability of communism or arrival in some other
promised land in our future. Indigenous cosmologies are radically
different from scientific modernist accounts of the origins of the
time–space of the universe. The conceptualisation of time and space in
early Christianity until late feudalism was very different from that
which arose with the emergence of capitalism. Even our contemporary
scientific understandings appear unstable. Notions of space and time in
physics have evolved from Newtonian through Einstein’s relativity to the
relational space–time implied in the quantum mechanics of Niels Bohr.

Within all this diversity, one conceptualisation of space and time –
such as clock-time and cadastral Euclidean space – may come to dominate
in daily economic life. If it did not then, as Simmel pointed out,
nothing could be coordinated, planned or regulated. Something as simple
as a bus, train or flight schedule could not be specified. The variety
of local times in different spaces had to be reduced by international
agreement to a system of time-zones in order to facilitate communication
and exchange.¹⁹ Capital circulation and accumulation have also shaped
and reshaped definitions of space and time. The time–space of
contemporary financial markets is completely different from that which
existed in 1848. Capital, being the revolutionary force it patently is,
has transformed the spatial and temporal frameworks of daily life, of
economic calculation and of bureaucratic administration and financial
transactions. Acceleration of turnover times, precarity of work over the
course of a working life and reductions in the frictions of distance
have altered lifestyles as well as the rhythms of capital accumulation.
While moments may be the elements of profit, the intensity of labour
rather than actual hours comes to define a different temporality
entirely. Time future, in the form of the anti-value of credit, now
dominates time present to an extent never seen before. How many are now
involved in the laborious and often tedious work of redeeming debts
contracted long ago?

Within all of this it is useful to distinguish between three different
major conceptions of time and space. This is where matters get somewhat
complicated.

_1. Absolute space and time_

A plot of land is leased for twenty-one years. The plot is clearly
defined on a cadastral map protected by laws of private property. Its
area is known so cost of the lease per square metre can be calculated.
The lease begins on 1 January 2000 and ends on 31 December 2020. Unless
there are specific covenants and restrictions, the lessee can do with
that plot of land whatever he or she likes during twenty-one years of
calendar time. This is what absolute space and absolute time are about.
This is the time of a working day (measured in hours) of a labourer
confined within the closed space of a factory over which capital has
absolute legal control. The absolute conception of space and time
dominates the opening of Volume 1 of _Capital_, particularly in the
chapter on the working day and the production of absolute surplus value.
What Marx calls ‘concrete labour’ occurs in absolute space and time.
‘The desolate space and time of physics now constitute the formal
conditions of any knowledge, whether of nature or the economy’, writes
Bensaid, ‘crowning the victorious coalition of the absolute and the true
against the apparent and the commonplace.’²⁰

_2. Relative space–time_

Position in relative space–time affects what can be done with the
absolute space of the plot of land over the time of its lease. The
lessee wants to maximise revenues but cannot grow fresh fruits and
vegetables because labour is scarce and the plot is too far away from
the main urban market which can be reached only by horse and cart over a
bumpy road. If, after ten years, a motorway is built close by, more
workers come to live in the area and a refrigerator truck allows the
lessee to switch from food grains to more profitable fresh fruits and
vegetable production. The market can be reached in an hour when it used
to take the best part of a day. But it takes eight years to bring a
fruit tree into bearing so given the terms of the lease it would not be
rational to plant fruit trees, unless, that is, the lease can be
renegotiated or some other legal solution can be arrived at that matches
the temporality of peach tree growth. All of this presupposes relative
space–time. Relative surplus value in _Capital_ exists in a framework of
relative time. Its measure is no longer hours of labour but the changing
productivity and intensity of labour even as it still presumes, in
Marx’s account, the absolute space of the factory as the spatial site of
production. Only in the chapters dealing with national differences in
the value of labour power (wages) do we encounter the possibility of
relative spaces also. But in Volume 2, the question of differential
transport costs and distances to markets and various inputs enters into
the analysis.

_3. Relational space–time_

Relational space–time is harder to grasp because, like value, it is
immaterial and impossible to touch and measure but nonetheless of
critical objective importance.²¹ The changing monetary value of my house
when I upgrade it affects the monetary value of the houses around me.
The spatial range of this effect declines rapidly over distance. This is
how appraisers work assessing housing valuation for a mortgage
application. A bank invests in a tranche of mortgage debt on housing.
How is that investment valued on the bank’s books? We can study each
property in absolute space and time and assess the position of each
house in relative space–time but at the end of the day the valuation is
based on ‘best practices of valuation’ in a relational space–time
constructed around the idea of highest and best use. How do we assess
the value of housing mortgages on the books of some financial
institution when the most favoured method of valuation called ‘marked to
market’ cannot be calculated because the market has collapsed (as it did
in 2008)? The answer is an informed guess.²² Relational values change in
tandem with market sentiments, confidence, expectations and
anticipations. If the Federal Reserve suddenly changes interest rates or
as Britain withdraws from the European Union, then property values in
many parts of the world will surely be affected. We cannot identify
atoms of influence flowing around, but the objective effects are plain
to see. The same thing applies in the field of political struggles. A
protest occurs in Gezi Park in Turkey which is influenced by the Arab
Spring and this has impacts in Brazil a few weeks later as huge
demonstrations of political protest unfold against the deteriorating
conditions of urban life. Contagion effects, borne along these days by
waves of exhortations on social media, are everywhere in evidence. A
wave of left wing governments come to power in Latin America and then
the whole wave seems to recede some dozen years later.

This threefold categorisation of relations between time and space
produces interesting concordances:

_Absolute space and time_ is the space and time of concrete labour, of
the working day, the factory, and of absolute surplus value through
struggles over the length of the working day. _Relative space–time_ is
the space and time of relative surplus value, or variable productivity
and intensity of labouring of differential porosity of the working day
and changing values of labour power. Relative location, ease of access
and mode, cost and time of transportation become important. _Relational
space–time_ is registered as abstract labour develops ‘in the measure
that concrete labour becomes a totality of different modes of labour
embracing the world market’. Abstract labour is the totality of concrete
labours in relational space–time. At the more local level, externality
effects over space play an important role in, for example, the valuation
of uncultivated land.

_Capital_ embraces these three forms of spatio-temporality
simultaneously within the logic of capital as a whole. Bensaid puts it
this way:

The antinomies of capital (use value/exchange value, concrete
labour/abstract labour) issue from the open fracture of the commodity in
Volume One. The unity of use value and exchange value expresses a clash
of temporalities. The time of general/ abstract labour exists only
through concrete particular labour. As the establishment of a relation
between these two times, value emerges as an abstraction of social time.
Reciprocally, time is established as a measure that must itself be
measured. The determination of socially necessary labour time refers to
the motion of capital as a whole.

For this reason ‘the category of time is at the heart of (Marx’s)
critique of political economy’. But the different approaches to time
coexist within Marx’s reasoning. ‘The mechanical time of production, the
chemical time of circulation and the organic time of reproduction are
thus coiled and slotted inside one another, like circles within circles,
determining the enigmatic patterns of historical time, which is the time
of politics.’²³

While Volume 2 of _Capital_ adopts a cyclical temporal framework, it
does not probe very deeply into the space–time framework that the study
of the circulation of capital demands. It holds technology and
organisational form constant so the progressive dynamics that dominate
Volume 1 disappear from the analysis. Marx puts most of his efforts into
the analysis of simple reproduction (the circle form of a virtuous
infinity) as opposed to the spiral form (the bad infinity) of perpetual
capital accumulation. The assumptions allow Marx to look more closely at
certain aspects of the differential motion of different forms of capital
free of disruptions. His focus is on different turnover times – the
relative times different capitals take to get from the money form
through valorisation, realisation and distribution and back into the
money form once more. Marx breaks the total circulation process down
into production time and circulation time. The former is defined in
terms of the production of value and the latter as its negation. He then
examines the relationship between the working period – the actual hours
that labour takes in production – as contrasted with the production
time, which includes in many instances time when no labour is being
applied. In agriculture, for example, the working period when labour is
being applied can often be quite short while the production time for
most crops will be a year. Wine and liquors take a lot of fermentation
time when no labour is applied. Vintage wines mature in the barrel and
then in the bottle. Does this count as socially necessary labour time?
Marx says no even though the price of the wine rises as it matures. But
wines typically trade at a monopoly price and are, hence, outside of the
general laws of competition that dictate socially necessary labour
times. How to coordinate relations between different turnover,
production and circulation times poses a lot of problems for capital
circulation as a whole. Building a house, constructing a cruise ship,
producing a mobile phone, a hamburger or a concert performance entail
completely different spatio-temporal frameworks within which capital and
labour work.

This brings us to the thorny problem of how to understand the
circulation of fixed capital. How does the value of the machine get
transferred into the commodities produced when there is no material
transfer? Some social accounting convention has to be devised. And
social conventions are always controversial and subject to modification.
More generally, how does value flow through fixed capital formation and
use? How does it flow through the construction of the large and
long-lasting physical infrastructures and built environments needed for
the circulation and reproduction of capital? These issues could not be
incorporated into the visualisation of capital with which we began. But
they are important. Look at the New York skyline and consider the flows
required to sustain it over time. The most crucial flow is that of the
value coursing through all those buildings in the form of debt servicing
(anti-value) and revenues (value generation or appropriation). Value
flows, we earlier argued, are immaterial but objective. They are
invisible to the naked eye. But go to Detroit or Havana to see what
happens to built environments when value ceases to flow. The derelict
urban landscape is there for all to see.

The investigation of fixed capital circulation is vital for two reasons.
First, Marx’s critics argue that fixed capital disrupts the value theory
and undermines Marx’s political economy. Marx recognised that the
circulation of fixed capital ‘contradict(s) Ricardo’s doctrine of
value’.²⁴ But Marx’s value theory is different from Ricardo’s and Marx’s
critics typically fail to notice this. The possibility nevertheless
exists that Marx’s theory may require modification to accommodate the
peculiar problems of fixed capital formation and circulation. Secondly –
and far more importantly in practice – recent crises of capital – most
notably that which occurred in 2007–8 – have arisen in and around
investments in the built environment. In what ways can Marx’s analysis
of fixed capital circulation and built environment formation lay a
foundation for understanding why this might be so?²⁵

Let us begin with the simplest form of fixed capital. An industrial
capitalist buys a machine in order to increase the productivity of the
labour employed. If the machine is state of the art, then the industrial
capitalist gains extra surplus value by virtue of the superior
productivity of the labour power employed. When everyone else buys the
same machine, this ephemeral form of relative surplus value disappears.
The value laid out in acquiring the machine has to be recuperated over
its lifetime. How does this value circulate? The simplest way is to use
straight-line depreciation. If the physical lifetime of the machine is
ten years, then one tenth of the value of the machine passes into the
value of the commodity produced during each year. At the end of the ten
years, the producer should have enough money to buy a new machine and
start the process all over again.

But new, cheaper and more efficient machines are coming onto the market
all of the time, particularly once technological innovation becomes a
business. Existing machines then face the threat of what Marx quaintly
calls ‘moral depreciation’ and devaluation through competition from
cheaper and more efficient machines. The replacement value does not
correspond to the depreciated initial value. The lifetime of the machine
is no longer a physical question because better new machines may force
the early retirement of existing machines. This leads to three
alternative ways of looking at the circulation of fixed capital. The
first is the straight-line depreciation over an average physical
lifetime already described. The second is varying replacement cost
during the physical lifetime of the machine. The third is a perpetually
changing valuation of the machine over a variable lifetime that depends
upon its utility in securing relative surplus value in competition with
other producers. The lifetime of the machine depends on its utility and
economic viability. Marx accepts that the valuation of the machine is
dependent upon its effectiveness in generating surplus value. The
accounting fiction that accommodates such a schedule of depreciation is
that of joint products. Marx noted this as a problem for his own value
theory. Sheep produce wool, meat and milk and assigning a value to each
commodity is not obvious. In the case of fixed capital the accounting
fiction works like this: every year the capitalist produces commodities
and at the end of the year also ‘produces’ the remaining physical
machinery, the value of which can be realised in second-hand markets or
redeployed for the next annual round of commodity production. This is
incompatible with Ricardo’s labour theory of value because the value of
the machine depends entirely on its utility in value and surplus value
production and has nothing to do with the labour originally embodied in
it.

This last interpretation is the most interesting. It is easier to
understand if the industrialist leases the machine on an annual basis.
The industrialist chooses every year whether to renew the lease on the
old machine or lease a new one. That decision will depend on the
differential costs of leasing, the different contributions of the old
and the new machines to productivity and a variety of other factors
(e.g. servicing contracts on maintenance and repair). The annual lease
agreement fixes the value of the machine for that year. The value may be
completely different the next year. The relational value of the machine
is perpetually shifting.

But there is something peculiar about this arrangement. The companies
leasing the machines lend capital to producers in the fixed form of the
machine rather than in the liquid form of money. In return they expect
the equivalent of interest on the value of the machine plus some
contribution to the payment of principle. This fact accords with the way
fixed capital circulation is financed in general. If the producer lays
out value to buy a machine, then over the lifetime of the machine’s use
the producer will have to save up each year enough money to be able to
purchase a replacement machine. The capitalists either hoard the savings
or put them in a financial institution to earn interest while they wait.
Or, alternatively, they can borrow money (or a machine in the case of
leasing) at the outset and pay off its value over its lifetime plus
interest.

In both cases the circulation of interest-bearing capital enters into
the picture as it also does in the case of the quite common practice of
leasing rather than buying equipment. The circulation of
interest-bearing capital and the circulation of value through fixed
capital use become closely intertwined.

Unfortunately, Marx’s assumptions in Volume 2 of _Capital_ exclude
consideration of both technological changes and the circulation of
interest-bearing capital. This allowed him to evade any extended
discussion of these issues when writing about fixed capital. His
assumptions allowed him to look more carefully at the role of turnover
times and the conditions that would have to be satisfied if demand and
supply flows were to remain in equilibrium. But they prevent a full and
proper consideration of the fixed capital circulation problem. The
chapter on that topic in Volume 2 is, alas, not very helpful. The
_Grundrisse_ offers a much livelier and potentially fruitful if
speculative mode of approach.

‘Nature,’ Marx writes, ‘builds no machines, no locomotives, railways,
electric telegraphs, self-acting mules, etc. These are the products of
human industry; natural material transformed into organs of the human
will over nature … They are _organs of the_ _human brain, created by the
human hand_; the power of knowledge, objectified.’²⁶

These forces of production, together with the skill and knowledge they
embody, must be appropriated by capitalists, shaped to the latter’s
requirements, and mobilised as a lever for further capital accumulation.
‘The development of the (instruments) of labour into machinery is not …
accidental … but is rather the historical reshaping of traditional
inherited (instruments) of labour into a form adequate to capital. The
accumulation of knowledge and of skill … is thus absorbed into capital,
as opposed to labour, and hence appears as an attribute of capital, and
more specifically of _fixed capital_.’²⁷ So it is not only the machine
that is fixed but the knowledge and the free gifts of human nature
incorporated in it.

But for fixed capital circulation to be fully effective, a number of
preconditions must exist:

The part of production which is oriented to the production of fixed
capital does not produce direct objects of individual gratification …
_Hence, only when a certain degree of productivity has already been
reached … can an increasingly large part be applied to the production of
means of production_. This requires that society be able to wait; that a
large part of the wealth already created can be withdrawn from immediate
consumption, and from production for immediate consumption, in order to
employ this part for the labour which is _not immediately productive_.

This requires ‘a certain level of productivity and of relative
over-abundance, and more specifically, a level directly related to the
transformation of the circulating capital into fixed capital … _Surplus
population_ (from this standpoint) as well as _surplus production_, is a
condition for this.’²⁸

Capital tends, as we have seen, to produce surplus populations (an
industrial reserve army) and surplus products (commodities facing
problems of realisation). It thus systematically produces conditions
conducive to fixed capital formation. The larger the scale of the fixed
capital, the more surplus labour and surplus capital can be absorbed –
‘thus more to build railways, canals, aqueducts, telegraphs, etc. than
to build machinery’.²⁹ But for this to occur, capital must be assembled
into concentrations of money power. Before the advent of the joint stock
companies and the organisation of the financial sector into huge
conglomerations of centralised money capital, large scale investments
tended to be channelled through the state apparatus. In our own times
consortia of private banks or public–private partnership are more
favoured. Nevertheless, the inner connection between the institutions
(such as pension funds) that organise the circulation of
interest-bearing capital and fixed capital formation becomes stronger
and more intricate over time.

This trend becomes even more obvious when we consider certain special
kinds of fixed capital. An increasingly important part of it is that of
‘an independent kind’. Physical infrastructures used in common (some of
which have the character of public goods) are crucial as use values for
capitalist forms of development. Many of these infrastructures (like
houses, schools, hospitals and shopping malls) are used for purposes of
consumption rather than production while others, such as railways and
highways, can equally well be used for both. Marx briefly considers the
relations between investments in fixed capital for production and
investments into the consumption fund. Plainly, in our own times in the
advanced capitalist world the latter investments are of great
importance.

Marx also insists that we not confuse fixed with immoveable capital
(such as a coal mine) even though the latter is in itself a very
important category for consideration:

Some of the means of labour … are held fast in their place once they
enter into the production process as means of labour: machines, for
example. Other means of labour, however, are produced at the start in
static form, tied to the spot, such as improvements to the soil, factory
buildings, blast furnaces, canals, railways, etc. … But the circumstance
that some means of labour are fixed in location, with their roots in the
soil, gives this part of the fixed capital a particular role in the
nation’s economy. They cannot be sent abroad or circulate as commodities
on the world market. It is quite possible for the property titles to
this fixed capital to change: they can be bought and sold and in this
respect circulate ideally. These property titles can even circulate in
foreign markets, in the form of shares, for example. But a change in the
persons who are owners of this kind of fixed capital does not change the
relationship between the static and materially fixed part of the wealth
of a country and the moveable part of it.³⁰

We can trade shares to a company delivering water to a South African
township on all the markets of the world, but the water system cannot be
moved. Geographical fixity as opposed to geographical mobility becomes
an important tension centred around fixed capital of an immoveable kind.
The geographical fixity is in fact a produced space.

In all of this there is a deep and abiding contradiction. The ‘dark
matter’ of anti-value purveyed through the circulation of
interest-bearing capital demands its pound of flesh in future value
production that must continuously rise to cover the compounding cost of
interest payments. ‘The greater the scale on which fixed capital
develops … the more does the continuity of the production process …
become an externally compelling condition for the mode of production
founded on capital.’³¹ When capitalists purchase or borrow fixed capital
they are obliged to use it until its value is fully redeemed or face
devaluation. Fixed capital ‘engages the production of subsequent years’,
it ‘anticipates further labour as a counter-value’ and, therefore,
exercises a coercive power over future uses. That coercive power applies
in place. Fixed and immoveable capital embedded in the land has to be
used _in situ_ if its value is to be redeemed over the course of its
lifetime. In this there is a paradox. A form of capital designed to
provide the physical infrastructure in place to liberate the spatial
mobility of capital in general ends up demanding that capital flow into
that space which the fixed capital defines or the value of the latter
will be devalued with serious consequences for the interest-bearing
capital (e.g. the pension funds) that funded it. This is one of the
potent ways that the crisis tendencies of capital come to a head.³²

In Marx’s view the demand for fixed capital of various kinds along with
demands emanating from the need to create a consumption fund adequate to
the needs of social reproduction and daily life, formed a crucial
material basis for the growth and increasing sophistication of the
institutions governing the flows of interest-bearing capital. ‘The
anticipation of the future fruits of labour is … not an invention of the
credit system. It has its roots in the specific mode of realisation,
mode of turnover, mode of reproduction of fixed capital.’³³ The other
crucial basis lies in the growth and financing of long-distance trade.
It is fascinating to note how considerations deriving from the space and
time of value circulation converge upon the circulation of
interest-bearing capital as a principal agent impelling the further
accumulation of capital.

The contradiction involved in all this should, however, be readily
apparent. On the one hand, fixed capital provides a powerful lever for
accumulation. Fixed capital investment, particularly of an independent
kind in the built environment, can provide temporary relief from
problems of overaccumulation and relieve stress during phases of crisis
when surpluses of capital and of labour exist side by side without
otherwise profitable sources of employment. On the other hand, future
production and consumption are increasingly imprisoned within fixed ways
of doing things and increasingly committed to specific lines of
production and particular spatial configurations way into the future.
The future is mortgaged to the past. Capital loses its flexibility. The
ability to adopt innovations is either checked, producing stagnation, or
maintained but at the cost of devaluation of the fixed capital in use.
Marx saw this clearly as yet another set of forces making for crises:

The cycle of interconnected turnovers, embracing a number of years, in
which capital is held fast by its fixed constituent part, furnishes a
material basis for periodic crises. During this cycle business undergoes
successive periods for depression, medium activity, precipitancy,
crisis. True, periods in which capital is invested differ greatly and
far from coincide in time. But a crisis always forms the starting point
for new investments. Therefore from the point of view of society as a
whole (it lays) a new material basis for the next turnover cycle.³⁴

[Images]

Figure 3 _The secondary and tertiary circuits of capital in the
production of physical and social infrastructures for capitalist
production and consumption_

This contradiction takes on yet another dimension when we consider the
immoveable forms of fixed capital locked into particular spaces. The
spaces in which fixed capital is invested in infrastructures also differ
greatly. Nor do they coincide in time. Once capital is invested in
particular spaces and territories, then capital must continue to
circulate in those spaces and not move into others until the value
embodied in the fixed capital is redeemed through use. Either that, or
whole regional economies experience devaluation of the sort that became
common in industrial regions of the United States and Europe from the
1980s onwards. The rhythms of investment and disinvestment in the fixed
capital embedded in the land vary to produce oscillating patterns of
uneven geographical development in world capitalism.

Long-term and frequently massive physical infrastructure formation has
become more and more important to capital over time. It forms, as it
were, a secondary circuit of capital by virtue of the special way it
responds to and dictates the paths of capital accumulation in general in
space and time. There is also a tertiary circuit of capital, which Marx
pays no attention to except in passing, which entails social
expenditures on the education and training of labour, a large range of
social expenditures and services such as health care and pension rights,
to which we have become accustomed as supports for daily life.
Traditionally these services have been provided by the state out of
taxation but the trend in recent years has been towards more and more
private provision. Nevertheless, like fixed capital of an independent
kind, these expenditures on, for example, education entail long-term
projects which may or may not contribute to rising productivity at a
much later date. The flows of capital into the secondary and tertiary
circuits of capital add another dimension entirely as to our
understanding of what the capitalist laws of motion are all about
(Figure 3, page 151). One thing is sure, however. Capital as value in
motion cannot be understood without incorporating these secondary and
tertiary circuits of capital, mediated not only through the market but
also by state power, into our broad analysis of how capital works and
reproduces in space and time. The visualisation of capital with which we
began is confined to the circulation in a one-dimensional space. The
other dimensions, here embraced as the secondary and tertiary circuits
of capital over the long-term, supplement that understanding in crucial
ways.


8 The Production of Value Regimes

The laws of motion of capital are enforced but not created, says Marx,
by inter-capitalist competition. Throughout _Capital_ Marx assumes (for
the most part) a utopian condition of perfect competition. This
assumption serves Marx well in his effort to show that the glorious
utopia of the classical political economists – in which individual
freedoms and private property coordinated through the market would
redound to the benefit of all – would in practice produce a dystopian
nightmare of increasing class inequalities, environmental degradations
and economic crises galore. But it begs the question as to what happens
when the enforcement mechanism of perfect competition goes AWOL or awry.

Marx tacitly assumes that perfect competition occurs in a space of zero
transport costs and frictionless movement. But all spatial competition
is monopolistic competition.¹ It is called that because firms have a
monopoly over the particular space they occupy and only confront
competition from a limited number of firms (if any) within a certain
geographical range. Individual capitalists may be protected against
competition from others by a combination of high transport costs and
territorial barriers to trade (such as tariffs). The strength of this
protectionist effect depends on the nature of the commodities, the
tariff structure and the time and cost of transport. In Marx’s time,
heavy perishable items could not escape from local monopoly control,
whereas the trade in gold, silver, diamonds, spices, silks, dyes and the
like was not affected that much by transport costs though they may have
been subject to tariffs. Producers of many basic and perishable goods
(such as bread and beer) were protected against competition even from
producers in neighbouring towns. Producers relying upon heavy raw
materials inputs (like iron ore and coal in steel production) were
protected against competition by locating close to their sources of raw
materials. These are the kinds of conditions that location theory
addresses.² Raw material orientation was a powerful force regulating the
location of most heavy industries in nineteenth-century capitalism.
Today, market orientation is probably more significant with some obvious
exceptions. Mexican producers of refrigerators to this day have a
locational advantage over their Asian competitors because of proximity
to the US market.

The value of those commodities produced and marketed under conditions of
local or regional monopoly cannot be determined on the world market in
the same way as, say, the value of gold or diamonds or salt might be.
Instead, the value would vary from place to place depending on changing
transport times and costs and of tariff and other barriers to trade.

Marx recognised that the value of labour power varied from country to
country, depending upon ‘the price and the extent of the prime
necessaries of life as naturally and historically developed, the cost of
training the labourers, the part played by the labour of women and
children, the productiveness of labour; its extensive and intensive
magnitude’.³ Geographical variations in the intensity of labour are
particularly important. ‘The more intense national labour … produces in
the same time more value which expresses itself in more money.’ The law
of value ‘is here modified by national differences in wages’ and by
geographical variations in the length, intensity, productivity and
porosity of the working day. Different productivities of labour
according to natural differences (e.g. cheap food from fertile land in a
favourable climate), the different definitions of wants, needs and
desires according to natural and cultural situation and the dynamics of
class struggles, mean that the equalisation of the rate of profit will
not be accompanied by an equalisation of the rate of exploitation
between countries.⁴ In the event of trade between countries, ‘the
privileged country receives more labour in exchange for less, even
though this difference, the excess is pocketed by a particular class,
just as in the exchange between labour and capital in general’.⁵ No
prizes are given for guessing which class benefits. ‘Here,’ says Marx,
‘the law of value undergoes essential modification … the richer country
exploits the poorer one, even where the latter gains by the exchange.’⁶
This prevents any direct ‘levelling out of values by labour time and
even the levelling out of cost prices by a general rate of profit
between different countries’.⁷

The social labour we do for others in one part of the world is different
both qualitatively and quantitatively from that done in another. In the
event of exchange between different regional value regimes the social
labour in one region may end up subsidising and supporting the economy
and lifestyle of another. High value producing regimes, such as those
based on labour-intensive production (e.g. Mexico or Bangladesh), may be
supporting high productivity capital-intensive regimes (e.g. the United
States). Even more dramatically, the debt-bottling plants of New York
and London that produce anti-value look for the redemption of that value
in the factories of Bangladesh and Shenzhen and not in the backstreets
of Manhattan or Soho.

The argument here has far-reaching implications. In Volume 1 of
_Capital_ Marx asks how it is that the equality presumed in competitive
exchange relations can be rendered compatible with the inequality of
surplus value production. The answer lies in the com-modification of
labour power and the exploitation of living labour in production. In
Volume 3 of _Capital_ Marx uncovers another surprising riddle. The
equalisation of the rate of profit through competition forces
commodities to be exchanged not at their value but at prices of
production.⁸ Capitalists receive surplus value according to the capital
they advance and produce surplus value according to the labour power
they employ. The redistribution of surplus value this produces in open
trading situations within the capitalist class favours capital-intensive
producers over labour-intensive producers.

The law of capitalist redistribution as laid out in Volume 3 of
_Capital_ evokes some interesting parallels. The Senate Committee
investigating the 2007–8 crash asked Lloyd Blankfein, CEO of Goldman
Sachs, to define the bank’s role. He replied that it was ‘to do God’s
work’.⁹ Presumably he was thinking of the biblical injunction from
Matthew 25:29 ‘For unto every one that hath shall be given, and he shall
have abundance: but from him that hath not shall be taken away even that
which he hath.’ This is what the equalisation of the rate of profit
accomplishes. The consequences are potentially far-reaching, given
Marx’s (and Ricardo’s) insistence that labour is the ultimate source of
value. Trade between a capital-intensive value regime such as that of
Germany and labour-intensive value regimes such as Bangladesh will
transfer value and surplus value from the latter to the former. This
will be accomplished ‘silently’ and ‘naturally’ through the market
process. It requires no imperialist tactics of domination and
extractivism, other than promotion of the practices of free trade, to
make it work. This is the ‘silent’ way in which rich regions grow richer
at the expense of the poor regions that get left further behind. For
this reason many so-called developing countries look to protectionism,
particularly of so-called ‘infant industries’. This helps also explain
why so many developing countries, beginning with Japan in the 1960s,
prefer to organise and subsidise capital, rather than labour-intensive
forms of capitalist development.¹⁰ What is called ‘moving up the value
chain’ towards higher value added production becomes a general ambition.
When we add to such value transfers the ways in which the geography of
value production and valorisation differ from that of realisation, then
the fluid geography of value flows across and through the
differentiating landscapes of capital circulation emerges as the
material expression of what capital is about. Within these flows
regional configurations emerge around which relatively stable and
geographically fixed configurations of labour mobilisation, divisions of
labour and investments in social and physical infrastructures and value
production, realisation and distribution form at least for a while.

The case for postulating the existence of distinctive regional value
regimes is bolstered by an examination of monetary arrangements. In
Volume 1 of _Capital_, Marx notes a major disjunction between the global
money commodities – gold and silver – and the many local fiat and paper
moneys that exist to facilitate ease of exchange and which are ‘an
attribute proper to the state’.¹¹

When money leaves the domestic sphere of circulation it loses the local
functions … and falls back into its original form as precious metal in
the shape of bullion. In world trade, commodities develop their value
universally. Their independent value form thus confronts them here too
as world money. It is in the world market that money first functions to
its full extent as the commodity whose natural form is also the directly
social form of realization of human labour in the abstract. Its mode of
existence becomes adequate to its concept.

Thus ‘the different national uniforms worn at home by gold and silver as
coins’ are ‘taken off again when they appear on the world market.’¹²
There is a ‘separation between the internal or national spheres of
commodity circulation and its universal sphere, the world market’. The
‘true’ value of commodities, Marx insists, lies on the world market and
its most adequate money form of representation is gold.

If the disjunction between local and universal moneys is so obvious then
why would we not imagine that the same might apply to value itself? The
tacit assumption that value is singular and universal, rather than
multiple and regionally disaggregated, is just that: an assumption.
Marx’s justification for it is that only on the world market can money
acquire its universal material form – that of gold – which is outside of
and beyond human manipulation. The global gold supply was and is
relatively inelastic and most of it was and is already above ground in
some form or another. The imperative to reduce transaction costs in
exchange led to multiple localised moneys, which were mere symbols of
value. But then so is gold itself a mere symbol. The difference is that
these other non-metallic forms of money are vulnerable to arbitrary
human manipulation. Even less reliable are ‘moneys of account’ and the
many complicated systems of debt generation and credit moneys. Gold
acted as the solid and reliable material pivot upon which all the other
fictitious and otherwise uncontrollable forms of money turned.

Over time, however, gold became increasingly irrelevant to exchange even
at the global level. The world monetary system abandoned the last
vestiges of dependency on the gold standard after 1970 or so. Marx was
adamant that this could never happen. But on this point he was clearly
wrong and we have to consider the theoretical as well as the practical
consequences of his error. Value even on the world market is now
represented by money forms that have no material commodity base. These
money forms are subject to human manipulation (such as quantitative
easing among the central banks). The opportunity exists for currency
regimes to emerge in competition with each other, vying for the power of
representation of value on the world market. Any currency pushed to play
the universal equivalent role, such as that now performed by the US
dollar, is not only perpetually under challenge but inherently unstable.

Marx could easily have theorised this had he cared to. Value, as we’ve
seen, arises in the course of the practices of market exchange. The
exchanges that begin with barter postulate as many value forms as the
concrete labour times embodied in the commodities produced. Imagine this
process proliferating within a given territory such that a particular
money form arises to represent the average of all labour times within
that territory. A form of abstract labour or socially necessary labour
time consolidates across all spaces of the territory. It is not hard to
imagine this process operating in two closed territories next to each
other, each of which will produce its own value regime.

It is in the nature of capital to ‘burst its local bonds’ and ‘break
through all the individual and local limitations of the direct exchange
of products’.¹³ Trade will begin between different territories with
different value regimes represented by different currency systems. The
drive inherent in capital to create the world market described in the
_Communist Manifesto_ and the _Grundrisse_, becomes in _Capital_ the
drive towards universal exchangeability.¹⁴ This entails the creation of
a universal equivalent which ‘by social custom finally become(s)
entwined with the specific natural form of the commodity gold’. But the
completion of this process depends upon the removal of all barriers to
trade, including that entailed in transport costs. While those costs
have been much reduced in whole or in part (particularly with respect to
the hyper-mobility of the money form) it is impossible to reduce the
circulation costs to zero.

Marx clearly understood the contradictions embedded in any universal
money form. In the case of gold the way these contradictions apply is
obvious but it is not so easy in the case of the US dollar as a global
reserve currency. In effect, the total productivity of concrete private
labours producing use values within the US economy is considered the
representative of abstract labour on the world stage, but the social
convention to accept US manipulations of that standard is not assured.
When the total productivity of labour in the United States falls below
that in, say, Japan and West Germany (as happened in the 1980s) then why
look to US dollars to represent values? There is no stable pillar for
the universal equivalent. The evolution of different value regimes
occurs in the context of unpredictable shifts in the relative values of
the world’s major currencies.

The production of regional value regimes has been a critical feature of
capital’s historical geography. These regimes were initially highly
localised and loosely integrated through the exchange of a limited
number of non-perishable, often high value and not easily reproduced
commodities. The money commodities (gold and silver) performed the role
of connector and coordinator, which explains Marx’s interest in them as
a central feature to his political economic theorising. As trading links
proliferated and thickened over time, so convergence of the different
value regimes has accelerated first at a regional level (as evidenced by
the trading regimes of the European Union, North American Free Trade
Agreement (NAFTA), MERCOSUR and the like) as well as at a more global
scale. As late as 1970, foreign cheeses and wines could not be found in
local supermarkets in the United States and even beer was for the most
part locally brewed. If I was drinking National Bohemian I was in
Baltimore, if it was Iron City I was in Pittsburgh and Coors meant
Denver. This has changed dramatically since 1970. Every local
supermarket has food commodities from all over the world and I can drink
beer from almost anywhere in most major cities.

Much of the history of capital since 1945 has been given over to the
gradual elimination of barriers to trade by persistent falls in
transport costs and by the gradual reduction of political barriers (e.g.
tariffs and other forms of regulation). The geographical landscape for
competitive production has been changing through free trade initiatives
such as the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT set up in 1947)
and its more far-reaching successor, the World Trade Organisation (WTO
set up in 1995), and a host of proposed agreements such as the proposed
Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP). Such indicators would seem to suggest
that the differentials between regional value regimes are disappearing
and that we are much closer now to a globally unified and singular value
regime, and perhaps even a more secure world money system to represent
it. The fact that China has still not been awarded Market Economy Status
in the WTO tells us, however, that this process is incomplete.
Furthermore, the rising tide of protests against free trade agreements
suggests that a movement to disaggregate is actively engaged.

Consider, for example, the recent attempts to create trade agreements
like the Transatlantic Trade and Investment Partnership (TTIP) (and its
Pacific twin). In the case of the TPP, the agreement is specifically
designed by the United States and Japan to constrain the ability of
Chinese and European companies to build market share in Asia. The real
character of the TPP becomes clear immediately the fundamental economic
data for its twelve intended signatory countries are examined. The
potential signatories are dominated by the G7 economies of the United
States, Japan and Canada. These, together with Australia, constitute 90
per cent of the GDP of potential signatories. Participating developing
economies – Mexico, Malaysia, Chile, Vietnam and Peru – make up only 8
per cent. The TTIP and TPP are really attempts by the United States to
create a particular value regime, one that will stop the decline in its
market share of global trade at others’ expense, while counteracting
weakening economic growth and profitability at home. In 1985 economies
in the proposed TPP countries accounted for 54 per cent of world GDP; by
2014 this had dropped to 36 per cent. From 1984–2014 the US share of
world GDP fell from 34 per cent to 23 per cent. In the same period the
US share of world merchandise trade dropped from 15 per cent to 11 per
cent. So the TPP is not some great free trade arrangement but an
agreement by a group of advanced economies, with a fringe of developing
countries, whose share in world GDP has been significantly declining, to
keep others out, with the United States playing the role of dominant
power at its centre. The benefits do not, of course, go to labour, since
as Marx commented, any ‘excess is pocketed, as in any exchange between
capital and labour, by a certain class’. Similar effects flowed from the
creation of the Eurozone as a supposedly coherent value regime armed
with its own currency. But German capital has dominated and extracted
maximum benefits while Greece, Italy, Portugal and Spain have been
systematically drained of value. The abandonment of the Trans-Pacific
accord by the United States has created an opening for China to step in
and construct its own version of a value regime in the vacuum created by
anticipated US withdrawal.

As spatial monopolistic competition has diminished, both materially and
politically, other forms of monopoly have been reemphasised. The large
corporation possessed of great market power has been a major feature of
capitalism since the latter half of the nineteenth century but the
gradual breakdown of spatial barriers has meant a shift from national to
global perspectives on corporate power particularly after 1970 or so.
Monopolistic power in the United States in the 1960s meant the big three
car companies in Detroit. Paul Baran and Paul Sweezy’s classic work on
_Monopoly Capital_, published in 1966, recognised the need for an
alternative value theory but confined much of its analysis to the United
States with international offshoots. During those years US labour (in
fact all major national labour forces) was largely protected against
foreign competition other than that made possible by immigration. Each
large nation state was, in effect, constituted as a distinctive value
regime with capital controls to secure sovereignty over its own economy.
But this monopoly was challenged in the 1980s by fierce competition
from, for example, foreign car companies (German, Italian, Japanese,
then Korean and now Chinese) while US companies set up in China and
elsewhere. Similar stories of the shift from national to global monopoly
power can be told for agribusiness (Monsanto and Cargill), energy (the
seven sisters oil companies), pharmaceuticals (Bayer, Pfizer) and
telecommunications. Then there are the new upstart monopolists like
Google, Amazon and Facebook along with a movement to enclose the world’s
knowledge commons in global systems of patents, licences and legal
forms. The latter is what the Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual
Property Rights (TRIPS) agreement within the WTO framework supports and
seeks to guarantee.

Competition, Marx pointed out in _The Poverty of Philosophy_, inevitably
results in monopoly since only the fittest firms survive in the
Darwinian world that capitalist competition creates. Marx takes this
process a step further in _Capital_ when he depicts what he calls ‘the
laws of centralisation of capital’, much facilitated by the organisation
of the credit system, that go well beyond the simple concentration and
increase in size of firms consequent upon the accumulation process.¹⁵
The importance of economies of scale in enhancing productivity cannot be
overemphasised. This is the competitive advantage that capital seeks in
its reckless pursuit of centralisation and increase of scale. The
accumulation of market power by the corporate sharks allows them to
swallow up the small fish through mergers and acquisitions.¹⁶ The
unification of the world’s stock markets in the 1980s has also permitted
this process to go global.

The wave of technological and organisation innovations that have
occurred since the mid 1980s have radically restructured regional value
regimes. Transport costs and even more importantly coordination times
have fallen away as tariffs and other border barriers have either been
diminished or selectively removed. Speed up in production and
circulation has been the fetish quest of the times. The creation of
global production chains permits cross-border production combinations in
which, for example, US firms provide design, organisational and
marketing skills combined with low-cost labour in Mexico in much the
same way as German firms do in Poland.¹⁷ Some benefit accrues to Mexico
and Poland but most value is captured by corporations in the United
States or Germany even as labour in the United States and Germany faces
far fiercer competition from foreign workers and benefits not at all
from the reorganisation (except, perhaps, in the form of cheaper
consumer goods). But the organisation is regional in the sense that the
cross-border relation is mostly with proximate states such that
organisations like NAFTA and the Eurozone become an institutional form
of expression in absolute space seeking to frame the relative
space–times of the moving global value chains. Most so-called global
cross-border trade is in fact regional (e.g. China’s trade into East and
Southeast Asia or Britain’s trade into Europe). It is in this way that
the evolution of technology as a business becomes an active agent in the
definition and reshaping of perpetually evolving regional value regimes.

This brings us to an all too brief consideration of the part played by
what we have hitherto designated as the ‘free gifts’ of nature and of
human nature in the geographical configuration of value regimes. These
free gifts are use values which can be appropriated by capital without
cost (or with minimal cost) and which can thereby contribute to surplus
value production. These free gifts are not evenly distributed over the
earth’s surface. High concentrations of so-called natural resources
along with concentrations of populations with cultural characteristics,
skills, institutional arrangements and aptitudes amenable to
incorporation into the dynamics of capital valorisation, realisation and
distribution create a world of differential geographical advantages for
capital accumulation to proceed. The mosaic of regional value regimes
has all along been supported by the proliferation, preservation and in
some cases active creation of local cultural traditions, habits and
preferences to which local populations subscribe and adhere even without
invoking the often overwhelming power of nationalist sentiments. It is
here that capital’s definition of value confronts and in some respects
bleeds into more traditional ideals of value as articulated through
ethics, religion, culture or ethnic heritage.

The free gifts of nature and human nature are not constant. They depend
on the capitalist evaluation of the potential use values on offer.
Natural resources are not natural but economic, technical, social and
cultural appraisals of elements available in nature. For a time, access
to water power was important but the advent of the steam engine
liberated capital from such locational constraints. Uranium was an
irrelevant resource until the invention of nuclear power. Rare earth
metals were irrelevant until new technologies made them critical
resources. The labour skills honed to perfection in industrialised
regions before the 1970s were subsequently rendered redundant by
technological shifts that incorporated the skills into machine
technology and automation. Cultural aptitudes are important to the
evolution of certain kinds of consumerism that underpin the feverish
pursuit of signs of distinction, class and good taste in certain markets
of the world. The production of wants, needs and desires, as we earlier
pointed out, is a crucial aspect of capital’s history without which it
would long ago have disappeared. The nature and the human nature that
offer all sorts of free gifts to capital accumulation are neither given
‘by nature’ nor by some unchanging ‘human nature’. Nor are they evenly
distributed across the world. They are produced and ever-changing, and
capital itself plays a very significant role in their production. The
result is not global homogeneity but regional diversification. The value
of labour power, for example, ‘differs according to climate and level of
social development; it depends not only on physical needs but also on
historically developed social needs, which become second nature’.¹⁸

Fixed capital investments in the land that were long ago amortised
become part of this ‘second nature’ while cultural evolution has not
been immune to the influences of capital accumulation. The spirit of
entrepreneurialism is created not given and it is unevenly distributed
just as are the investments that produce a second nature. To point to
the importance of all this in the formation of distinctive value regimes
is not to resort to either physical or cultural determinism but to open
up, but not close, a discussion on the dialectical integration of
capital accumulation with the perpetual evolution of the contextual
geographical conditions of nature and human nature in which this process
occurs.

Not all of the gifts are benign – droughts, floods, hurricanes,
earthquakes and volcanic eruptions along with revolutions, religious and
cultural wars, nationalist rivalries and anti-immigrant movements are
among the most conspicuous of the many untoward or unintended
consequences that configure the complex relations between capital
accumulation and the evolution of nature and human nature. More
insidiously, the power of past investments to impose geographical
inertia cannot be ignored. Capital may prefer greenfield sites to avoid
entrapment in older networks of power and sclerotic infrastructures. In
the early stages of the industrial revolution, for example, industrial
capital avoided the merchant capitalist cities like Norwich and Bristol
and set up in small rural villages with names like Birmingham and
Manchester to avoid the power of organised labour in the guilds as well
as the conservative powers of the merchant capitalists who dominated
then-existing city governments. Even more emphatically in today’s world,
the increase of unproductive labour and the proliferation of regulations
exercises a negative drag on prospects for capitalist development. The
rise of urban and regional entrepreneurialism on the part of state
apparatuses attempts to counteract this problem by local subsidies,
promises of infrastructural investments and a promised ‘light touch’
when it comes to environmental and social regulation. Meanwhile, the
rising power of the institutions of anti-value creation and the work of
coordinating the flows of interest-bearing capital rest on the
availability of sophisticated communications and an easy regulative
environment if they are to flourish without constraint.¹⁹ The tension
between positive and negative natural and human environments for
different forms of capital accumulation is everywhere in evidence.

Marx encountered some of these questions in his analysis of differential
rents. Such rents arise in the first instance as free gifts of nature.
Superior natural fertility and/or location yields a higher profit rate
to firms blessed with such advantages. The advantages are relatively
permanent (since no competitor can move on to their privileged site for
production given the monopoly that always attaches to the land²⁰) though
in the case of location, position in relative space can change
dramatically with transport investments. The excess profits can and
usually are taxed away by landowners as ground rent. This has the effect
of equalising the rate of profit between firms in a world of
geographically uneven use value endowments. This was what justified, in
Marx’s view, the continued appropriation of rent – predominantly a
feudal institution – under capitalism.

The conditions that allow for the appropriation of differential rents
can also be actively produced. Fixed capital investments of an
independent kind embedded in the land lead to the second form of
differential rent. Competitive advantages that did not exist before can
be produced and created in and on the land as privileged use values for
capital to use as free gifts deriving from ‘second nature’.

Long-term investments in what I call the secondary and tertiary circuits
of capital through which the physical and social infrastructures for
capital accumulation are produced furnish a basic mechanism by ways of
which capital constructs the necessary physical and social conditions
appropriate to its own needs at a particular historical time and
place.²¹ The mobilisation of capital flows to construct these
infrastructures is a complicated affair and frequently requires not only
a sophisticated credit system but also state organ-isation, financing
and other forms of intervention. In the process a wholly different form
of temporal circulation is generated and superimposed upon the
visualisation of capital as value in motion with which we began (see
Figure 3, page 151).

The structures that result can be long-lasting and influential in the
formation and sustenance of value regimes. Baron Haussmann’s boulevards
(and his sewage and water works and the parks like Bois de Boulogne)
last to this day, as do the works of Robert Moses across the New York
metropolitan region in the immediate post-1945 period in New York. The
investments in higher education that were paralleled by the enhancement
of the research universities in the United States conferred competitive
advantage on the United States for two generations at least, and shaped
its value regime in very distinctive ways. A flood of investment of a
similar sort in recent years into higher education in China (largely
modelled on the success of Singapore) may well do the same for them long
into the future.

Investments in social and physical infrastructures create geographical
concentrations of relative advantage to which capital is inevitably
drawn. The free gifts of nature and human nature need to be produced
before they can be gifted to capital. Poor regions grow poorer and rich
regions typically grow ever richer unless some crisis occurs which
breaks the circular and cumulative causation process at work behind the
uneven development of distinctive geographical value regimes.²¹
Long-lasting advantages persist well beyond the date at which the value
of the fixed capital or the consumption fund is redeemed. Earlier
investments in higher education in the United States made it possible to
counter the deindustrialisation that afflicted manufacturing from the
1970s onwards. Internet and high tech firms like Google, Microsoft,
Amazon and the like quickly established themselves as global
monopolists, though, as usual, the benefits flow to capital and not to
labour.

The relations between different value regimes were crisis prone even in
Marx’s day. ‘The crisis may first break out in England, the country
which advances most of the credit and takes the least, because the
balance of payments … which must be settled immediately, is unfavourable
even though the general balance of trade is favourable. The crash in
England, initiated and accompanied by a gold drain, settles England’s
balance of payments … Now comes the turn of some other country.’ The
costs of devaluation are then forced back upon the initiating region by
‘first shipping away precious metals; then selling consigned commodities
at low prices; exporting commodities to dispose of them or obtain money
advances on them at home; increasing the rate of interest, recalling
credit, depreciating securities, disposing of foreign securities, and
finally bankruptcy, which settles a mass of claims.’.²² Britain, faced
with the problem of overaccumulation in the nineteenth century, solved
its problem by lending money to Argentina to build the railways that
used British-made surplus equipment. There is much that is all too
recognisable in this sort of sequence. But the tacit assumption of
Marx’s account is that the world needs to be studied and understood in
terms of fluctuating power relations between different value regimes in
the global economy.

The big difference between Marx’s day and now is that the appearance of
such crises is not primarily marked by a gold drain (though that does
occur) nor can it be settled by shipping away precious metals even as
the balance of payments between countries is a crucial source of global
instabilities. It is usually settled by a loan from the IMF at the cost
of severe austerity measures imposed upon the population. Any diminution
in the volumes of world trade or instabilities in the balances of trade
crises, are even more important now than they ever were. Declining
volumes of world trade are widely accepted now as clear harbingers of
global crises, unless the institutions at what I call ‘the state–finance
nexus’ of capital (now constituted by the US Federal Reserve and the US
Treasury backed by the IMF and then by the other main central banks)
manage the dollar balances in world trade effectively. Without the gold
standard, we now live in a world where human manipulation and management
are all there is that stands between us and a catastrophe in global
financial and commodity markets. This is not a plea to bring back the
gold standard. That would be equally if not more disastrous.

The case for thinking of regional value regimes that intersect and
relate to each other dynamically over time appears irrefutable. That the
value regimes have been converging more and more particularly in their
labour market practices over the last forty years or so is likewise
undeniable. We are closer to a global labour market now than ever before
in human history. That there are signs of an increasing homogenisation
of wants, needs and desires among middle class populations everywhere is
also undeniable. But there is still a considerable way to go before
there is total homogenisation of the multiple value regimes that
currently exist. But, as so often happens with Marxist style
propositions, it is not hard to spot counteracting forces of
disintegration, dispersal and realisation such that the tension between
universal and particular remains permanently with us to be internalised
within the law of value itself.

There is and never can be any single system of values. It is impossible
to escape the obvious historical materialist practices by which the
motion of capital across the world stage utilises and constructs
geographical differences in how the social labour done for others is
conceptualised, utilised and measured. Geographical differentiations and
uneven geographical developments are major features that need to be
negotiated. The universality of world money encounters in the course of
its spatial movement radically different opportunities for valorisation
as well as substantially different conditions for realisation not only
because of variation in wants, needs and desires but also because of
differentiation in the ability to pay. While competition (even of a
monopolistic sort) may work to smooth out some of these differences, in
other instances it actively creates geographical differences most
conspicuously through differential investments in the fixed capital and
consumption fund of the built environment which are the source of
differential land and property rents on the world stage.²³ This leads to
sharpening competition between local, regional and power block economies
on the world stage. The active construction of alternative spaces across
the global economy becomes one of the prime, if generally neglected,
features of what the law of motion of capital is about.

The definition and identification of regional value regimes is no easy
matter. The absolute spaces and times of individual states or groups of
states such as the European Union or NAFTA certainly have a role to play
as the recent intricate politics of attempts at geo-political
engineering of the world economy indicate. The absolute boundaries of
NAFTA may work well to combine US know-how with Mexican low-cost labour
but that does not in any way preclude the use of Chinese parts and
African raw materials in the making of a product in Mexico to be
marketed in the United States. The increasing complexity of global value
chains superimposes a relative space–time dimension on almost all
activity and such movements do not stop, even if they have to pause, at
borders. As in the case of value in general, however, the immaterial but
objective aspects captured by relational space–time can be decisive in
the configuration of regional value regimes, even as hegemonic
constellations of political-economic power are centralised at certain
key nodal points within the complex networks and flows of material
goods, information, knowledge and reputational influence. Regional value
regimes can be nested at different scales. They are identifiable within
states. The so-called sun-belt of the United States is very different
from the rust-belt, and Catalonia is not Andalusia any more than Hamburg
is the same as Bavaria. Regional value regimes are unstable and floating
configurations of influence and power that exist and have powerful
manifestations even as they have no clear material definition.

We began this exploration of the space and time within which the laws of
motion of value assert themselves with the more than plausible assertion
that it is within the nature of capital itself to conquer and construct
the world market. We now see after traversing the contradictory terrain
over which those laws must work that it is also in the nature of capital
to shatter the uniformity, homogeneity and supra-sensible rationality of
the world market into so many potentially dangerous and incompatible
shards of heterogeneity, difference and uneven geographical development,
irrespective of all the irrational human failings that spatter the
collective history of humanity with blood and gore. That all of this
morphs into questions of geopolitical struggles between power-blocs on
the world stage is a matter of great consequence. The geopolitical
history of capitalism has been a rather ugly affair (and continues to be
threateningly so).²⁴ Considerations that flow from the creation of
distinctive value regimes in space and time have a subtle role to play
in that historical geography. But for some reason or other, neither Marx
nor subsequent thinkers working in the Marxist tradition have gone much
deeper into this aspect of value theory than variations on the early
twentieth-century theoretical debates on capitalist imperialism and the
role of colonialism and neocolonialism in the origins and reproduction
of the capitalist world system.²⁵


9 The Madness of Economic Reason

When commodities that are the bearers of value are finally consumed they
drop out of circulation. They thereby ‘cease to be a moment of the
economic process’. But this disappearance is contingent on the prior
conversion of value from the commodity into the money form, and money
has the capacity to remain in circulation in perpetuity. ‘In the case of
money,’ writes Marx, ‘it becomes _madness_; madness, however, as a
moment of economics and as a determinant of the practical life of
peoples.’¹ Daily life is held hostage to the madness of money. But
wherein lies this madness?

From the standpoint of commodities, exchange value is ‘only of passing
interest’ since the immediate aim of commodity production is to satisfy
social needs. Money in a world of exchange simply facilitates the
exchanges. But in the world of capital and surplus value production
money takes on a quite different character. Value here ‘preserves itself
through increase; and it preserves itself precisely only by constantly
driving beyond its quantitative barrier … Thus, growing wealthy is an
end in itself. The goal determining activity of capital can only be that
of growing wealthier, i.e. of magnification, of increasing itself.’
Money, insofar as it works as a measure of wealth, must likewise engage
in ‘the constant drive to go beyond its quantitative limit; an endless
process. Its own animation consists exclusively in that; it preserves
itself as a self-validated exchange value distinct from use value only
by constantly multiplying itself.’ This is what distinguishes money
under capitalism from all of its multifarious pre-capitalist forms.
‘Money as a sum of money is measured by its quantity. This measuredness
contradicts its character, which must be oriented towards the
measureless.’² It can never be contained or constrained.

This is what Hegel refers to as ‘bad infinity’. This is the form of
infinity that has no ending and which, like God’s wisdom, surpasses all
human understanding. The number sequence is its paradigmatic form. For
every number there is always a larger one which goes beyond. The world’s
money supply, absent the constraint of any material gold base, is a bad
infinity. It is simply a set of numbers. Contemporary capitalism is
locked into the bad infinity of endless accumulation and compound
growth. In Marx’s interpretation, Wayne Martin suggests, ‘capitalism is
essentially oriented to an incompleteable infinitude, an orientation
grounded in the ontology of capital itself’.³ Money can accommodate to
the infinite need for the expansion of value simply by having the
central banks add zeros to the money supply, which is what they do
through quantitative easing. This is bad infinity, the spiral that gets
out of control, run riot. We used to speak in terms of millions, then it
became billions and trillions and soon, doubtless, we will speak in
terms of quadrillions of dollars in circulation, a number which
surpasses any real understanding.

Hegel’s virtuous infinity is the circle, the Möbius strip or the Escher
staircase in which motion can continue for ever but where everything is
calculable and knowable in advance. In the first two volumes of
_Capital_, Marx devotes lengthy chapters to simple reproduction. It is
almost as if he wishes to explore the virtuous cyclical forms of
reproduction that might be possible in a non-capitalist world of zero
accumulation. The trouble starts with the production of surplus value
and the necessity of its perpetual expansion, which entails the shift
from a cyclical virtuous infinity to a spiral of endless accumulation.
It is this shift that forces the perpetual pursuit of an ‘incompleteable
infinitude’ on the part of capital. Use values, though clearly limited
by material constraints, are not, as we shall see, immune to this
madness. There are ‘attempts to raise consumption to an imaginary
boundlessness’ while much else ‘appears as limitless waste’ in which the
accelerating degradation of the environmental commons features so
prominently.⁴

In the third volume of _Capital_ Marx uncovers another dimension to this
madness. Interest-bearing capital is judged ‘the mother of every insane
form’.⁵ In this case, money reverts to its role as a commodity but one
whose use value is that it can be lent out in infinite quantities to
others to produce surplus value. Its exchange value is interest. Money,
the representation of value, itself acquires a money value. Interest is
an ‘irrational expression right from the start’. The upshot is an
‘absurd contradiction’ in which the ‘inner tendency of capital appears
as a compulsion exercised over it by alien capital’.⁶ Anti-value takes
over. When the circulation of interest-bearing capital (the power of the
stock and bondholders) becomes the prime force for keeping value in
motion, then ‘the fetish character of capital and the representation of
this capital fetish is now complete’.⁷ The madness of economic reason
gets disguised by fetish forms in which money appears to have the
magical power of making more money without cease. I place my money in a
savings account and the money increases at a compound rate without me
doing anything.

It is, however, ‘damned difficult,’ Marx argues, ‘for Messrs the
economists to make the theoretical transition from the self-preservation
of value in capital to its multiplication’.⁸ Our understanding of the
world is held hostage to the insanity of a bourgeois economic reason
that not only justifies but promotes accumulation without limit while
pretending to a virtuous infinity of harmonious growth and continuous
and attainable improvements in social well-being. The economists have
never confronted the ‘bad infinity’ of endless compound growth that can
only culminate in devaluation and destruction. Instead, they laud the
virtues of a bourgeoisie who have triumphantly ‘subjugated historical
progress to the service of wealth’.^(9.) They steadfastly evade the
question of whether crises are inherent in such a system. Crises, they
say, are due to acts of God or nature or to human errors and
miscalculations (particularly those attributable to misguided state
interventions). Any or all of these can derail the supposedly immaculate
machine of endless free market capitalism. But the machine in itself,
the economists hold, is the epitome of perfection. When confronted with
a crisis, the economists can only claim ‘that if production were carried
on according to the textbooks, crises would never occur’. ‘Every reason
which they (the economists) put forward against crisis is an exorcised
contradiction, and therefore a real contradiction. The desire to
convince oneself of the non-existence of contradictions, is at the same
time the expression of a pious wish that the contradictions, which are
really present, should not exist.’¹⁰ Contemporary economic science is
contradiction-free.

[Images]

Figure 4 _Growth of public, corporate and private debt in the USA
(Federal Reserve Bank of St Louis)_

It is in this context that Marx decided to dedicate so much of his
intellectual effort and working life to the _critique_ of political
economy and the madness of economic reason. In the process, he uncovers
deeper and deeper irrationalities and ‘insane forms’ in the systemic
thought and political programme that is supposed to guide us to a
utopianism of everyday life. The contradictory laws of motion that he
identifies solely advantage a capitalist class and its acolytes, while
reducing whole populations to exploitation of their living labour in
production, to paltry possibilities in their daily life and debt
servitude in their social relations.

The madness of bourgeois economic reason, Marx discovers, is further
magnified by the growing antagonisms between value and its monetary
representations. As money is necessarily cut free from any material base
(such as that of the money commodities of gold and silver) so its
idealist constructions (as numbers of dollars, euros, yen, etc.), and
even more importantly its increasing appearance as forms of credit
money, become vulnerable to the vagaries of human judgments, open to
excesses and manipulations by whoever holds the reins of power. ‘From
its servile role … as mere medium of circulation, (money) suddenly
changes into the lord and god of the world of commodities’ that can be
‘tangibly brought into the possession of a particular individual.’ Money
is an individualised claim upon the social labour of others in exactly
the same way that debt is a claim over the future labour of those
others. Money gives its possessor ‘a power over society, over the whole
world of gratifications, labours, etc.’¹¹ The gap between the
proliferation of such claims and the value base upon which such claims
might be based has widened enormously since Marx’s day. If everyone in
the world went to the banks to demand cash equal to their deposits then
it would take several months if not years to print the notes required.
Two trillion dollars a day change hands on foreign exchange markets.

But this is only the tip of an iceberg of phenomena within the financial
world. The flows of credit moneys, of that form of anti-value which
capital itself creates, have increased enormously since the 1970s
(Figure 4, page 175).¹² In the first instance these flows lubricate
activities within the field of distribution itself. The latter more and
more appears as a black hole into which a mass of value disappears in
the name of debt redemption, without any security that it will ever
re-emerge. Inter-bank lending is at an all-time high as are the
interchanges between financial institutions and the central banks. Banks
have long lent to governments against the security of the state’s power
to tax. The power of the state to tax is reciprocally used to bail out
banks in trouble. The escalating national debts of the leading states
have not the faintest hope of ever being legally retired. But
significant flows of tax revenues into debt redemption become normalised
within the field of distribution as a whole. Much of the effective
demand derived from state expenditures, on the other hand, is fictitious
capital (anti-value) generated within the credit system and lent to the
state. The claims to future value production endlessly expand. Consumer
credit (some of it of a predatory sort) is made available to everyone
(including workers and students) and typically escalates as it
circulates. The fantasy of ‘an imaginary boundlessness’ in consumption
is avidly pursued. Credit flows to land and property owners. It fuels
speculation in rents and other asset values that then have the power to
magically increase without limit. Merchants and industrialists borrow
even in the face of the potent power of anti-value that may destroy them
at some future date. Merchants, land and property owners, states and
anyone else who saves (including more privileged sectors of the working
classes) deposit surplus funds in financial institutions in the
expectation (sometimes deceived) of a rate of return.

[Images]

Figure 5 _Chinese consumption of cement (redrawn from original in_
National Geographic_)_

Marx recognised the importance of fictitious capital formation and asset
speculation while highlighting the madness of their economic reason. He
understood full well that these inter-distributional relations
constitute acute ‘moments of economics’ affecting ‘the practical life of
peoples’. But, as everyone knows, this is a notoriously opaque and
mystified arena of capitalist activities that eludes any easy summary or
even superficial description.

[Images]

Figure 6 _World consumption of steel (source: RBA)_

But this ‘limitlessness’ cannot be confined to the world of credit
moneys. It has implications for the worlds of use values and value
production. ‘Capital is the endless and limitless drive to go beyond its
limiting barrier … Capital as such creates a specific surplus value
because it cannot create an infinite one all at once; but it is the
constant movement to create more of the same. The quantitative boundary
of the surplus value appears to it as a mere natural barrier, as a
necessity which it constantly tries to violate and beyond which it
constantly seeks to go.’¹³

To study capitalist economic history is to study this madness in action.
Consider the following astonishing but all too concrete fact. Between
1900 and 1999, the United States consumed 4,500 million tons of cement.
Between 2011 and 2013, China consumed 6,500 million tons of cement. In
two years, the Chinese consumed nearly 45 per cent more cement than the
United States had consumed in the whole of the preceding century (Figure
5, page 177).¹⁴ Those of us who live in the United States have seen
plenty of cement used over our lifetimes. But what has happened in China
is extraordinary. The increase in the scale of spreading cement around
is unprecedented. It provokes worrying questions. What might the
environmental, political and social consequences be? There seems to be
more than a touch of madness about it. Is this the ‘imaginary
boundlessness’ of which Marx speaks?

[Images]

Figure 7 _World consumption of copper_

Cement is used in construction. This means a massive investment in the
creation of built environments, in urbanisation and the construction of
other physical infrastructures (transport systems, dams, container
terminals and airports). It is not only cement that is used. There has
been an enormous expansion of steel production and use. In recent years,
more than half of the world’s steel output and use has taken place in
China (Figure 6, page 178). A lot of iron ore is required to make that
steel. It comes from faraway places like Brazil and Australia. Many
other materials, like copper, sand and minerals of all sorts, have been
consumed at unprecedented rates. In the last few years, China has been
consuming at least half (and in some instances 60 or 70 per cent) of the
world’s key mineral resources (Figure 7).

Raw-material prices have, until recently, tended to soar as a result.
Mining activity has been accelerating everywhere. From India to Latin
America to Australia, whole mountains are being moved in the search for
minerals, with all sorts of deleterious political, economic and
environmental consequences. The huge expansion of urban and
infrastructural investment in China has had many global ramifications.
All those countries exporting raw materials to China came out of the
recession of 2007–8 very quickly: Australia, Chile, Brazil, Zambia along
with Germany, which exported high tech equipment.

One of the reasons that a troubled global capitalism survived as well as
it did after 2007–8 was because of China’s sustained growth of
productive consumption. The Communist Party leadership in Beijing almost
certainly did not set out to save global capitalism, but this is in
effect what they did.

To explain how and why this happened, I need to dig deeper into the
recent geo-economic history of the different regional value regimes. A
financial crisis occurred in the United States in 2007–8. Because it
originated in the United States it was defined as a global crisis.
Earlier crises occurred in Southeast Asia in 1997–8 or in Turkey and
Argentina in 2001–2; but they were considered regional crises within
particular value regimes. The United States still has one of the largest
and most influential economies in the world and major disruptions within
it are bound to spill over to affect other regional value regimes. There
is also some evidence that US institutions and policy makers actively
sought to disperse the negative effects of the financial crisis around
the world (through the control of international institutions such as the
IMF and through the mechanism provided by the dollar as the global
reserve currency) in the hope of diluting its effects at home. Crises
always tend to move around but they do so more rapidly with some
effective support from agencies of state power and the politicians.

The crisis of 2007–8 was at first instance quite localised. It
originated particularly in the southern and southwestern United States,
and arose largely out of intense speculation in housing and property
markets fuelled by easy credit and ‘sub-prime’ lending. Speculative
money poured into US property markets (as it did in Ireland and Spain,
among other places) after the stock market crashed in 2001. The world
was awash with surplus liquidity during those years and interest-bearing
capital had few opportunities for investment. Much of it was absorbed in
property markets and raw material extraction forcing prices up and up.
When the speculative housing bubble burst, there was a huge foreclosure
crisis on housing loans in the United States as well as in Ireland,
Spain and some other countries.

People who have been foreclosed upon and who are unemployed don’t go out
and buy things. The consumer market in the United States tanked. China
was a primary supplier of goods to that consumer market. Export
industries in China tanked in turn. This was one link whereby a
localised crisis went global. The other link was through the financial
system. Financial institutions had structured mortgage debt on housing
so as to be able to pass it on to others as an investment yielding good
returns that were supposedly ‘as safe as houses’. But many of the
mortgages were not secured by an ability to pay. Anyone who had been
gulled into investing in the new financial instruments lost money. The
banks that held a serious part of the debt were threatened with failure
and tightened credit, including credit to already cautious consumers
everywhere. The weakness in the US consumer goods market spread and
deepened. The downward spiral threatened to engulf the whole world in
depression.

In 2008, China faced a 30 per cent contraction in exports. Factories in
southern China were closing down. Chinese statistics are notoriously
unreliable, but by some accounts, between 20 and 30 million jobs were
lost. The Chinese government has always been nervous about potential
social unrest. Twenty or thirty million unemployed workers posed a
signal danger, which the Chinese government needed to address if it was
to maintain its legitimacy and its power.

By 2010, a joint report from the International Monetary Fund and the
International Labour Organisation tallied up estimates of the global net
job loss from the crisis.¹⁵ The United States had the largest net loss
of 7.5 million jobs, while China’s net job loss was only about 3
million. Somehow, China had managed to absorb at least 17 million people
and possibly many more back into the labour market in the space of about
one year. This is an astounding and totally unprecedented performance.

[Images]

Figure 8 _Rising debt (state, corporate and household) in China (Morgan
Stanley)_

How did China absorb such vast amounts of surplus labour so fast? It
seems the central government told everybody to take on as many
infrastructure and mega-projects as possible. The banks were told to
lend to developers without restraint. In the United States, when the
Federal Reserve and the US Treasury gave money to the banks to lend in
2008, the banks used the money to retire their bad debts (de-leveraging
it is called) and even bought back their own stock. In the United
States, the government does not have power over the banks. The Chinese
banking system does not work that way. In China, if bankers are told by
the central government to lend, they lend. And they evidently did,
incidentally making a lot of people ultra-wealthy in the process.
Suddenly China became a world populated by billionaires, second only to
the United States.

The mass construction effort in China was debt-financed. The country’s
debt quadrupled between 2007 and 2015. By 2016 the formal debt stood at
250 per cent of GDP. The debt had to be extended to both production and
consumption. Household debt has risen dramatically (otherwise who would
buy all those new housing units?).¹⁶ Easy credit pushed property prices
upwards. Speculation in housing values became rife. In the summer of
2016 housing prices nationally were rising at 7.5 per cent a year while
in the ten top metropolitan areas in China the increase was 20 per
cent.¹⁷ Meanwhile, local, state and municipal governments borrowed up to
the hilt. Rumours surfaced in 2014 of a mass of toxic debts hidden
within a shadow banking system and in the bowels of municipal finance.¹⁸
Fears of some sort of financial crash in the offing periodically erupt
in the financial press. China’s debt is not, however, denominated in
dollars but in its own currency. So there is no prospect of outside
intervention from, for example, the IMF or foreign bondholders (as was
the case for hapless Greece). The central government has large foreign
exchange reserves which could be used, as they had been in previous
periods of financial difficulty, to recapitalise financial institutions.

China in effect unleashed the power of anti-value to force value
production upwards to absorb as much surplus labour as possible. China
was not the only country to do this. The IMF reports a huge increase in
global levels of debt finance since 2007–8 (Figure 8, page 182). Global
non-financial sector debt now stands at $152 trillion, the highest
levels in history (225 per cent of global GDP).¹⁹ The United States is
one of the few countries where some reduction in net debts occurred
after 2008, mainly by way of austerity politics at all levels of
government and continuing problems of housing finance. This resulted in
stagnant effective demand which held back the recovery from the crisis.

The unprecedented pace of global debt creation since the 1970s suggests
a global economy that is increasingly growing by the deployment of the
smoke and mirrors of anti-value creation within the world’s multiple
regional monetary systems. A lot of the debt is probably toxic, covered
by the creation of even more debt (as happens in Ponzi schemes). It is
not clear where the value will come from to redeem the ever-escalating
debt.

China absorbed a massive amount of labour by launching a huge programme
of investment in productive consumption in the built environment. A
quarter of GDP came from the production of housing alone and another
quarter or more from infrastructural investments in highways, water
systems, rail networks, airports and the like. Whole new cities were
built (several of them ‘ghost cities’ that have yet to be populated²⁰).
The space economy of the nation is better integrated with highways and
high-speed rail networks, connecting southern and northern markets in a
much stronger way, developing the interior so that it was much better
linked to the coast. While clearly the central government had wanted to
do something like this for some time (plans were laid for the high-speed
rail network during the 1990s), it mobilised everything it could during
this period to absorb the surplus and potentially restive labour force.
In 2007 there were zero miles of high-speed rail in China. By 2015 there
were nearly 12,000 miles linking all the major cities. This, by any
standard, was a phenomenal performance.

There was, however, nothing new about the manner of China’s response to
its economic difficulties. Consider the case of the United States after
World War II. The US economy needed to absorb the huge increase in
productive capacity created during the war and create well-paying jobs
for a large number of returning veterans. Policy makers knew that if
veterans returning to civilian life were faced with unemployment on the
scale of the 1930s, then there would surely be serious political and
economic unrest. The reproduction of capitalism was at stake.

The first front was to repress all oppositional left wing thinking
through the anti-communist movement known as McCarthyism. The second
front was to confront the economic problem of surplus capital and
surplus labour supply. This was done in part through US imperialism, the
Cold War and an expansion of militarism (the rise of the famous
‘military industrial complex’ that President Eisenhower unsuccessfully
tried to thwart). These initiatives were supplemented by a massive wave
of investments into physical and social infrastructures (such as higher
education). The interstate highway system pulled together the West Coast
and the South, and spatially integrated the US economy in new ways. Los
Angeles was an ordinary-sized city in 1945, but by 1970 it had become a
megalopolis. Metropolitan areas were totally re-engineered with
transport, highways and cars, and above all with sprawling suburbs. The
figure of Robert Moses, the genius planner who reconfigured the whole
design of the metropolitan region of New York, bestrode the world of
both ideas and practice of urbanisation and modernist metropolitan
re-engineering.²¹ The development of a whole new suburban lifestyle
(acclaimed in popular TV sitcoms like _The Brady Bunch_ and _I Love
Lucy_ which celebrated a certain kind of ‘daily life of peoples’) along
with all sorts of propaganda for the ‘American Dream’ of individualised
homeownership stood at the centre of a huge campaign to construct new
wants, needs and desires, a totally new lifestyle, in the population at
large. Well-paid jobs were required to support the effective demand.
Labour and capital came to an uneasy compromise at the urging of the
state apparatus in which a white working class made economic gains, even
as minorities were left out. The 1950s and 1960s were, in many respects,
the golden years of capital accumulation in the United States: high
rates of growth, a satisfactory situation for a white working class,
even as a powerful civil rights movement and uprisings in central cities
showed that all was not well for the impoverished and marginalised
African-American and immigrant populations. But the overaccumulation
problem was solved for fifteen or more years by these means. As the
Chair of the San Francisco Federal Reserve was reported to have said,
the United States ‘gets out of crises by building houses and filling
them with things’.²² But, as later became obvious in the foreclosure
wave of 2007–8, this is how capital gets into crises as well.

A similar example of using urbanisation to solve economic and political
problems had occurred much earlier in Second Empire Paris.²³ The
economic crisis of 1848 prompted working class and bourgeois revolutions
in that city. Both failed and Louis Napoleon (nephew of Bonaparte) was
elected President on the promise of making France great again. He took
absolute power in a coup d’état in December 1851 and declared himself
Emperor in 1852. He immediately set up a network of spies and secret
police to inform upon and control all opposition. But he also knew that
he would not last long unless he put labour and capital back to work. A
fan of the utopian theories of Saint-Simon, he initiated public works
projects funded by associated capital and brought Haussmann to Paris to
oversee the rebuilding of the city. Capital and labour were soon fully
and profitably employed, creating the new boulevards, parks, department
stores, fresh piped potable water and sewers and the like. Daily life
was transformed into the bourgeois consumerism of the city of light, the
cafés and the music halls and urban spectacles (fashion displays upon
the boulevards) flourished. We still see the consequences of this effort
at urban transformation today when we walk Haussmann’s boulevards, sit
in the corner cafés and drink the tap water in central Paris.

But the scale and speed of these changes were nowhere near that wrought
by Robert Moses in the United States after 1945 and dwarf into
insignificance when compared to the scale and the speed of the
transformations in China in recent times.

In all these instances there was a common underlying problem. New credit
institutions and methods of financing had to be created to sustain the
building efforts. Anti-value had to be created to force the production
of value. A new kind of credit-driven banking became more prominent in
Paris in the 1850s. But at a certain point, debt creation and scepticism
as to the value that stood behind the debt came to the fore. Paris’s
debt crisis of 1867 (fifteen years after Louis Bonaparte’s coup)
engulfed not only the speculative financial institutions but also the
finances of the city. Haussmann was forced to resign (much as Moses did
in New York a century later). Unemployment and unrest ensued. Louis
Bonaparte sought to save himself with a nationalist strategy that led
into the Franco-Prussian War of 1870–1. He lost the war and fled to
England. In the wake of the war and the German siege of Paris the
inhabitants of Paris made their own revolution – the Commune of 1871 –
one of the greatest urban uprisings in human history. The people took
back ‘their’ city from the bourgeoisie and the capitalists who had in
their view plundered and despoiled it. The wants, needs and desires of
working people and a radicalised bourgeoisie offended by the conspicuous
consumption of the Second Empire surged to the fore. They sought to
create a different kind of society and a different kind of city.²⁴ But
the upper classes, expelled from the city, rallied rural sentiments and
ruthlessly destroyed the Commune in a blood bath in which some 30,000
communards were killed.

Solving the overaccumulation problem through rapid urbanisation comes at
a certain cost. In the United States, new mortgage finance and other
institutions had been put in place in the 1930s, but even greater levels
of state intervention occurred after 1945 (such as the GI bill that gave
returning veterans privileged access to housing and higher education).
The system worked well for a time, but stresses were evident as early as
1967. Around then, Moses was forced out of power. The whole process came
to a crashing halt with the rising political discontents of the ’68
generation and a civil rights movement that fostered inner-city
uprisings. First wave feminists saw the suburbs as hostile territory and
the ’68 generation, inspired by Jane Jacobs’s critique of Moses’s
sterile modernist planning style, was in open revolt against the
conventional lifestyle of the suburbs and arid attempts at corporate
urban renewal. The wants, needs and desires of the ’68 generation were
radically different, demanding of a different kind of urbanisation and
lifestyle. To top it all, the property market collapsed shortly
thereafter, culminating in the technical bankruptcy of New York City in
1973–5 (the city had one of the largest public budgets in the capitalist
world at that time).²⁵ This initiated a period of serious recession and
capitalist restructuring in the United States that also affected the
United Kingdom, Europe and the rest of North America, eventually
extending globally in a wave of neoliberal restructuring of capitalism
in general.²⁶ The restructuring entailed the accelerating growth of
indebtedness and the circulation of interest-bearing capital as the
prime energy source for endless capital accumulation. It also ushered in
the rise of a new kind of urban and suburban lifestyle more in tune to
the libertarian demands of the ’68 generation.

After 2008, the Chinese in effect copied (probably without knowing it)
what Louis Bonaparte did in Paris after 1848 and the United States had
done after World War II (even to include major investments in higher
education). But they did it much faster and at a much larger scale, as
the data on cement construction show. This change of scale and speed is
consistent with Marx’s portrait of the drive of capital to reproduce
itself by way of accelerating expansion of use as well as exchange
values.

It was not only China that sought to emulate this history of existing
crises by construction projects and filling them with things. Turkey,
for example, went through the same kind of expansion in its
urbanisation: a new airport for Istanbul, a third bridge over the
Bosphorus, the urbanisation of the northern part of the city to create a
city of some 45 million people. Every city in Turkey witnessed a
building boom. As a result, Turkey was hardly affected by the crash of
2008 (although it too saw its export industries suffer). Turkey had the
second highest growth rate after China in the post-2008 period. As so
often happens, this led to an urban revolt (faint echoes of the Paris
Commune) focused on Gezi Park in Istanbul in 2013. Spectacular
urbanisation in the Gulf States also absorbed a lot of surplus capital,
though in this case it was imported immigrant labour that was involved.
In major urban centres in North America and Europe, property markets
quickly revived after 2009 but mainly for high-end housing projects for
the affluent. New York City and London soon were experiencing property
revivals in high-end construction in the midst of a chronic absence of
any investment in affordable housing for the less well off.

Step back a moment and think about what is happening. There is something
insane about the spectacular urbanisation (‘limitless waste and
boundless consumption’) of the Gulf States in a region of the world
desperate for mass improvements in the well-being of the common people.
The same has to be said about the investment in high-end condos for the
rich and the ultra-rich in New York City where there is a crisis of
affordable housing and 60,000 homeless people on the streets. The
seething slums of Mumbai are punctuated by palatial buildings for the
newly minted billionaires. Many of these high-end buildings are not
lived in. Walk the streets of New York and see how many lights are on at
night in those spectacular condos for the affluent soaring high into the
night sky. The buildings are simply investment vehicles not only for the
ultra-rich but for anyone who has some spare cash to save.

When China relaxed its foreign exchange controls in 2016, a flock of
Chinese buyers appeared in New York City, Vancouver, San Francisco and
elsewhere, looking for a place to park their money rather than a place
to live. When Irish entrepreneurs were flush with money before 2007 they
also bought into Manhattan real estate. The Russians, the Saudis, the
Australians are doing the same. And it’s not only the billionaires who
are doing it. Upper-middle-class people are pursuing a property and land
grab wherever they can. Workers’ pension funds invest in predatory real
estate equity schemes because that is where the rate of return is
highest. It can happen that these funds connive at the eviction of
tenants who have investments in the pension funds that provide the
financing.²⁷

Capital is building cities for people and institutions to invest in, not
cities for the common people to live in. How sane is this?

As the construction boom in China receded, surplus productive capacity
in cement and steel production became a problem. The global demand for
raw materials slackened and the terms of trade for raw material
producers turned unfavourable. In 2013, Brazil was flush with money. By
2016 it was in deep recession. Since 2014 most of Latin America has seen
deepening economic distress, because the Chinese market is not so
vigorous any more. Even Germany, which exports high tech machine tools
and equipment to China, felt the draught.

Capital continues to move around in search of a ‘spatial fix’ to its
overaccumulation problems but at an accelerating rate. This is what
economic imperialism was traditionally about. Surplus capital and labour
from Britain in the nineteenth century came to the United States or went
to Australia, South Africa and Argentina. Britain lent funds to those
countries to build their railways and infrastructures using surplus
steel and rolling stock produced in Britain. The improved productivity
of the recipient economy redeemed the debt in time. This is how foreign
aid is typically structured to this day. Dynamic capitalist economies
were produced in new locations (as in the case of the United States
vis-à-vis Britain and more recently through US investments in China).
Imperial strategies of protecting market share and curbing competition
from the new spaces, as Britain did in the case of India, were less
successful. They failed to produce compounding global growth and in the
1930s helped produce a depression.

Seeking spatial fixes to solve overaccumulation problems continues to be
a common capitalist practice. The Japanese took to exporting surplus
capital from the late 1960s on; South Korea followed suit in the late
1970s; and Taiwan in the early 1980s. Flows of surplus capital from
these territories went all over the world but were particularly
important in building productive capacity in China.²⁸

Now it is China’s turn to export. Overcapacity exists in steel
production. How is it to be managed? The state seeks to reduce capacity
through plant closures. But this is difficult given fierce local
resistance to job losses. The Chinese are proposing another bout of
investment in urban infrastructures. They plan to create a city of some
130 million people – equivalent to the population of the United Kingdom
and France combined. It will be centred on Beijing. Investments will be
focused on high-speed transport and communications.²⁹ What is being
proposed is the rationalisation of three major urban regions: one
centred in Beijing, the second in Shanghai and the third in Guangdong
Province. Several multimil-lion cities already exist in each of these
regions. The plan seems to be to seek a higher order rationalisation of
space relations between them as a way to mop up surplus cement and steel
production capacity for the next few years.

China is also exporting as much steel as it can at low cost. Higher cost
steel plants elsewhere (in Britain, for example) are being forced to
close. China is being challenged before the WTO for dumping subsidised
steel in the world market. It will almost certainly be obliged to stop
this trade if it wants ‘Market Economy Status’ in the WTO. But Chinese
corporations are also lending money on relatively easy terms to
countries to build railways, highways and physical infrastructures in,
for example, East Africa using Chinese steel as well as surplus Chinese
labour, even though there is plenty of local surplus labour available.
The same is happening in Latin America. Proposals exist to build a
competitor to the Panama Canal through Nicaragua, and transcontinental
rail lines running from the Pacific to the Atlantic coasts. It will then
be possible to get from the port of Lima to São Paulo in about a day and
a half overland. Several proposals of this kind were laid out some time
ago in Latin America but nobody took them seriously until the Chinese
came along and said they had plenty of cement and steel and that they
would lend the money to purchase these materials and build the
infrastructures. While the cost of shipping will remain much lower it is
also slower and ‘time is money’ in the sphere of circulation these days.
China is also rebuilding the Silk Road route from Inner China to
Istanbul (and into Europe) via Tehran. A fast, high-capacity rail
network is planned through Central Asia into Europe (under the heading
of ‘One Belt, One Road’).³⁰ This project, with its offshoot through
Pakistan to the Arabian Sea port of Gwadar, will absorb plenty of
surplus capital and mop up some of the surplus steel capacity. Central
Asian cities along the Silk Road route are already experiencing building
booms and rapid expansions of trade with China and the easier access to
the Gulf States through Pakistan (avoiding the tedious sea journey
through the congested and militarily vulnerable Straits of Malacca)
almost certainly means a considerable expansion of accessible Chinese
trade outlets into that region.

The relative spaces of the global economy are being revolutionised (yet
again!) not because it is a good idea or desperately wanted and needed
in itself, but because this is the best way to stave off depression and
devaluation. The absorption of surplus capital is the aim. Marx
understood this all too well. ‘Next in urgency, perhaps, to the desire
to acquire money, is the wish to part with it again for some species of
investment that shall yield either interest or profit; for money itself,
as money, yields neither … Enterprises which entail a large capital and
create an opening from time to time for the excess of unemployed capital
… are absolutely necessary … so as to take care of the periodic
accumulations of the superfluous wealth of society, which is unable to
find room in the usual fields of application.’³¹ The result in this
particular case is a wholly new material base of space relations for the
reconstruction of the world’s divergent value regimes.

Capital is not the only agent involved in this spatial restructuring.
Mass migratory movements are bringing labour forces together into
competitive configurations. This has also happened before but it is now,
like the case of Chinese cement, at an unprecedented scale. It is not
only the volume of migratory movement that counts. The labour forces of
the world have been brought into a competitive relation with each other
by declining transport and communications costs, organisational
technologies and changing speed (rather than costs) of movement as well
as through the development of complex commodity chains. Time–space
compression in both capital and labour force relations produces a range
of political stresses and responses varying from anti-immigrant
movements, the rekindling of nationalist fervours or, on the more
positive side, the willing embrace of multiculturalism as a harbinger of
a different human future.

The stresses from all these rapid changes are everywhere in evidence and
affected populations know it, feel it and sometimes act out upon it. On
the night of 20 June 2013, for example, more than a million people
throughout the cities of Brazil took to the streets in a massive protest
movement. The largest protest, of more than 100,000 people, occurred in
Rio de Janeiro. Typically, it was met with significant police violence.
Sporadic protests had been occurring for more than a year in various
Brazilian cities. Led by a ‘Free Pass’ youth movement that had long been
agitating for free public transportation for students, the earlier
protests were largely ignored. But by early June 2013, fare increases
for public transportation sparked more widespread protests. Many other
groups, including the black block anarchists, sprang to the defence of
the ‘Free Pass’ protestors and others when the latter came under police
attack. By 13 June the movement had morphed into a general protest
against police repressions, the failure of public services to match
social needs and the deteriorated qualities of urban life. The huge
expenditures of public resources to host mega-events such as the World
Cup and the Olympic Games to the detriment of the public interest but to
the great benefit, it was widely understood, of corrupt construction and
urban development interests, added to the discontents.³²

The protests in Brazil came less than a month after thousands of people
turned out on the streets of Turkey’s major cities, as anger over the
redevelopment of the all-too-rare green space of Gezi Park in Istanbul
as a shopping centre, spread into a broader protest against the
increasingly autocratic style of the government and the violence of the
police response. Long simmering discontents over the pace and style of
urban transformation, including the wholesale evictions of populations
from high value land in inner city locations, added fuel to the
protests. The deteriorating qualities of urban life in Istanbul and
other cities for all but the most affluent classes was clearly an
important issue.³³

The protests in Turkey and Brazil, led Bill Keller of the _New York
Times_ to write an op-ed piece entitled ‘The Revolt of the Rising
Class’. The uprisings were ‘not born in desperation,’ he wrote. Both
Brazil and Turkey had experienced remarkable economic growth in a period
of global crisis. They were ‘the latest in a series of revolts arising
from the middle class – the urban, educated haves who are in some ways
the principal beneficiaries of the regimes they now reject’ but who also
had something to lose by taking to the streets in protest. ‘By the time
the movements reached critical mass, they were about something bigger
and more inchoate, dignity, the perquisites of citizenship, the
obligations of power.’³⁴ The revolts signified ‘a new alienation, a new
yearning’ that needed to be addressed. In both Turkey and Brazil
political power has chosen the path of reaction and repression
(violently so in Turkey) rather than accommodation in response.

So what is this ‘new alienation’ all about and what does it signify?
There have been abundant signs of it everywhere, from the
anti-globalisation protests that first came to public prominence in
Seattle in 1999, through the various movements in Europe (the Indignados
in Spain and the Athens protests in Syntagma Square), the uprisings that
were dubbed ‘the Arab Spring’ that began in Tunisia and spread via Egypt
and Syria to the Ukraine, followed by the various ‘Occupy’ movements in
New York and London and autonomy movements from Scotland to Catalonia
and Hong Kong to more recent right wing manifestations in Brazil up
until the election of far-right governments in Hungary, Poland and the
United States along with the secessionist Brexit vote in Britain – all
of these suggest a deepening climate of dissent, discontent and even
despair. The madness of economic reason with all of its impacts via
austerity and free market economics seems to be producing a parallel
madness – in this case anger – in the political sphere as well.

In _Seventeen Contradictions and the End of Capitalism_, I had suggested
there were three contradictions that posed a clear and present danger to
the survival of capitalism in the present era.³⁵ The first was the
deteriorating state of our relation to nature (everything from global
warming to habitat and species destruction, water scarcities and
environmental degradations). The second was compound growth for ever
that had reached that inflexion point on the exponential growth curve
that was rapidly proving harder and harder to perpetuate in the face of
increasing paucity of profitable investment opportunities. It was also
putting intense pressure on that one form of capital that can increase
without limit, particularly the credit forms of money that seemed to be
spiralling out of control. The third was what I called universal
alienation. Marx does not use this concept much in _Capital_ but it
echoes right throughout his earlier writings from the _Economic and
Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_ to culminate as a dominant motif in the
_Grundrisse_. The labour theory of value in _Capital_ describes
alienated labour without calling it that, perhaps because Marx felt the
Hegelianism of the term would not appeal to his target audiences (the
British and French working classes). Dropping the term does not,
however, abolish its content.³⁶

Value in Marx is socially necessary alienated labour. Since capital is
value in motion, then the circulation of capital entails the circulation
of alienated forms. To what degree do these alienations underpin the
evident political manifestations of discontent and despair?

The alienation inherent in valorisation is well known and longstanding.
The labourer who creates value is separated (alienated) from access to
the means of production, from command over the labour process, the
product and the surplus value. Capital makes it appear as if many of the
inherent powers (and free gifts) of labour and of nature belong to and
originate with it because it is capital that gives them meaning. Even
the mind and bodily functions of the labourer along with all the natural
forces freely deployed in production appear as contingent powers of
capital because it is capital that mobilises them. The alienation of the
relation to nature and to human nature is a precondition, therefore, for
the assertion of capital’s productivity and powers. In addition, the
productivity of labour is driven by technologies chosen by capital to
confirm not only its control over the labourer but to undermine the
dignity and putative powers of labour both in production and in the
market place. Meaningless jobs, contingent employment and unemployment
and ever lower rates of remuneration are the fate of labour unless
resistance is effectively mobilised to counteract them. In many parts of
the world there is no question that the alienation of labour has been
intensifying and deepening through technological changes, the
suppression of the organised power of the working class movements and
the mobilisation of global competition through the reorganisation of the
world’s territorial value regimes. Unemployment and, just as important,
underemployment and loss of meaning have been a byproduct of the strong
currents of technological and organisational change. Contemporary
utopian accounts of how the new technological configurations based in
artificial intelligence are bringing us to the brink of a brave new
world of emancipatory consumerism and disposable time for all, ignore
entirely the dehumanising alienation of the residual and disposable
labour processes that result. The collective traumatic and dissolving
effects of manufacturing plant closures on the social ties that had
previously bound people together in a given place and time cannot be
glossed over. Marx, for his part, thought there was an important
distinction to be drawn between workers who were objectified and
exploited by capital but felt they were needed (thereby retaining same
pride and dignity) on the one hand and those who were alienated,
dispossessed and felt themselves to be disposable on the other.³⁷ The
trend in employment conditions attendant upon mechanisation and
automation was towards labour of the latter sort. The loss of dignity
and respect is felt almost as hard as the loss of a job.

But there are other dimensions to this problem. Workers are hired
individually and compete for job opportunities. They have to sell
themselves to capital as bearers of labour power by advertising their
qualities while diminishing and even denigrating the qualities of their
competitors. Competition between workers frustrates cooperation and
hinders the building of class solidarities. It introduces all manner of
fragmentations. Workers become estranged from each other. This becomes
even more invidious when infused with racism, gender discriminations,
sexual, ethnic or religious hostilities in the labour market (divisions
which capital has a history of avidly encouraging). Heightened
competition (under conditions of widespread unemployment and the closer
spatial integration of the world’s labour forces) is everywhere
intensifying these splits and tensions within the labour force with
predictable political results, particularly in situations where previous
social solidarities have been dissolved through deindustrialisation.
These were, for example, the sentiments that Donald Trump so
successfully exploited in his presidential campaign of 2016 in the
United States.

Alienation upon realisation takes quite different as well as multiple
and often double-edged forms. The state of wants, needs and desires
always lies at the root of demand. Marx considered, without irony, that
the creation of new wants and needs was part of the civilising mission
of capital.³⁸ That opinion is hard to dispute when we consider, for
example, all those use values that can now be mobilised in the cause of
extending average life expectancy from thirty-five years or so in the
early years of capitalism to seventy years or more in many areas of the
world today. Capital produces a cornucopia of use values from which it
is in principle possible for people to create unalienated social
relations and ways of being in nature and with each other. The
potentiality is there. The world is dotted with heterotopic spaces in
which groups strive to construct unalienated ways of living and being in
the midst of a sea of alienation. The alienations experienced in
production stand to be recuperated through a compensatory consumption of
use values that improve the qualities of daily life.³⁹ On the other
hand, the wants, needs and desires of the military-industrial complex,
the gun lobby or the car producers have formed and continue to form
potent sources of aggregate demand engineered through corporate
influence over the state apparatus and through imposed lifestyle
choices. Their contributions to social well-being are dubious at best. A
city like São Paulo has as its economic base a car industry that
produces vehicles that spend hours stationary in traffic jams as they
clog the city streets spewing pollutants and isolating individuals from
each other. How sane an economy is that?

What to do about cars is one of the critical questions of our time,
which no one much wants to talk about (except in terms of better
management of flows through smart city technologies). Yet the warning
signs are everywhere. In the early winter of 2016, all Chinese cities
north of the Yangtze experienced killer smogs that closed airports and
snarled traffic for many days. Similar events occurred in New Delhi,
Tehran and extended even to Paris and (less intensely) to London. Life
expectancy has been declining north of the Yangtze over the last two
decades and deteriorating air quality is suspected as the prime reason.
Some of the worst industrial polluters, it should be remarked, are steel
and cement along with coal-fired power stations.

The relation between realisation and the history of consumerism overlaps
with the historical evolution of distinctive lifestyles. The building of
the suburbs and gated communities in the United States may have saved
global capitalism from return to depression conditions, but it also
corralled housing choices in ways that attach not only to material
requirements (e.g. a car and private property in housing) but also is
accompanied by political and ideological justifications of a way of life
(designated as ‘The American Dream’) that limits and imprisons rather
than liberates the horizons of personal fulfilment. The rise of
‘compensatory consumerism’ for the working classes is supplemented by
conspicuous consumption of ‘hedonistic goods’ within all classes that
add up to nothing more than conspicuous waste. The endless pursuit of
satisfactions of wants, needs and desires that can never be fulfilled,
necessarily parallels endless compounding growth in production. While it
would be wrong to consider the reconfiguration of all new wants, needs
and desires as ‘alienated’ it is not hard to see how alienations
flourish and have in many places and among certain marginalised classes
been intensifying in the kind of consumerist society that capital
necessarily constructs. The gap between the promise and the realisation
has been widening.

If the circulation of capital is under immense competitive pressure to
accelerate, then this requires speed-up in consumption. I still use my
grandparents’ knives and forks. If capital produced only items of this
sort it would long ago have fallen into permanent crisis. Capital
evolves a whole range of tactics, from planned obsolescence to
mobilising advertising pressures and fashion as tools of persuasion, all
in the cause of accelerating turnover time in consumption. Consider the
case of a Netflix original. The fact that I consume it does not prevent
it being consumed by others and the consumption time is that of an hour
or so, compared to my knives and forks that have lasted more than 100
years. The value entailed in the production and transmission through
intricate communication infrastructures is recuperated by literally
millions of users paying their Netflix subscriptions. Hardly
surprisingly, capital has cultivated a ‘society of spectacle’ in order
to assure a form of market growth of ephemeral products for
instantaneous consumption.⁴⁰ The social consequences of this are
far-reaching and double-edged. Rapid transformations in lifestyles,
technologies and social expectations multiply social insecurities and
increase social tensions across generations as well as between
diversifying social groups. Everybody seems intent on consulting their
mobile phones or their tablets rather than talking with each other. The
rootedness of cultural meanings becomes less secure, open to casual
reconstructions in accord with contemporary fantasies. Identities float
in a sea of transitory and ephemeral attachments. People and products
that correspond to this are needed if capital is to meet the requirement
of endless compound growth. This is what ‘rational consumption’ looks
like from the standpoint of endless capital accumulation.

The conditions and location of the realisation and appropriation of
value are very different from those of production. The Netflix original
may be made in Los Angeles but the realisation takes place in media
markets all over a country or even the world. My computer is produced in
Shenzhen by Foxconn and its value is realised by Apple in the United
States. The former earns a very low rate of profit while the latter
takes the bulk of the value and surplus value for itself. This is how
transfers of value are engineered from one space to another.⁴¹ The
fairness of this is being very much called into question.

Opportunistic forms of capital also intervene at the moment of
realisation to appropriate far more value than is warranted. When hedge
funds take over pharmaceutical companies or buy up large swathes of
foreclosed housing and then turn around and make them available to needy
consumers at exorbitant prices, then realisation becomes a moment for
the systematic organisation of accumulation by dispossession.⁴² If you
ask people what the major forms of exploitation experienced in the
United States are today, they mention credit-card fees. They mention
landlords and rents and property speculators. They mention what
telephone companies do to their telephone bills by adding all these
weird charges that say you were roaming someplace where you weren’t.
They mention health insurance companies, local taxes, transport costs
and so on. There is an immense amount of racketeering (sometimes akin to
robbery) that goes on at the point of realisation. The politics of
struggles over real-isation are apparent everywhere. The discontents are
legion.

The politics involved in the extraction of wealth at the moment of
realisation are different from those generated around production. Such
struggles are difficult to theorise and organise. It is not capital
versus labour but capital versus everybody else, between buyers and
sellers rather than between labour and capital. Middle-class populations
are buyers and get involved in struggles (sometimes of the
not-in-my-backyard sort) against racketeering merchants. Do working
class populations seek them out as allies against the property
speculators? The politics are just as robust and torment ridden as those
of valorisation even though they have a different structure and reflect
different forms of alienation. Revolutionary movements, like the Paris
Commune of 1871 or the ’68 movement, were, it turns out, often as much
indebted to a radicalised and alienated bourgeoisie barred from
realising their dreams and ambitions as they were to the working
classes. But cross-class organising can be difficult as well as often
frustrating. The increasing prominence of accumulation by dispossession
(with the massive losses in the recent foreclosure crisis in the
forefront) deepens despair and discontent in many segments of the
population.⁴³

While a lot of wealth is extracted by capital from realisation, even
more is sucked out from distribution. The most blatant form of
redistribution has to highlight the declining share of labour in the
national product in much of the world and the failure of labour in
recent times in particular to receive any benefits from rising
productivity. Labour has suffered instead from the unemployment and the
rapid deteriorations of qualities of work through technological change.
The shift from productive to unproductive labour accompanied by
excessive bureaucratisation within both the state and corporations has
not helped. Increasing inequality in incomes and wealth almost
everywhere throughout the capitalist world (with some rare exceptions)
adds to the mix of forces making for deep political discontents.⁴⁴

The politics and the mechanisms of other redistributions are, however,
very different and the consequent alienations that arise are so complex
as to require a whole book to deal with them. The different factions of
capital – merchants, financiers, property owners and industrial
capitalists – sometimes cooperate and complement each other. But they
also compete and are not averse to stealing from and exercising power
over each other. Usurious practices should have disappeared according to
Marx but capitalist financiers – who typically exhibit the ‘nicely mixed
character of swindler and prophet’⁴⁵ – rule the roost for financial
transactions and channel the circulation of interest-bearing capital in
ways that are often far from beneficial except to themselves. Tactics of
predatory lending are, for example, widespread. This lending is not
intended to promote the production of value but to entangle producers in
such a web of debt obligations as eventually they have no option except
to surrender their property rights to the lender. Such tactics were well
known in Marx’s time and frequently referred to in Volume 3 of
_Capital_. Financial institutions engaging in predatory lending towards
the working classes have in recent years successfully raided the housing
asset values of vulnerable populations. Predatory lending to states
often leads to structural adjustments imposed by the IMF, which diminish
the well-being of whole populations in order to redeem accumulated debts
(as is the problem for Greece).⁴⁶ The punitive treatment of Argentina
after court judgments (rendered in Manhattan because the debts were
dollar denominated) in favour of the demands of ‘vulture capitalists’
meant the transfer of wealth into the pockets of hedge funds.
Governments in many parts of the world are also notorious for their
corruption – Brazil, China and Italy are frequently mentioned in the
financial press.

Marx’s own writings on this in Volume 3 of _Capital_ reflect both the
confusions of the subject matter and his own confusions as to how to
integrate the peculiar circulation of interest-bearing capital into his
overall conception of capital as value in motion. I tried to reconstruct
his views and synthesise these writings in _A Companion to Marx’s
Capital, Volume 2_.⁴⁷ Since I cannot possibly repeat this reconstruction
here, I will confine myself to citing a lengthy passage in which Marx
describes a typical sequence of events in the financial sphere. I invite
readers to compare it to the broad outlines of what happened in the
financial crisis of 2007–8 (substituting ‘mortgages’ for ‘bills of
exchange:

In a system of production where the entire interconnection of the
reproduction process rests on credit, a crisis must evidently break out
if credit is suddenly withdrawn and only cash payment is accepted … At
first glance, therefore, the entire crisis presents itself as simply a
credit and monetary crisis, and in fact all it does involve is simply
the convertibility of bills of exchange [mortgages] into money. The
majority of these bills [mortgages] represent actual purchases and
sales, the ultimate basis of the entire crisis being the expansion of
these far beyond the social need. On top of this, however, a tremendous
number of these bills [mortgages] represent purely fraudulent deals,
which now come to light and explode, as well as unsuccessful
speculations conducted with the borrowed capital, and finally commodity
capitals [houses] that are either devalued or unsaleable … It is clear
that this whole artificial system of forced expansion of the
reproduction process cannot be cured by now allowing one bank, e.g. the
Bank of England [the Federal Reserve], to give all the swindlers the
capital they lack in paper money and to buy all the depreciated
commodities [houses] at their old nominal values. Moreover, everything
here appears upside down, since in this paper world the real price and
its elements are nowhere to be seen … This distortion is particularly
evident in centres such as London, where the monetary business of an
entire country is concentrated, here the whole process becomes
incomprehensible.⁴⁸

This brings us to consider the power and importance of that aspect of
distribution that functions as a clearing house for the conversion of
idle money into the circulation of interest-bearing capital. It is here
that the madness of economic reason takes over through the creation of
anti-value and the promotion of debt peonage. In a world that is awash
in surplus liquidity (as the IMF frequently refers to it in its reports)
then these moneys have to be mobilised, centralised and lent out on the
security and certainty of future surplus value production. The
conversion of surplus money into a form of anti-capital that demands its
pound of future flesh is carried out within financial institutions. The
lender retains the property right to the money throughout and expects a
return of that money value within a certain time-frame plus the surplus
that is interest and the capital gain that may also be achieved as stock
market valuations of company assets increase.

The overall management of this conversion operation (or metamorphosis as
Marx would prefer to call it) from money into anti-value is largely
located in what I have elsewhere called ‘the state finance nexus’.⁴⁹ In
the United States (as well as in most Western democracies) this is
constituted by close collaborations between a treasury department (which
always has a special status within the state apparatus) and a central
bank which is the apex of the private banking system. A structure of
this kind first came into being with the foundation of the Bank of
England in 1694. Wealthy merchants were granted a monopoly by bank
charter from William and Mary with extensive powers in return for
providing credit and finance to a state that had been left bankrupt by
the profligacy of the Stuart kings. The balance of power between state
and finance has shifted over time. Ever since Bill Clinton in the early
years of his presidency conceded that his economic programme depended on
the consent of the bondholders, the key office of the Secretary of the
Treasury in the United States has mainly been held by someone from
Goldman Sachs.

This state–finance nexus is not subject to democratic or popular
control. It has for its mandate the regulation and control of the
private banking system for the benefit of capital as a whole. Finance,
Marx suggests, is about how ‘the common capital of the class’ shall be
managed.⁵⁰ The state–finance nexus, when taken as a whole, is analogous
to the central nervous system embodied within any organic totality. It
sanctions and guarantees leveraging practices which convert idle moneys
in deposits into anti-capital. The role of anti-capital, as we earlier
saw, is to foreclose upon the future of as many economic agents as
possible and to condemn all and sundry – consumers as well as producers,
merchants, landlords and even the financiers themselves – to a state of
debt peonage.

Capital ‘as a special kind of commodity’ has always ‘had a special kind
of alienation peculiar to it’.⁵¹ ‘The entire immense extension of the
credit system, and credit as a whole, is exploited by the bankers as
their private capital. These fellows have their capital and revenue
permanently in the money form or in the form of direct claims to money.
The accumulation of wealth by this class may proceed in a very different
way from that of actual accumulation, but it proves in any case that
they put away a good proportion of the latter.’⁵² The problem is that
finance typically ‘gives rise to monopoly in certain spheres and hence
provokes state intervention. It reproduces a new financial aristocracy,
a new kind of parasite in the guise of company promoters, speculators
and merely nominal directors; an entire system of swindling and cheating
with respect to the promotion of companies, issue of shares and share
dealings.’⁵³ Furthermore, ‘if surplus value is conceived in the
irrational form of interest, the limit is only quantitative’ and the
consequences of this, Marx adds, ‘beggars all fantasy’.⁵⁴ Bad infinity
raises its ugly head. The bonuses the Wall Streeters gave themselves
during the years of collapse ‘beggared all fantasy’. This was what
outraged the Occupy movement that suddenly appeared in 2011 in Wall
Street’s Zuccotti Park.

The disciplining effect of debt encumbrance is vital to the reproduction
of the contemporary form of capital. Debt means we are no longer ‘free
to choose’, as Milton Friedman in his paean to capitalism supposes.
Capital does not forgive us our debts, as the Bible asks, but insists we
redeem them through future value production. The future is already
foretold and foreclosed (ask any student who has $100,000 in student
loans to pay). Debt imprisons within certain structures of future value
production. Debt peonage is capital’s favoured means to impose its
particular form of slavery. This becomes doubly dangerous when the power
of the bondholders subverts and seeks to imprison the sovereignty of the
state. It is for this reason that the only mode of capital’s survival is
through the coherence and fusion achieved through the state–finance
nexus. With this, the alienation of whole populations from any real
influence and power is complete. Neither state nor capital can offer any
relief to deprivations and disempowerments. Athens is traditionally
celebrated as the cradle of democracy. Today it is merely the cradle of
debt peonage, the full and complete demolition of any democracy
whatsoever.

The corrupting and alienating power of money – which, when it takes the
form of interest acts like ‘love possessed’ – is part of the problem. It
was not only Marx who recognised the alienations involved. Even Keynes,
a deep defender of the bourgeois order but on occasion a trenchant
critic, weighed in on the matter:

When the accumulation of wealth is no longer of high social importance,
there will be great changes in the code of morals. We shall be able to
rid ourselves of many of the pseudo-moral principles which have
hag-ridden us for two hundred years, by which we have exalted some of
the most distasteful of human qualities into the position of the highest
virtues. We shall be able to afford to dare to assess the money motive
at its true value. The love of money as a possession – as distinguished
from the love of money as a means to the enjoyments and realities of
life – will be recognised for what it is, a somewhat disgusting
morbidity, one of those semicriminal, semi-pathological propensities
which one hands over with a shudder to the specialists in mental
disease. All kinds of social customs and economic practices, affecting
the distribution of wealth and of economic rewards and penalties, which
we now maintain at all costs, however distasteful and unjust they may be
in themselves, because they are tremendously useful in promoting
accumulation of capital, we shall then be free, at last, to discard.⁵⁵

That human wealth, which should have all manner of social meanings, is
increasingly imprisoned in the unique metric of money power is in itself
problematic. ‘When the limited bourgeois form is stripped away,’ writes
Marx,

what is wealth other than the universality of individual needs,
capacities, pleasures, productive forces etc., the absolute working out
of … creative potentialities? … Where he does not reproduce himself in
one specificity, but produces his totality? Strives not to remain
something he has become, but is in the absolute movement of becoming. In
bourgeois economics – and in the epoch of production to which it
corresponds – this complete working out of the human content appears as
a complete emptying-out, this universal objectification as total
alienation, and the tearing down of all limited one-sided aims as
sacrifice of the human end in itself to an entirely external end.⁵⁶

This is what ‘beggars all fantasy’. This is the insane and deeply
troubling world in which we live.


Coda

The philosopher Jacques Derrida coined the phrase ‘the madness of
economic reason’ in his commentary on Marcel Mauss’s account of the
‘potlatch’ ceremonies of British Columbian indigenous communities. These
periodic ceremonies entailed competition between households to give away
or destroy possessions in order to acquire prestige, honour and status.
Early Western accounts of the ceremonies interpreted them in terms of
economic concepts of a market economy. From that standpoint as well as
from that of Enlightenment reason, the sacrifice of personal and
household wealth painstakingly accumulated over many years appeared
irrational. Mauss found that language misleading. He replaced the
concepts of ‘debt’ and ‘repayment’ with that of ‘presents made’ and
‘repaid’. Hence the concept of an alternative non-market gift economy,
which some still find attractive to this day. Derrida seems to have
celebrated it as an adequate replacement for state managed social
welfare. But what also impressed Mauss and by extension Derrida so
mightily was the frenzied madness of destruction with which the potlatch
so often culminated. ‘It is not even a question of giving and
returning,’ Mauss wrote, ‘but of destroying, so as not to want even to
appear to desire repayment. Whole boxes of olachen (candle-fish) oil or
whale oil are burnt as are houses and thousands of blankets. The most
valuable copper objects are broken and thrown into the water, in order
to crush and to “flatten” one’s rival.’ This is what Mauss considered
truly mad. ‘There is always a moment,’ comments Derrida, ‘when this
madness begins to burn up the word or the meaning gift itself and to
disseminate without return its ashes …’¹

It is not my intention here to suggest that capital sometimes gives in
to some primordial instinct to tear down whatever it has built, much as
some children seem to delight in stomping on the castles laboriously
built by other children on the sand. For it was Marx’s point to show how
what seemed like (or was presented as) an act of fate or of the gods in
the history of capitalism was in fact a product of capital itself. But
he needed an alternative conceptual apparatus to show this. For example,
the capitalist mode of production must recognise, Marx wrote, that ‘a
devaluation of credit money … would destroy all the existing
relationships’. The banks, as we now all too well know, must be rescued
no matter what. ‘The value of commodities is thus sacrificed in order to
ensure the fantastic and autonomous existence of this value in money. In
any event, a money value is only guaranteed as long as money itself is
guaranteed.’ Inflation, as we also know, must be kept under control at
all costs. ‘This is why many millions’ worth of commodities have to be
sacrificed for a few millions in money. This is unavoidable in
capitalist production and forms one of its particular charms.’ Use
values are sacrificed and destroyed no matter what the social need.² How
insane is that?

Capital, we have argued, is value in motion. Within the circulation
process of capital, blockages periodically appear. Capital then remains
‘congealed in one of its phases of reproduction because it cannot
complete its metamorphoses’. In the crisis that ensues,

everyone has goods to sell and cannot sell, even though they have to
sell in order to pay … Capital already invested is in fact massively
unemployed, since the reproduction process is stagnant. Factories stand
idle, raw materials pile up, finished products flood the market as
commodities. Nothing could be more wrong, therefore, than to ascribe
such a situation to a lack of productive capital. It is precisely then
that there is a surplus of productive capital, partly in relation to the
normal though temporarily contracted scale of reproduction and partly in
relation to the crippled consumption.³

This is the madness which we have lived through time and time again over
the last forty years. Surplus capital and an ever increasing mass of
surplus and disposable labour sit side by side without there being any
way to put them together to produce the use values so desperately
needed, even as a third of the children in the United States, still the
richest country in the world, live in poverty and often in toxic
environments, suffer from hunger and lead poisoning even as they are
denied access to elementary social services and educational
opportunities by an enforced politics of austerity. What can be madder
than that?

What Marx in _Capital_ as well as in his other political-economic
writings does is to suggest a way to cut through all the confusions of
the daily workings of a capitalist mode of production and get to its
essence – its inner laws of motion – through the formulation of
abstractions woven into some simple (and in the end not-so-simple)
theory of endless capital accumulation.

Where the real science begins is when we take these concepts,
abstractions and theoretical formulations back up to the surface of
daily life and show how they can illuminate the whys and wherefores of
the daily struggles which people in general, but workers in particular,
face in their struggles for survival. This is what the concept of
capital is designed to do and this is what Marx hoped _Capital_ as a
book would help us accomplish. What I hope this exposition of Marx’s
thought has done, is to suggest that Marx’s way was not a unique highway
to be followed but an open door through which we could progress to ever
higher understandings of the underlying problems that inform our current
reality. If that reality with all of its confusing and seemingly insane
contemporary political expressions is to be understood, then some
investigation of how capital works is surely foundational. If today’s
politics look insane (as they seem to me to be), then surely the madness
of economic reason has something to do with it. Indeed, it sometimes
seems as if we are in a vicious and violent political world in search of
a subject to torture and to blame. To be sure, capital is not the only
possible subject for any thorough and complete reckoning of current
ills. But to pretend it has nothing to do with our current ailments and
that we do not need a cogent, as opposed to a fetishistic and apologetic
representation of how it works, how it circulates and accumulates among
us, is an offence against humanity that human history, if it manages to
survive that long, will judge severely.


Notes and references

WORKS BY MARX

_Capital: A Critique of Political Economy, Volume 1_, London: New Left
Review, 1976.

_Capital: A Critique of Political Economy, Volume 2_, London: New Left
Review, 1978.

_Capital: A Critique of Political Economy, Volume 3_, London: New Left
Review, 1981.

_A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_, London: Lawrence
and Wishart, 1970.

_The Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844,_ New York:
International Publishers, 1964.

_Grundrisse_, London: Penguin Books, 1973.

_The Poverty of Philosophy_: New York, International Publishers, 1963.

_Results of the Immediate Process of Production_ (Appendix to _Capital,
Volume 1_) in _Capital, Volume 1_, London: New Left Review, 1976.

_Theories of Surplus Value, Part 1_, London: Lawrence and Wishart, 1969.

_Theories of Surplus Value, Part 2_, London: Lawrence and Wishart, 1969.

_Theories of Surplus Value, Part 3_, London: Lawrence and Wishart, 1972.

_Value: Studies by Marx_ (ed. A. Dragstedt), London: New Park
Publications, 1976.

_Wage Labour and Capital_, Peking: Foreign Languages Press, 1978.

_Wages, Price and Profit_, Peking: Foreign Languages Press, 1965.

WORKS BY MARX AND ENGELS

_Manifesto of the Communist Party_, Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1952.

_Selected Correspondence_, Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1955.

OTHER SOURCES

Tucker, R., _The Marx-Engels Reader_ (2nd edn), New York: Norton, 1978.

PROLOGUE

1     Sperber, J., _Karl Marx: A Nineteenth Century Life_, New York:
Liveright Publishing, 2013; Stedman Jones, G., _Karl Marx: Greatness and
Illusion_. Cambridge, MA: Belknap Press, 2016.

CHAPTER 1

1     Much of the pre-history of the labour theory of value has been
covered in Meek, R., _Studies in the Labour Theory of Value_, London:
Lawrence and Wishart, 1973. A comprehensive survey of the state of
contemporary thinking in the 1970s, when value theory was much debated,
can be found in the eleven contributions assembled in Steedman, I.
(ed.), _The Value Controversy_, London: Verso/New Left Books, 1981. I
have drawn from the following texts: Elson, D. (ed.), _Value: The
Representation of Labour in Capitalism_, London: CSE Books, 1979;
Heinrich, M., _An Introduction to the Three Volumes of Karl Marx’s
Capital_, New York: Monthly Review Press, 2004; Henderson, G., _Value in
Marx: The Persistence of Value in a More-Than-Capitalist World_,
Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 2013; Larsen, N., Nilges,
M., Robinson, J., and Brown, N., _Marxism and the Critique of Value_
(eds), Chicago: MCM Press, 2014; Ollman, B., _Alienation_, London:
Cambridge University Press, 1971; Rosdolsky, R., _The Making of Marx’s
Capital_, London: Pluto Press, 1977; Rubin, I., _Essays on Marx’s Theory
of Value_, Montreal: Black Rose Books, 1973.

2     _Grundrisse_, p. 309.

3     _Grundrisse_, pp. 1, 149.

4     _Grundrisse_, pp. 251–4.

5     Fraser, N., ‘Behind Marx’s Hidden Abode: For an Expanded
Conception of Capitalism’, _New Left Review_, 86 (2014).

CHAPTER 2

1     _Capital, Volume 1_, chapter 2.

2     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 799.

3     _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 109.

4     _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 469.

5     _Capital, Volume 2_, pp. 199, 225, 261, 357, 396.

6     _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 391.

7     _Selected Correspondence_, p. 206.

8     _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 267.

9     _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 311.

10   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 490.

11   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 516.

12   _Capital, Volume 3_, chapter 29.

13   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 57.

14   Graeber, D., _Debt: Updated and Expanded –The First 5,000 Years_,
Brooklyn: Melville Books, 2014.

15   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 501.

16   For the importance of fictitious capital see Harvey, D., _A_
_Companion to Marx’s Capital, Volume 2_, London: Verso, pp. 240–66;
Durand, C., _Fictitious Capital: How Finance is Appropriating our
Future_, London: Verso, 2017.

17   _Grundrisse_, p. 278.

18   _Grundrisse_, pp. 99–100

19   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 92.

20   For a systematic discussion of the various plans that Marx set out,
see Rosdolsky, R., _The Making of Marx’s Capital_, London: Pluto Press,
1977.

21   _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 3_, p. 120.

CHAPTER 3

1     _Capital Volume_ 1, pp. 128, 138–9.

2     _Grundrisse,_ pp. 149, 236.

3     _Grundrisse_, p. 776.

4     _Grundrisse_, p. 535.

5     _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 169–72.

6     _The Poverty of Philosophy_; _Grundrisse_, pp. 115–238.

7     Hudis, P_., Marx’ Concept of the Alternative to Capitalism_,
Chicago, Haymarket, 2012, p. 107.

8     Harvey, D., _Paris: Capital of Modernity_, New York: Routledge,
2003, chapter 8.

9     _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 91–2.

10   Nelson, A., _Marx’s Concept of Money_, New York: Routledge, 2014;
Greco, T., Jr, _The End of Money and the Future of Civilisation_, White
River Junction, VT: Chelsea Green Publishing, 2009.

11   Piore, M., and Sable, C., _The Second Industrial Divide:
Possibilities for Prosperity_, New York: Basic Books, 1986; Harvey, D.,
_The Condition of Postmodernity_: Oxford, Blackwell, 1989.

12   Bauwens, M., ‘Towards the Democratisation of the Means of
Monetisation,’ mimeo, Brussels, 21 October 2013; Huws, U., _Labor in the
Digital Economy_, New York: Monthly Review Press, 2014.

13   _Grundrisse_, p. 134.

14   _Grundrisse_, pp. 145–6.

15   _Grundrisse_, p. 776.

16   _Grundrisse_, pp. 122–3.

17   Nelson, A., _Life Without Money: Building Fair and Sustainable_
_Economies_, London: Pluto Press, 2011.

18   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 148.

19   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 150.

20   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 151.

21   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 229–30.

22   _Grundrisse_, p. 146.

23   _Grundrisse_, p. 146.

24   _Capital, Volume 1_, chapter 3.

25   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 221–2.

26   _Grundrisse_, p. 210.

27   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 196.

28   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 197.

29   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 236.

30   Bourdieu, P., _Distinction: A Social Critique of the Judgment of
Taste_, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1984; Arvidsson, A.,
and Peitersen, N., _The Ethical Economy: Rebuilding Value After the
Crisis_, New York: Columbia University Press, 2013.

31   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 727.

32   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 708.

33   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 649.

34   _Capital, Volume 3_, pp. 706–8.

35   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 528.

36   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 569.

37   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 516.

38   _Capital, Volume 3_, chapter 23.

39   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 569.

40   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 570.

41   _Capital, Volume 3_, pp. 570–71.

CHAPTER 4

1     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 131.

2     _Grundrisse_, p. 543.

3     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 202.

4     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 103; Moseley, F., and Smith, T. (eds),
_Marx’s_ _Capital and Hegel’s Logic: A Reexamination_, Chicago:
Haymarket Press, 2015.

5     _Grundrisse_, p. 441.

6     _Grundrisse_, p. 621.

7     _Grundrisse_, pp. 403, 447, 542, 621. See also Harvey, D., _The
Limits to Capital_, Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1982, pp .85–9.

8     _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 2_, p. 514.

9     _Grundrisse_, p. 621.

10   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 201; _Grundrisse_, p. 527.

11   _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 396; ‘The Immediate Results of Production’
in _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 1033.

12   Tronti, M., ‘Our Operaismo’, _New Left Review_, 73 (2012); Negri,
A., _Marx Beyond Marx: Lessons on the Grundrisse_, New York:
Autonomedia, 1991.

13   Marx, K., ‘The Civil War in France’ in Tucker, R., _The
Marx-Engels_ _Reader_ (2nd edn), New York: Norton, 1978, p. 636.

14   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 991.

15   Cf. Henderson, G., _Value in Marx: The Persistence of Value in a
More-Than-Capitalist World_, Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press,
2013.

16   _Capital, Volume 2_, chapter 8.

17   _Grundrisse_, p. 535.

18   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 254.

19   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 233.

20   Roy, A_._, _Poverty Capital: Microfinance and the Making of_
_Development_, New York: Routledge, 2011.

21   Blackburn, R., _Banking on Death: Or Investing in Life_, London:
Verso, 2004.

22   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 208–9.

23   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 599.

24   _Capital, Volume 3_, chapter 24.

25   _Capital, Volume 3_, pp. 572–3.

26   Wade, R., and Veneroso, F., ‘The Asian Crisis: The High Debt Model
versus the Wall Street-Treasury-IMF Complex’, _New Left Review_, 228
(1998): 3–232.

27   _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 2_, pp. 495–6.

28   _Grundrisse_, p. 531; _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 199.

29   _Capital, Volume 2_, chapter 6.

30   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 344.

31   Hudis, P., _Marx’s Concept of the Alternative to Capitalism_,
Chicago: Haymarket, 2012.

32   On time in Marx, see Bensaid, D., _Marx for Our Times_, London:
Verso, 2002; Tombazos, S., _Time in Marx: The Categories of Time in
Marx’s Capital_, Chicago: Haymarket, 2014.

33   _Grundrisse_, p. 708.

34   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 644.

35   Himmelweit, S., and Mohun, S., ‘Domestic Labour and Capital,’
_Cambridge Journal of Economics_, 1 (1977): 15–31l.

36   Harvey, D., _The Enigma of Capital_, London: Profile Books, 2010,
chapter 5.

37   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 357.

38   Hudson, M., ‘The Road to Debt Deflation, Debt Peonage, and
Neofeudalism’, Working Paper No. 709, Annandale-on-Hudson, NY: Levy
Economics Institute of Bard College, February 2012; Hudson, M., _Killing
the Host: How Financial Parasites and Debt Destroy the Global Economy_,
ISLET-verlag, 2015.

CHAPTER 5

1     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 751.

2     Smith, N., _Uneven Development: Nature, Capital and the_
_Production of Space_, Oxford: Wiley, 1990.

3     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 718.

4     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 451.

5     Bauwens, M., ‘Towards the Democratisation of the Means of
Monetisation’, mimeo, Brussels, 21 October 2013.

6     Moulier Boutang, Y., _Cognitive Capitalism_, Cambridge: Polity,
2011; Vercellone, C., ‘From Formal Subsumption to General Intellect:
Elements for a Marxist Reading of the Thesis of Cognitive Capitalism’,
_Historical Materialism_, 15 (2007): 13–36.

7     _Grundrisse_, pp. 685–95.

8     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 284.

9     ‘Results of the Immediate Process of Production’, in _Capital,_
_Volume 1_, p. 1044.

10   Arvidsson, A., and Peitersen, N., _The Ethical Economy: Rebuilding_
_Value After the Crisis_, New York: Columbia University Press, 2013.

11   Huws, U., _Labor in the Digital Economy_, New York: Monthly Review
Press, 2014.

12   _Grundrisse_, pp. 690–706.

13   _Grundrisse_, p. 765.

14   Larsen, N., Nilges, M., Robinson, J. and Brown, N. (eds), _Marxism
and the Critique of Value_, Chicago: M-C-M, 2014.

15   Harvey, D., ‘Crisis Theory and the Falling Rate of Profit’, in
Subasat, T. (ed.), _The Great Meltdown of 2008: Systemic, Conjunctural
or Policy Created?_ Cheltenham: Edgar Elgar, 2016.

16   Harvey, D., ‘The Art of Rent’, in _Rebel Cities: From the Right to
the_ _City to the Urban Revolution_, London: Verso, 2012.

17   ‘Results of the Immediate Process of Production’, in _Capital,_
_Volume 1_, pp. 1019–49.

18   Mason, P. _PostCapitalism: A Guide to Our Future_, London: Penguin,
2016.

19   Ford, M. , _The Lights in the Tunnel: Automation, Accelerating_
_Technology and the Economy of the Future_, United States of America:
Acculent™ Pubishing, 2009.

20   Moseley, F., _Money and Totality: A Macro-Monetary Interpretation
of Marx’s Logic in Capital and the End of the ‘Transformation Problem’,_
Leiden: Brill, 2015.

CHAPTER 6

1     _Capital, Volume 1_, chapter 12.

2     _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 393–7.

3     _Capital, Volume 1_, p.562

4     _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 493–4.

5     Subasat, T. (ed.), _The Great Meltdown of 2008: Systemic,_
_Conjunctural or Policy Created?_ Cheltenham: Edgar Elgar, 2016; Larsen,
N., Nilges, M., Robinson, J., and Brown, N. (eds), _Marxism and the
Critique of Value_, Chicago: MCM Press, 2014.

6     Harvey, D., _A Brief History of Neoliberalism_, Oxford: Oxford
University Press, 2003.

7     ‘Results of the Immediate Process of Production’, in _Capital,_
_Volume 1_, pp. 1019–49.

8     Harvey, D., ‘Crisis Theory and the Falling Rate of Profit’, in
Subasat, T. (ed.), _The Great Meltdown of 2008: Systemic, Conjunctural
or Policy-Created?_ Cheltenham: Edgar Elgar, 2016; _Capital, Volume 1_,
pp. 616–17.

9     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 508.

10   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 512–13.

11   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 481–2.

12   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 620–21.

13   _Capital, Volume 1_, p 618.

14   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 505.

15   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 506.

16   _Grundrisse_, p. 704.

17   Gordon, R., _The Rise and Fall of American Growth: The U.S._
_Standard of Living since the Civil War_, Princeton: Princeton
University Press, 2016.

18   Poulet, D., _Le Sublime_, Paris: 1980.

19   Brynjolfsson, E., and McAfee, A., _The Second Machine Age: Work,_
_Progress, and Prosperity in a Time of Brilliant Technologies,_ New
York: Norton, 2014.

20   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 492.

21   _Grundrisse_,

CHAPTER 7

1     _Selected Correspondence_, p. 208.

2     _Communist Manifesto._

3     _Grundrisse_, p. 407,

4     _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 2_, p. 253.

5     _Grundrisse_, p. 539.

6     _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 328.

7     Harvey, D., ‘The Geography of Capitalist Accumulation: A
Reconstruction of the Marxian Theory’, in Harvey, D., _Spaces of
Capital: Towards a Critical Geography_, New _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 727.

8     _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 579–80.

9     Capital, Volume 1, pp. 579–80.

10   Harvey, D., ‘The Spatial Fix: Hegel, von Thünen and Marx’, in
Harvey, D., _Spaces of Capital: Towards a Critical Geography_, New York:
Routledge, 2001.

11   _Capital, Volume 1_, chapter 33.

12   Luxemburg, R., _The Accumulation of Capital_, New York: Routledge,
1951.

13   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 931–2.

14   Cited in Chomsky, N., _On Power and Ideology_, Boston: South End
Press, 1990, p. 14.

15   Tomba, M., _Marx’s Temporalities_, Chicago, Haymarket Books, 2014;
Tombazos, S., _Time in Marx: The Categories of Time in Marx’s Capital_,
Chicago: Haymarket, 2014; Bensaid, D., _Marx for_ _Our Times: Adventures
and Misadventures of a Critique_, London: Verso, 2009.

16   _Grundrisse_, p. 746.

17   In what follows I rely heavily on the essay ‘Space as a Key Word’
in Harvey, D., _Spaces of Global Capitalism: A Theory of Uneven
Geographical Development_, London: Verso, 2006.

18   Simmel, G., ‘The Metropolis and Mental Life’, in Levine, D. (ed.),
_On Individuality and Social Forms_, Chicago: Chicago University Press,
1971.

19   Kern, S., _The Culture of Time and Space, 1880–1918_, London:
Weidenfeld and Nicolson, 1983.

20   Bensaid, D., _Marx for Our Times: Adventures and Misadventures of a
Critique_, London: Verso, 2009, p. 73.

21   Whitehead, A., ‘La Théorie Relationiste de l’Espace’, _Revue de_
_Métaphysique et de Morale_, 23 (1916): 423–54.

22   McDonald, O., _Lehman Brothers: A Crisis of Value,_ Manchester:
Manchester University Press, 2016.

23   Bensaid, D., _Marx for Our Times: Adventures and Misadventures of a
Critique_, London: Verso, 2009, p. 77.

24   _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 301.

25   I rely on the much more detailed account in Harvey, D., _The Limits
to Capital_, Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1982, chapter 8.

26   _Grundrisse_, p.706.

27   _Grundrisse_, p. 694.

28   _Grundrisse_, p. 707.

29   _Grundrisse_, p. 707.

30   _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 242.

31   _Grundrisse,_ p. 731.

32   _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 186.

33   _Grundrisse_, p. 731.

34   _Capital, Volume 2_, p. 264.

CHAPTER 8

1     Darnell, A. (ed.), _The Collected Economics Articles of Harold_
_Hotelling_, New York: Springer Verlag, 1990.

2     Haggett, P., _Locational Analysis in Human Geography_, London:
Edward Arnold, 1965.

3     _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 701.

4     The details of Marx’s scattered comments on this topic are brought
together in Harvey, D., ‘The Geography of Capitalist Accumulation: A
Reconstruction of the Marxian Theory’, published as chapter 12 in
Harvey, D., _Spaces of Capital: Towards a Critical Geography,_ New York:
Routledge, 2001.

5     _Capital, Volume 3_, pp. 345–6.

6     _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 3_, p. 106.

7     _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 2_, pp. 201, 474–5.

8     _Capital, Volume 3_, chapter 9.

9     Dealbook, ‘Blankfein Says He’s Just Doing “God’s Work”’, _New_
_York Times_, 9 November 2009.

10   Johnson, C., _MITI and the Japanese Miracle_, Stanford: Stanford
University Press, 1982.

11   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 222.

12   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 240–41.

13   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 183, 207.

14   _Capital, Volume 1_, p. 162.

15   _Capital, Volume 1_, pp. 775–8.

16   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 571.

17   Baldwin, R., _The Great Convergence: Information Technology and the
New Globalisation_, Cambridge, MA: Belknap, 2016.

18   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 999.

19   Harvey, D., ‘From Managerialism to Entrepreneurialism: The
Transformation in Urban Governance in Late-Capitalism,’ _Geografiska
Annaler, Series B, Human Geography_, 71 (1) (1989): 3–17.

20   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 1001.

21   Harvey, D_._, _The Limits to Capital_, Oxford: Basil Blackwell,
1982, chapters 12 and 13.

22   Myrdal, G., _Economic Theory and Underdeveloped Regions_, London:
Methuen, 1965.

23   _Capital, Volume 3_, 623–4.

24   Wood, E., _The Origin of Capitalism: A Longer View_, London: Verso,
2002; Harvey, D., _The New Imperialism_, Oxford: Oxford University
Press, 2003. See the discussion and debate on these two books in
_Historical Materialism_, 14(4) (2006).

25   The works of Samir Amin, Giovanni Arrighi and Peter Gowan have
opened a way to go beyond the arid formalism of Wallerstinian world
system theory and the dead end of the state debate of the 1970s and its
aftermath to probe more deeply into a value theoretic perspective on
geopolitical relations. See in particular Amin, S., _The Law of World
Wide Value_, New York: Monthly Review Press, 2010; Amin, S., _Three
Essays on Value Theory_, New York, Monthly Review Press, 2013; Arrighi,
G., _The Long Twentieth Century: Money, Power and the Origins of Our
Times_, London: Verso, 1994; Arrighi, G., and Silver, B., _Chaos and
Governance in the Modern World System_, Minneapolis: University of
Minnesota Press, 1999; Gowan, P., _The Global Gamble: Washington’s
Faustian Bid for World Dominance_, London: Verso, 1999.

CHAPTER 9

1     _Grundrisse_, p. 269.

2     _Grundrisse,_ pp. 270–71.

3     Martin, W., ‘In Defense of Bad Infinity: A Fichtean Response to
Hegel’s Differenzschrift,’ mimeo, Department of Philosophy, University
of Essex; Arthur, C. _The New Dialectic and Marx’s Capital_, Leiden:
Brill, 2004, pp. 137–52.

4     _Grundrisse_, p. 270.

5     _Capital, Volume 3,_ p. 595.

6     _Grundrisse_, p. 413.

7     _Capital, Volume 3_, pp. 476, 516.

8     _Grundrisse_, pp. 270–71.

9     _Grundrisse_, p. 590.

10   _Theories of Surplus Value, Part 2_, pp. 468, 549. Most economists
recognise market imperfections that arise from externality effects and
from imperfect information (and even study them as ‘market failures’).
Those with Keynesian inclinations recognise a state role for proper
aggregate demand and supply management mainly directed at dampening
business cycles in the hope of eliminating crises and depressions. But
their aim is to correct for imperfections and to define optimal policies
for state involvements which will restore the concept of harmonious
equilibrium to its rightful theoretical place. None of them, even those
like Paul Krugman, Joseph Stiglitz and Jeffrey Sachs, who lay claim to
progressive political positions, have any conception of the internal
contradictions of capital or the dangers of the ‘bad infinity’ of
endless compound growth.

11   _Grundrisse_, p. 221.

12   Federal Reserve Bank of St Louis, _Economic Reports_.

13   _Grundrisse_, pp. 334–5.

14   ‘Towering Above’, _National Geographic_, 229(1) 2016’

15   International Monetary Fund/International Labour Organisation, ‘The
Challenges of Growth, Employment and Social Cohesion’ discussion paper,
Joint ILO-IMF Conference in Cooperation with the Prime Minister of
Norway, 2010; available at
http://www.osloconference2010.org/discussionpaper.pdf

16   Agence Presse Français, ‘China’s Property Frenzy and Surging Debt
Raises Red Flag for the Economy’, _Guardian_, 27 November 2016.

17   Reuters, ‘China’s Property Boom Continues as Prices Rise at Record
Rate’, _Fortune_, 21 October 2016.

18   Shen Hong, ‘China’s Plan for Local Debt Amounts to a Bailout’,
_Wall Street Journal_, 23 June 2015.

19   International Monetary Fund, ‘Debt: Use It Wisely’, _Fiscal_
_Monitor_, World Economic and Financial Surveys, October 2016.

20   Shepard, W., _Ghost Cities of China,_ London: Zed Books, 2015.

21   Robert Caro, _The Power Broker: Robert Moses and the Fall of New_
_York_, New York: Vintage, 1975.

22   Appelbaum, B., ‘A Recovery that Repeats its Painful Precedents’,
_New York Times_, 28 July 2011.

23   Harvey, D., _Paris: Capital of Modernity_, New York, Routledge,
2003.

24   Marx, K., ‘The Civil War in France’, in Tucker, R., _The
Marx-Engels Reader_ (2nd edn), New York: Norton, 1978.

25   Tabb, W., _The Long Default: New York City and the Urban Fiscal_
_Crisis_, New York: Monthly Review Press, 1982.

26   Harvey, D., _A Brief History of Neoliberalism,_ Oxford: Oxford
University Press, 2005.

27   Goldstein, M., Abrams, R., and Protess, B., ‘How Housing’s New
Players Spiraled into Banks’ Old Mistakes’, _New York Times_, 26 June
2016.

28   Harvey, D., _The New Imperialism_, Oxford: Oxford University Press,
2003.

29   Ridge, M., ‘Three New “Engines of Growth” to Watch in China’,
_Financial Times_, 18 September 2014.

30   Clover, C., and Hornby, L., ‘China’s Great Game: Road to a New
Empire’, _Financial Times_, 12 October 2015.

31   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 595.

32   Carvalho, B., Cavalcanti, M., and Venuturupalli, V. (eds), _Occupy_
_All Streets: Olympic Urbanism and Contested Futures in Rio de Janeiro_,
New York: Terraform, 2016.

33   Ozturkmen, A., ‘The Park, the Penguin and the Gas: Performance in
Progress of Gezi Events’, _The Drama Review_, Guest editor Carol Martin,
2014.

34   Keller, B., ‘The Revolt of the Rising Classes’, _New York Times_,
30 June 2013.

35   Harvey, D., _Seventeen Contradictions and the End of Capitalism_,
London: Profile Books, 2013.

36   Ollman, B., _Alienation,_ London: Cambridge University Press, 1971.

37   _Grundrisse_, pp. 831–2.

38   _Grundrisse_, p. 287.

39   Gorz, A., _Critique of Economic Reason_, London: Verso, 1989; on
the limits to compensatory consumerism for workers see _Grundrisse_, pp.
204–7.

40   Debord, G., _The Society of the Spectacle_, Montreal: Black and Red
Books, 2000.

41   Hadjimichalis, C., _Uneven Development and Regionalism: State,_
_Territory and Class in Southern Europe_, London: Croom Helm, 1987.

42   Harvey, D., _The New Imperialism_, Oxford: Oxford University Press,
2003, chapter 4.

43   Sassen, S., _Expulsions: Brutality and Complexity in the Global_
_Economy_, Cambridge, MA, Belknap Press, 2014.

44   Piketty, T., _Capital in the Twenty First Century_, Cambridge, MA,
Belknap Press, 2014.

45   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 573.

46   Lapavitsas, C. with Flassbeck, H., _Against the Troika: Crisis and_
_Austerity in the Eurozone_, London: Verso, 2015.

47   Harvey, D., _A Companion to Marx’s Capital, Volume 2_, London:
Verso, 2013.

48   _Capital, Volume 3_, 621–2.

49   Harvey, D., _Seventeen Contradictions and the End of Capitalism_,
London: Profile Books, 2013, pp. 44–7.

50   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 490.

51   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 470.

52   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 609.

53   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 569.

54   _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 523.

55   Keynes, J. M., _Essays in Persuasion,_ New York: Classic House
Books edn, 2009, p. 199.

56   _Grundrisse_, p. 488.

CODA

1     Derrida, J., ‘The Madness of Economic Reason’, in Derrida, J.,
_Given Time: I. Counterfeit Money_, Chicago: Chicago University Press,
1992; Mauss, M., _The Gift: The Form and Reason for Exchange in Archaic
Societies_, London: Routledge, 1990.

2     _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 649.

3     _Capital, Volume 3_, p. 614.


Acknowledgements

I wish to acknowledge the gift of a free education and of adequate
grants that took me through my university education free of charge up
until the completion of my doctorate in Cambridge in 1961. I also wish
to acknowledge the privilege of being part of the City University of New
York which, in spite of many difficulties, still maintains its mission
as a public university to serve the public interest in higher education
for all.

I wish to express my appreciation of John Davey, my long-term friend and
publisher, who suggested I write this book. Alas, he did not live to see
it through to final publication. My good friend and colleague Miguel
Robles-Duran helped me with the design of Figures 2 and 3 and drew the
final versions.


Index

A

abstraction 52, 127, 142, 209

abstract labour 130, 141–2, 160

accumulation 131–3, 135–9, 142, 147, 150, 152, 163–8, 173–4, 185, 187,
189, 192, 199–200, 204–5, 209

accumulation by dispossession 48, 70, 199–200

alienated labour 55–7, 77, 89, 91–2, 194–5

alienation xii, 56, 60, 91, 102, 193–7, 200–201, 203–6

annihilation of space by time 130–31

B

Black Lives Matter 47

Blankfein, Lloyd 156

Brazil 141, 179–80, 192–4, 201

Britain 17, 27, 37, 54, 57, 66, 104, 141, 164, 168, 189–90, 194

built environment 31, 95, 144, 150–51, 179, 184

buyers and sellers 15, 22, 48, 75, 77

C

capital ix, xi–xii, 1–50, 52–63, 65–71, 72–93, 94–106, 107–39, 142–53,
154–7 159–72, 192, 194– 205, 207–9

finance 17–18, 22–5, 66–7 86, 201, 204

industrial 18–19, 30, 35–6, 38–9, 42–3, 79, 128, 144, 166, 201

landed 18, 23, 36–7, 39, 41, 109, 128, 199, 204

merchant 17–20, 22–23, 30, 35–7, 40–41, 52, 56–7, 66, 74, 82, 87, 98,
128, 134, 166, 176, 200–201, 203–4

capital as value in motion 4–23, 40, 44, 50, 53, 74, 82, 93, 104, 106,
127, 153, 167, 174, 195, 201, 208

capital intensive production 34, 156–7

capitalist state 135–7

categories 18, 24, 52–4, 57, 59, 67

cement 177–9, 188–92, 197

central banks 169, 173, 176

centralisation of capital 67, 69–70, 120, 163

Chile 161, 180

China 107, 135, 161, 163–4, 168, 178–84, 186, 188–91, 201

circulation (of capital) 19–21, 23, 25, 28–33, 36, 38–9, 41, 49, 52,
59–60, 62, 66, 68–9, 72, 74–5, 76–80, 82, 84–8, 93, 96, 99–102, 105,
107, 110, 113, 120–21, 125, 129, 131–2, 134, 149, 153, 157–8, 160, 163,
167, 172–4, 187, 191, 195, 198, 201

of fixed capital 31, 38, 79, 143–47

of interest-bearing capital 19, 23, 38, 41–3, 66, 69, 83, 85–6, 146,
148–50, 174, 187, 201–202

cities xi, 83, 126–8, 162, 166, 184–5, 189–93, 197

civil society 15, 125, 133

class x, 7, 11, 13–19, 25, 32, 35, 42, 48, 54, 56, 59, 61, 66, 68, 76–7,
80, 90, 110, 112, 116, 126–7, 129, 133, 134–5, 154–6, 162, 165, 169,
185–7, 189, 193–4, 196, 198, 200–201

capitalist 13, 17–19, 25, 34, 40, 42–3, 66, 68, 90–1, 116, 175, 187,
193, 203–4

factions 13, 35, 42, 133

relation 11, 15, 42, 48, 76, 89, 127, 133, 134, 198, 200

struggle 13, 77, 80, 84, 108, 110, 112, 155

working 13–14, 27, 32, 40, 54, 77, 80, 95, 110, 118, 127, 131, 176, 185,
194–5, 200–201

colonialism 133–5, 171

commodities 1, 3, 7–8, 12–16, 21, 24–5, 28–9, 32, 35, 51, 58, 62–5, 72,
76, 104, 108–9, 116, 128, 130, 132, 137, 143, 145, 147, 149, 154–61,
168, 172, 176, 202, 208

commons 91, 96–7, 103, 173

communism 34, 54, 56, 114, 138

competition 4, 9, 16–17, 25–6, 29, 33–4, 36–7, 46, 80, 89, 108–11, 130,
143, 145, 154, 161–4, 167–8, 170, 190, 192, 195–6, 207

compound growth 4, 173–4, 194, 199

computers xi, 95, 119–20, 122, 111–12, 151–2

concrete labour 130, 139, 159

constant capital 10–11, 109, 141–2

consumption 11–13, 21, 28, 31, 39, 45–6, 60, 76, 79, 81, 124–5, 128–9,
132, 147–8, 150, 168, 170, 177, 180, 182, 197–9, 184, 187–8, 208

productive 12, 81, 184

consumption fund 48, 150, 168, 170

continuity of flow 31, 48, 53, 74, 80–81, 93, 149

contradictions xii, 9, 32–4, 46, 58–64, 71, 77, 79, 85, 90–91, 93–4,
100, 105–6, 112, 122–4, 133–5, 137, 149–50, 152, 16, 174–6, 194

credit 29, 31–2, 39, 41, 44, 47, 52–5, 57, 59–60, 62, 65–7, 70–71,
79–82, 84–5, 124, 134, 139, 163, 167–8, 176–8, 180–81, 183, 186, 194,
199, 202–203, 208

crises ix, 40, 48, 64, 67, 74, 80, 82, 84, 86, 93, 150, 152, 168, 174–5,
180–81, 183, 185–6, 188, 193, 198, 200, 202, 208

culture 96, 100, 102–4, 126, 165

currency 94, 159–60, 162, 180, 183

D

daily life ix, 15, 31, 48, 60, 76, 113–14, 125–6, 131, 138, 150, 152,
172, 175, 185–6, 197, 209

Darwin, Charles 46, 163

debt 19, 20, 23, 40–41, 60, 66–7, 78–83, 93, 96, 139–40, 143, 156, 158,
175–6, 181–3, 186–7, 190, 201–202, 204–5, 207

as claim on future labour 30, 175

peonage 44, 60, 66, 82–3, 93, 96, 175, 202, 204–5

demand 12–17, 19, 22, 24, 32–3, 39, 42–3, 47, 57, 59, 63, 67, 76, 80,
91, 105, 121, 133, 146, 150, 176, 183, 185, 189–90, 196–7

and supply, 29, 39, 76

Derrida, Jacques 207

Descartes, Rene 118, 137

destruction 86, 92, 118, 174, 194, 207

devaluation 35, 72, 74–84, 86–7, 92, 145, 149–50, 152, 168, 174, 191,
207

dialectic 72–3

digital labour 57–8, 95, 101, 103

disposable time 90, 195

distribution 12–13, 16–23, 25, 29, 33–46, 48, 54, 59, 66–7, 74, 78, 81,
106–7, 124–5, 133–4, 136, 142, 156–7, 165, 176–7, 200, 202, 205

divisions of labour 61, 118, 124, 133

driving force of capital 3, 20–23, 37, 60, 82, 104, 109, 117

dystopia 25, 27, 126, 154

E

economic science xi–xii, 10, 25, 29, 34, 53, 55, 63, 84, 88, 92, 105,
154, 172–5, 177, 194

effective demand 12–14, 16–17, 22, 32–3, 43, 47, 80, 105, 176, 183, 185

enclosure 36, 100, 103

endless capital accumulation 66, 181, 187, 199, 209

England 57, 167–8, 200, 203

equalisation of the rate of profit 34–5, 40, 155–7

exploitation ix, 10, 21, 25–6, 42, 58, 85, 87–8, 95–6, 113, 118, 129,
138, 155, 157, 175, 199

F

family 15, 48, 54, 118, 133, 137

fetishism 40–41, 54, 69, 85, 109, 115, 120–22, 125–6, 163, 174, 209

feudalism 37, 54, 96, 128, 134, 138, 167

fiat money 15, 62

fictitious capital 40–41, 43, 68, 83, 176–7

financial aristocracy 68, 70, 204

financial system 15, 20, 39–41, 44, 67–8, 79, 81, 84–5, 181

fixed capital 29, 31–2, 38–9, 60, 78–9, 97, 101, 143–52, 165, 167–8, 170

of an independent kind, 152

flexible specialisation/accumulation 58

foreclosure 44, 181, 185, 200

free gifts of human nature 49, 75, 89, 97–8, 100, 116, 147, 163–5, 167,
193

free gifts of nature 7, 90, 94, 97–8, 100, 102, 116, 164–8, 195

free trade 110, 131, 157, 160–62

G

general intellect 97, 100

geographical flows and barriers 39, 130, 133, 149, 152, 154, 161, 164,
166, 170

geographical difference 97, 155, 161, 164, 170–71

Germany 164

global debt 20, 83, 158, 181, 183, 190

gold 60–62, 65–6, 154–5, 157–60, 166, 168–9, 173, 176

Goldman Sachs 157, 169

Greece 83, 162, 183, 201

growth 4, 11, 13, 19, 21, 29, 90, 115–16, 120, 122, 135, 140, 150, 161,
173–4, 180, 185, 187–8, 190, 193–4, 198–9

compound 4, 173–4, 194, 199

H

Haussmann 186

Hegel xi, 133–4, 173

hegemony 92, 131

hidden hand 25, 34, 54–5, 61

hoarding 38, 60, 81, 146

household labour 91

I

immateriality 5, 51, 106, 141, 144, 171

imperialism 134–5, 171, 184, 189

indebtedness 23, 81, 182

industrial reserve army 26–7, 33, 76, 90, 110, 147

inequality ix, 27, 55, 83, 156, 200

information 91 114, 127, 171

innovation 12, 31, 103, 111, 115, 119–20, 124, 144

institutions 9, 15, 37, 40, 55, 67–70, 148, 150, 166, 169, 176–7,
180–81, 183, 186–7, 189, 201, 203

intellectual property rights 1_7,_ 37, 96, 99–100, 104

interest 3, 18–20, 22–4, 29, 35, 38–9, 41–4, 47, 52, 60, 67–9, 79, 82–5,
106, 124, 134, 141, 146, 148–50, 160, 166, 168, 174, 181, 187, 181,
201–5

interest-bearing capital 18–19, 23, 38, 41–4, 60, 66, 68–9, 79, 83, 85,
106, 124, 134, 146, 148–50, 166, 174, 180–81, 187, 201–2

interest rate 39, 42–3, 168

International Monetary Fund (IMF) 129, 169, 180–81, 183, 201, 203

Ireland 135, 180–81

J

Japan 17, 104, 157, 160–62, 190

joint products 145

K

Keynes, John Maynard 15, 22, 32, 80, 84, 205

Knowledge xi, 14, 90–91, 95–8, 100–101, 103–4, 115–16, 139, 147, 163,
171

Korea (South) 75, 163, 178–9, 190

L

labour-intensive production 156

labour-power 7–13, 25–6, 32, 35, 47, 76, 87–8, 90, 92, 103–4, 107–11,
122, 124, 137, 140–41, 145, 155–6, 165, 196

value of 9–11, 13, 26, 87, 108–9, 112, 140, 165

labour process 8, 11, 27, 48, 56–7, 76–7, 97, 103–4, 108, 110, 117–18,
121, 195

labour theory of value (see value) 61, 63, 97, 145, 194

labour time 4–5, 12, 55–6, 59, 63, 75, 90–91, 103, 122–3, 136, 142–3,
156, 159

land 2, 17, 19–20, 23–4, 33, 35–6, 37, 39–40, 63, 66, 82, 87, 103, 105,
116, 127–8, 131, 133–4, 139, 141, 152, 155, 165, 167, 170, 177, 189, 193

land and property speculation 177, 189, 193

land rent 19, 23, 35, 36, 37, 39, 170, 193,

landlords 18, 23, 35, 36–7, 39–41, 66, 109, 167, 177, 199, 204

laws of motion of capital ix, xi, 16, 34, 37, 54, 153–4, 171, 175, 209

limits to capital 58, 93, 123, 133, 198

location 36–6, 141, 148, 155, 165–7, 190, 199

M

machines 7–8, 27, 38–9, 78–9, 90–1, 109–11, 117–22, 143–8, 165, 174, 189

market 1, 3, 7–16, 20, 25–8, 30–38, 42–8, 54–7, 62–4, 69–70, 75–82,
84–5, 87–9, 91, 94, 97, 99–100, 102, 106, 108, 110–11, 116–17, 119–22,
124–5, 127–30, 132–6

Mauss, Marcel 207

means of production 1, 7–8, 10, 12–13, 36, 56, 61–2, 72–3, 78, 116, 129,
133, 147, 195

mental conceptions 96, 112–16, 121, 125–6

merchants 18, 22–3, 30, 35, 37–8, 41, 56–7, 177, 200–201, 203–4

migration 137, 162

militarism 16, 22, 124, 184, 197

Mill, John Stuart x, 122

Milton, John 98–9

moments 30, 45–6, 52, 81, 112–15, 121, 177

monetary theory of value 105

money 1, 3–15, 17, 23–32, 35, 38–50, 51–71, 72–7, 79–85, 94, 98, 100,
102, 105–6, 113, 130, 137, 142, 144, 146, 148, 155, 157–61, 168–70,
172–6, 178, 180–81, 183, 189–92, 194, 202–5, 207–8

money capital 3, 7, 12, 17–21, 25, 30, 39, 42, 68–9, 84, 130, 148

money creation 18, 40–41, 68

monopolistic competition 154, 162

monopoly 16, 25, 70, 80, 96, 99, 102–3, 109–11, 122, 143, 154–5, 162–3,
167, 203–4

moral depreciation 145

mortgages 140, 181, 202

Moses, Robert 167, 184, 186

N

national differences in wages 140, 155

natural resources (see free gifts of nature) 164–5

nature 7, 14, 22, 36

negation 72–3, 75, 77, 84, 86–7, 90, 143

neoliberalism 95–6

New York x, 67, 81, 135, 143, 156, 167, 185–9, 193–4

North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) 160, 164, 170

O

Occupy Wall Street 194, 204

overaccumulation 86, 150, 168, 185, 187, 189

P

Paris 56, 69, 104–6, 185–6, 188, 197, 200

Commune 188, 200

patriarchy 15, 91

pension funds 82, 67

perfect competition 16–17, 25, 34, 36–7, 154

Ponzi finance 83, 106, 183

precapitalist money forms 37, 41, 53–4, 118, 172

predation (financial) 48, 177, 189, 201

price 4, 8, 32, 36, 39, 42, 44, 47, 54, 56, 60, 69, 86, 94–130, 143,
155, 156, 168, 179, 181–3, 199, 202

price of production 156

private property 25, 42, 55, 61, 94, 103, 116, 133, 137, 139, 154, 198

privatisation 36, 76

production 1–205

productive forces 85, 112, 114, 117, 126, 206

productivity 9, 26, 28, 31, 90, 96–7, 101, 104, 108–9, 111, 116, 120–22,
136, 140–41, 124–5, 147, 152, 155–6, 160, 163, 190, 195, 200

profit 10–11, 17–18, 20–3, 24–5, 33–37, 40–42, 52, 67–9, 80–82, 86, 94,
105, 110, 120, 122, 136, 139, 155–7, 167, 191, 199

profit rate 20, 33, 40, 136 155–7

property markets 87, 94, 99, 100, 180–82, 188

Proudhon, J-P. x, 54–7

putting out system 56, 104

R

realization 12–13, 15–16, 20–22, 25, 28–33, 35–6, 40–3, 45, 47–8, 67–8,
72–7, 80–81, 86, 91, 99, 101, 105, 107, 124–5, 134–6, 142, 147, 150,
157, 165, 170, 196, 200

redemption of debt 20, 23, 44, 78, 80, 106, 183, 201, 204

reinvestment 17, 25, 30, 67–8, 125

relation to nature 22, 92, 113, 115, 125, 194–5

relative surplus value 26, 27, 33, 76, 90, 104–5, 108–10, 129, 140–41,
144–5

rent 3, 17, 24, 35, 36–7, 39, 52, 82, 95, 99, 103, 133, 167

monopoly 95, 99, 103

reproduction schemas 29

reputational value 99

Ricardo, David ix, 55, 83

Robinson Crusoe 53

S

Saint-Simon, Henri, 10, 69, 186

Sanders, Bernie 47

scale 35, 57–8, 69–70, 83, 89, 117, 119, 123, 134–5, 147–9, 160, 163,
178, 184, 186, 188, 192, 208

second nature 49, 95, 165, 167

secondary circuit of capital 152

simple reproduction 26, 136, 142, 172–3, 175

skills 14, 92, 95, 100, 103, 110, 115–16, 122, 127, 164–5

slavery 7, 27, 47, 135, 204

Smith, Adam ix, 16, 25, 61, 87

social relations xii, 5, 12–15, 37, 54–6, 58–60, 92, 113–14, 117–18,
125–7, 131, 175, 197

social reproduction 7, 11, 14, 24, 47–8, 107–8, 124, 136–7, 142–3, 150,
170, 182, 200–203

space 36–7, 70, 89, 91–2, 127–54, 159, 164, 170–71, 184, 190–91, 197

absolute space and time 139–40, 164, 170

relational spacetime 138–42

relative space-time 139–40, 165

Spain 180–81, 194

spatial competition 154

spatial fix 133–4, 189–90

spectacle 101–2, 162, 186, 198

speculation 19–20, 40, 57, 66, 70, 94, 104, 106, 180, 202

speed-up 4, 16, 31–2, 43–4, 86, 163, 175, 196, 198, 200, 204

spiral 4, 11, 21, 26, 121, 136, 142, 173, 181, 194

stagnation (secular) 20, 33, 43, 88, 94, 100–101, 105–6, 111, 150

state xi, 8, 13–17, 22, 40, 42, 46, 48, 54, 62, 66, 70, 74, 80–81, 83,
87–8, 118, 124–6, 135, 137, 148, 152–3, 158, 162–3, 166–7, 169–70 171,
174, 176–7, 180, 183, 185, 187, 190, 200–205, 207

state-finance nexus 169, 203, 205

surplus capital 148, 184, 188–9, 190–91, 208

surplus value 1, 8, 10–20, 24–29, 32–5, 42, 60, 72, 77, 80, 87–90, 91–4,
96, 98–106, 108–10, 116, 122, 124, 129, 132, 136, 139–41, 144–5, 156–7,
164, 169, 172–4, 177, 195, 199, 203–4, 208

T

taxes 3, 15–16, 33, 46, 67, 100, 102, 120, 199

technology 8–9, 26, 28–9, 107–26, 136, 200

teleology 57, 136

tertiary circuit of capital 152

time 3, 7, 9, 12, 26–7, 29, 31–2, 35, 38, 53, 58–9, 63, 75, 78, 90, 91,
103, 132–3, 136, 143, 156, 159, 181

U

unproductive labour 87–8, 166, 200

urbanisation (see cities) 179, 185, 187–8

use value 21, 42, 59–60, 73, 75, 84, 86–7, 94–7, 100, 102, 123, 129,
136, 142, 148, 160, 164–5, 167, 172–4, 178, 196–7, 208–9

utility 72, 145

utopia xi, 25, 54, 104, 113, 126, 130, 154, 175, 186, 195

V

valorisation 11, 15, 18–23, 25, 30, 33, 41, 43–5, 48, 55, 61, 67–9,
75–7, 81, 83–5, 90, 105, 107–8, 111, 115, 121, 124–5, 136, 142, 157,
164, 170, 195, 200

value x, 1, 4–50, 51–71, 72–93, 94–106, 108–26, 127, 129, 132, 136,
139–40, 143–71, 172–83, 188, 195–206, 208

value regimes 154–70, 180, 192, 195,

value theory of labour 9

ALSO FROM PROFILE BOOKS

[Images]

[Images]

The Ways of the World

David Harvey

The essential anthology of writings by the world’s leading Marxist
thinker.

ISBN 978 1 78125 532 2
eISBN 978 1 78283 197 6

[Images]

The Enigma of Capital and the Crises of Capitalism

David Harvey

David Harvey explains how capitalism came to dominate the world, why it
resulted in the current financial crisis – and why it’s time for a
change.

ISBN 978 1 84668 309 1
eISBN 978 1 84765 201 0

[Images]

Seventeen Contradictions and the End of Capitalism

David Harvey

Following on from _The Enigma of Capital_, David Harvey explores the
hidden workings of capital and reveals the forces that will lead
inexorably to the demise of our system.

ISBN 978 1 78125 161 4
eISBN 978 1 78283 008 5

[Images]

Politics: Ideas in Profile

David Runciman

An accessible introduction to politics from David Runciman, Professor of
Politics at Cambridge University.

ISBN 978 1 78125 257 4
eISBN 978 1 78283 056 6

[Images]

Why Nations Fail: The Origins of Power, Prosperity and Poverty

Daron Acemoglu & James A. Robinson

A provocative bestseller that explains why the world is divided into
nations with wildly differing levels of prosperity.

ISBN 978 1 84668 430 2
eISBN 978 1 84765 461 8
